institutions supplying white applicants to medical school, 14th for the most African American applicants, 30th for the most Asian applicants, and 32nd for the most Hispanic and Latino American applicants. 
The University of Georgia School of Public and International Affairs was ranked 4th in the nation, while the Public Management Administration program was ranked 1st by U.S. News & World Report in 2019. The Academic Ranking of World Universities has ranked the school 7th in the world. 
The University of Georgia ranks fifth in the entire nation in terms of number of Congressional staffers produced out of undergraduate universities. 
In 2019, Businessweek named the executive MBA program in the university's Terry College of Business 14th in the nation. 
In the 2020 ranking, the School of Environment and Design was ranked 1st among programs for undergraduates in the nation. 
The College of Veterinary Medicine was ranked 10th in the nation, and College of Pharmacy was ranked 25th in the nation, in the 2019 edition of U.S. News & World Report rankings. Two UGA pharmacy students were selected for the U.S. Navy's Health Services Collegiate Program Medical Service Corps, a selective program that accepted only five recipients from applicants across the country. 
In November 2018, the University of Georgia launched a number of research initiatives funded by a $3 million NSF grant, including a project to transform the school's science education. The University also added a new Interdisciplinary Science, Technology, Engineering, Math (I-STEM) building that opened in 2021. 
In addition, Georgia has research centers and institutes that include the following among many others. 
Founded in fall 2002, the institute is responsible for supporting campus-wide bioinformatics research at UGA. Institute members conduct bioinformatics research in a wide range of areas, ranging from structural genomics and bioinformatics, plant genomics, microbial genomics, biomedical and cancer bioinformatics and computational and statistical sciences for bioinformatics.[citation needed] 
Sapelo Island, off the Georgia coast, is home to the University of Georgia Marine Institute, a nearshore ecological and geological research institute. The mission of the institute is to support and conduct research on coastal processes involving the unique ecosystems of coastlines. 
In 2012, UGA acquired the Skidaway Institute of Oceanography (SkIO), the marine science research institute that was founded in 1968, to join the University of Georgia Marine Institute that was founded in 1953. 
The arboretum was established in 1987, with plant development and selection starting in 1991. It consists of stream-side forest and wetland, and is dedicated to native plant species of the Georgia coastal plain. 
The arboretum contains pine woods, a native azalea collection, and approximately 280 taxa of native trees, shrubs, and herbaceous plants. It is one of several institutions active in efforts to conserve the endangered Torreya taxifolia. The arboretum director is John M. Ruter, professor of horticulture at the university's Tifton campus. 
The 56-acre UGA Health Sciences Campus has an extensive landscaped green space with more than 400 trees and many historic buildings. The nearly 63,000 square-feet of building space on the new Health Sciences Campus include large and small classrooms, rooms for small group and clinical skills teaching, lab space for gross anatomy, pathology, histology, etc., a medical library, and faculty offices. The medical program administration is housed in Winnie Davis Hall which was built in 1902. 
The 2013 SEC Academic Symposium, an academic conference-type event intended to address a scholarly issue in an area of strength represented by all SEC universities, was organized and led by the University of Georgia and the UGA Bioenergy Systems Research Institute in Atlanta, Georgia. The topic of the Symposium was titled, the "Impact of the Southeast in the World's Renewable Energy Future." 
In 2007, the Odum School of Ecology became the first-stand alone college or school within a university dedicated to the study of ecology and environmental science. The school was named after UGA professor and ecologist, Eugene Odum, who pioneered the modern study of ecology. 
The university and Athens-Clarke County established a bicycle master plan to improve the mobility of students on campus while remaining environmentally consciousness. 
In 2009 the University of Georgia earned LEED certification from the U.S. Green Building Council with high marks for the expansion of the Tate Student Center. The renovated Tate Student Center became the sixth building on a university campus in the state of Georgia to be certified at the gold level and the second to be so designated in Athens. In 2012, Building 1516, a University housing complex constructed in 2010, became the first LEED-certified housing complex at the University of Georgia. 
In 2012, the College of Environmental Design's Visual Arts Building (now known as the Jackson Street Building) after a $9.9 million renovation became the first UGA building to incorporate a water reclamation system and the first to utilize solar harvesting technology through solar panels. 
In 2013 the university hosted the inaugural SEC Symposium in Atlanta. The topic is the Southeast's impact on the future of renewable energy, and the participants are the 14 universities of the SEC, as supported by its new academic initiative, SECU. 
The Center for Computational Quantum Chemistry (CCQC) is a research center in the department of Chemistry. Professor Henry Schaefer founded the center in 1987. Research at the CCQC employs computational chemistry to elucidate and/or correlate many areas of chemical research. 
Housing at the university is managed by the Department of University Housing. Student on-campus housing is divided into several communities: Brumby, Russell, Creswell, Hill, Myers, Reed, and the East Campus Village. 
The Myers community consists of four buildings in a quad located on South Campus. They are the coed residence halls Myers, Rutherford, and Mary Lyndon, along with Soule Hall which is reserved for female students. The Reed community is made up of four coed residence halls in North and Central Campus: Morris, Payne, Reed, and Building 1516. The East Campus Village consists of the apartment-style coed residences: Busbee, McWhorter, Rooker, and Vandiver. 
The first Greek letter fraternity to charter at the university was Sigma Alpha Epsilon in 1865, and the first sorority was Phi Mu in 1921. There are 17 sororities from the Panhellenic Council, 26 North American Interfraternity Conference fraternities, and 8 National Pan-Hellenic Council fraternities and sororities.  In 2019, 20% of undergraduate men and 31% of undergraduate women were active members in UGA's Greek system. 
In the fall semester of 1997, six women started an Asian interest sorority at UGA, Alpha Sigma Rho, which would become the first in the state of Georgia. 
Executives of the University of Georgia's Student Government Association (SGA) make up the Student Advisory Council, which is composed of Student Government Presidents from every public college or university within the University System of Georgia. The Student Advisory Council is organized to advise the Georgia Board of Regents, through the Chancellor, on issues that are important to students. 
R&B-TV is the photos and videos division of The Red & Black. R&B-TV publishes various videos relating to the University of Georgia and the community at large. 
Launched in 2011, Ampersand Magazine is a UGA monthly publication catered to Athens residents. The magazine is a subsidized by The Red and Black. 
PreMed Magazine is a student organization that aims to help pre-medical students at the University of Georgia achieve success in the medical field. This club is open for students of all majors and concentrations. Topics range from student achievement in medicine and health science to recent innovations in biomedical sciences. 
The university also hosts several non-varsity sports, including wrestling, men's soccer, crew, ultimate frisbee, rugby, lacrosse, ice hockey, and sailing. Georgia's men's lacrosse team has won the South Eastern Lacrosse Conference three times, in 1998, 2007, and 2008, and received an automatic bid to the Men's Collegiate Lacrosse Association national tournament, while the women's team earned an at-large bid to the WDIA National Tournament in 2007. 
The decision to include crimson red is also thought to be a tribute to the state of Georgia and a reminder of the University's flagship status. Kaolinite, commonly referred to as "Georgia red clay" is commonly found throughout the state, especially in the Red Hills Region. The red color that is so evident in Georgia soils is due primarily to iron oxides. 
The University of Georgia is the only major college that buries its mascots within the confines of its stadium.[citation needed] Ugas I, II, III, IV, V, VI, VII and VIII are buried in marble vaults near the main gate in the embankment of the south stands of Sanford Stadium. Epitaphs to the dogs are inscribed in bronze, and before each home game, flowers are placed on their graves. 
The Chapel Bell is a historic monument and long-standing tradition of the University of Georgia. The Chapel Bell is located on the historic North Campus. Built in 1832, when Protestant orthodoxy dominated the campus region, the chapel was a center of campus activities. A daily religious service, which students were required to attend, were held there, as were assemblies and commencements. The bell was also rung to mark the beginning and the end of class. 
January 27, 1785, is the date the University of Georgia became the first public university to have a charter granted. Each year, January 27 is commemorated to honor UGA's place in the history of American colleges and universities. The tradition began in 2002 and is now celebrated as Founders Week. During Founders Week, a series of celebrations are hosted by various campus departments including the Student Alumni Association and the Student Government Association. 
The Emeriti Scholars, a group of retired faculty members especially known for their teaching abilities and continued involvement in the university's academic life, sponsor the Founders Day Lecture. The lecture is held in the UGA Chapel and has become a Founders Day tradition, drawing alumni, students, faculty, esteemed guests and members of the community. 
Although "Glory, Glory" is generally thought to be the school's fight song, the official fight song is "Hail to Georgia". The fight song is played by the Georgia Redcoat Marching Band after touchdowns, field goals, and extra points scored by the football team. The Georgia Redcoat Marching Band is a 375-member marching band. First directed in 1905 by R.E. Haughey, the band has only had seven directors. 
The "Alma Mater", the official school song of the University of Georgia, is set to the tune of "Annie Lisle", a popular 1857 ballad by H. S. Thompson. The lyrics to "Alma Mater", penned by J.B. Wright, Jr., and Gail Carter Dendy, are unique to UGA. The song is sung at commencement and various official events of the University of Georgia. 
Sanford Stadium is the on-campus playing venue for football at the University of Georgia in Athens. The 92,746-seat stadium is the seventh largest stadium in the National Collegiate Athletic Association and has a grass (versus synthetic) field. The stadium is the 8th largest non-racing stadium in the United States and the 14th largest such stadium in the world. The stadium played host to the Olympic medal competition of men's and women's Olympic football (soccer) at the 1996 Summer Olympics. 
The Dawg Walk is a Saturday football tradition and celebration at University of Georgia home games when UGA students and fans line up in the Tate Center parking lot to form a tunnel that greets the players and coaches as they enter Sanford Stadium. The team enters the stadium through Gate 10 at Sanford Stadium to the music of the Redcoat Marching Band. The march is often led by the team's costumed mascot Hairy Dawg. 
The Dawg Walk is preceded by two show section shows. The Redcoat Sousaphones perform a warm up concert in the Tate Center assembly area, while the Redcoat Drumline performs a drumshow in the parking lot. 
A total of nine UGA graduates have received the Pulitzer Prize including Natasha Tretheway, winner of the 2007 Pulitzer Prize in Poetry who was appointed United States Poet Laureate in 2012 and again in 2014. Other notable UGA alumni in print media include Tom Johnson, a former publisher of the Los Angeles Times, Sherrilyn Kenyon, author of over 100 novels and Stuart Woods, a prolific novelist with more than 60 books. 
Wings of the Storm is a 1926 American "dog-hero" drama film directed by John G. Blystone and written by Elizabeth Pickett Chevalier, Gordon Rigby, and Dorothy Yost. Released in November 1926 by Fox Film Corporation, the film showcases Thunder the Marvel Dog with support from costars William Russell, Virginia Brown Faire, and Reed Howes. 
This article related to an American film of the 1920s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Elk River chemical spill occurred on January 9, 2014 when crude 4-Methylcyclohexanemethanol (MCHM) was released from a Freedom Industries facility into the Elk River, a tributary of the Kanawha River, in Charleston in the U.S. state of West Virginia. 
The chemical spill occurred upstream from the principal West Virginia American Water intake and treatment and distribution center. Following the spill, up to 300,000 residents within nine counties in the Charleston, West Virginia metropolitan area were without access to potable water. The areas affected were portions of  Boone, Clay, Jackson, Kanawha, Lincoln, Logan, Putnam, and Roane counties and the Culloden area of Cabell County. 
Crude MCHM is a chemical foam used to wash coal and remove impurities that contribute to pollution during combustion. The "do-not-use" advisory for drinking water from West Virginia American Water's system began to be gradually lifted by West Virginia state officials on January 13 based upon "priority zones." 
On Tuesday, January 14, the company revealed that the tank, which leaked about 7,500 gallons into the ground by the Elk River, had also contained a mixture of glycol ethers known as PPH, with a similar function as MCHM. 
The chemical spill was the third chemical accident to occur in the Kanawha River Valley within the last five years. On June 12, 2014 another spill of containment water occurred at the same site. 
Freedom Industries was founded in 1992 by Melody, and Carl L. Kennedy II. On December 31, 2013, Freedom Industries merged with three other companies, Etowah River Terminal, Poca Blending, and Crete Technologies. Gary Southern became president of Freedom Industries on December 10, 2013 and remained president until April 2014 when Chemstream appointed a reorganization officer. The company distributed chemicals used in coal mining. 
4-Methylcyclohexanemethanol (MCHM), or more appropriately 4-methylcyclohexylmethanol, is an organic compound with the formula CH3C6H10CH2OH. Classified as an alcohol, it exists as two isomers with similar properties. MCHM is a colorless oil with an odor of licorice. 
Crude MCHM is a chemical foaming agent utilized in the processing of coal at coal preparation plants to remove impurities that contribute to pollution during combustion. The chemical washes coal in a process known as "froth flotation," which involves the separation of sand-size particles of coal from the surrounding rock within a tank of water or other solution. MCHM is utilized in about 20 to 25 percent of coal preparation plants in West Virginia. 
MCHM is not used in the majority of West Virginia's coal preparation plants, because it is only used to produce coal for metallurgical purposes, a type of coal known as "coking coal"  and most West Virginia plants process coal that is to be used for the generation of electricity. 
Diesel fuel was originally used for the froth flotation process, but it was replaced by MCHM because of air emissions regulations. 
Glycol ethers are a group of solvents based on alkyl ethers of ethylene glycol commonly used in paints. These solvents typically have a higher boiling point, together with the favorable solvent properties of lower-molecular weight ethers and alcohols.46 
DEP air quality inspector Mike Kolb described the scene as "a Band-Aid approach" and stated further that it was "apparent that this was not an event that had just happened." The DEP and the Kanawha County Fire Department had been able to locate the origin of the leak by tracing the smell. At the time of the leak's discovery by the inspectors, the damaged storage tank contained about 30,000 US gallons (110,000 litres; 25,000 imperial gallons) of MCHM. 
Freedom Industries refused initial media inquiries following the spill. The company's president, Gary Southern gave a ten-minute news conference the next evening, January 10. 
By 1 p.m. on January 10, the sweet-smelling odor was no longer detectable, according to West Virginia National Guard Adjutant, Major General James Hoyer.  On January 11, the chief of DEP's Homeland Security and Emergency Response division, Mike Dorsey, stated that 7,500 US gallons (28,000 litres; 6,200 imperial gallons) of MCHM had spilled into the river, 2,500 US gallons (9,500 litres; 2,100 imperial gallons) more than had previously been estimated. 
On January 13, a Kanawha County Circuit Court judge issued a temporary restraining order to preserve evidence at the Freedom Industries' Charleston facility.  The order also prohibited the company from modifying in any manner "any structure, tank, equipment, material or condition of" its facility, except as necessary to stop and clean up the chemical spill. 
On January 21, Freedom Industries notified West Virginia Department of Environmental Protection that a second chemical, polyglycol ethers (PPH), was in the leaking tank with the MCHM. The department said that the failure to report accurately the type of materials and the quantities is a violation of state law. 
A one-year incident timeline can be found published in the Supporting Information section of a 2014 research paper  
The tank that leaked showed signs that it may have been damaged by water that froze during unusually cold weather. 
On January 9, 2015, Governor Tomblin released a report detailing the state's response to the Freedom Industries chemical leak. The report provides chronological detail of each state agency and commission's role in responding to the state of emergency and includes several questionnaires completed by state workers directly involved in the response. 
Because of the lack of potable water, Charleston cancelled a convention of mayors and city council members from around the state of West Virginia, which had been scheduled to begin on January 13. 
However, according to the Charleston Gazette, a company "whose characteristics are strikingly similar to Freedom Industries," Lexycon LLC, registered as a business with the West Virginia secretary of state about two months after Freedom Industries filed for bankruptcy.  The company is registered at the same addresses and phone numbers as the former Freedom Industries, and is founded by a former Freedom executive. 
On January 14, five days after the chemical spill, leaders in both the West Virginia House of Delegates and the West Virginia Senate began investigating the loopholes that allowed the Freedom Industries facility in Charleston not to report the incident earlier. Senator John Unger, chairman of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on State Water Resources, proposed amending the current State Water Resources Management Plan. 
At the request of Governor Tomblin, DEP Secretary Randy Huffman began examining new methods of regulating similar chemical facilities. DEP is also examining the establishment of an inventory of similar facilities across West Virginia. 
On February 10, the Committee on Transportation and Infrastructure, U.S. House of Representatives, held a field hearing in Charleston to investigate the circumstances behind, and the response to, the chemical spill. 
Dr. Whelton's team then issued new guidance to the affected homeowners on how to conduct a plumbing system flush. 
On January 20, Dr. Whelton, his team, and the WV Clean Water Hub briefed the Governor Tomblin's Director of Communications about citizens not flushing after a press conference at the Capitol building. The number of residents that had not flushed their plumbing systems was unknown to the Governor's office. 
Results of the unfunded research team's efforts have been reported by several news outlets, including CBS Evening News with Scott Pelley, local CBS affiliate WOWK, Charleston Daily Mail, West Virginia Water Crisis Blog, New York Times, Mobile Press-Register, local NBC Affiliate WMPI, and The Huffington Post. Their testing continues and focuses on the public health and plumbing system degradation issues associated with contaminated drinking water. 
On December 16, 2014, the research team's completed paper regarding the residential tap water contamination in West Virginia was published in Environmental Science & Technology. It identifies specific chemicals found in residential homes and quantifies the level of contamination experienced by affected residents. 
This biographical article relating to a Kazakhstani water polo figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The genre is a mostly American phenomenon. The term mumblegore has been used for films mixing the mumblecore and horror genres. 
Mumblecore films are generally produced with a low budget, which has ranged from several thousand to several million dollars as well as low production values. Filming is done in real places, as opposed to studio sets or sound stages. Many of these films are shot digitally, although Bujalski's films have all been shot on film. Soundtracks tend to be limited, or nonexistent. 
Mumblecore films tend to revolve around characters in their twenties and early thirties who are usually single, white, and fairly aimless in both their professional and personal lives. Plots are often concerned with difficulties in romantic relationships, exacerbated by the characters' inability to articulate their own desires. 
Films that have been described as influencing, or at least anticipating, the conventions of mumblecore include Girlfriends (1978), Manhattan (1979), Stranger Than Paradise (1984), Sex, Lies, and Videotape (1989), Slacker (1991), Clerks (1994), Go Fish (1994)  and Before Sunrise (1995). Directors cited as influences include Michelangelo Antonioni, Eric Rohmer, Andrei Tarkovsky, Gus Van Sant and John Cassavetes. 
Reality television, including what one critic called "the spring-break psychodrama of MTV's The Real World", has also been called an influence on mumblecore, as has the 2001 BBC reality-TV-style mockumentary series The Office. 
Another often-cited influence on mumblecore is the profusion of cheaper filmmaking technology starting in the early 2000s, such as the Panasonic AG-DVX100 video camera, and desktop video editing software such as Final Cut Pro. 
Andrew Bujalski has been described as the "Godfather of Mumblecore". His 2002 directorial debut, Funny Ha Ha, is generally considered to be the first mumblecore film. 
Film journalists have also referred to the genre collectively with the terms "bedhead cinema" and "Slackavetes" (a portmanteau derived from the title of Richard Linklater's dialogue-heavy, lo-fi 1990s film Slacker, and the name of independent film director John Cassavetes). 
In 2007, the IFC Center in New York City exhibited a ten-film series of mumblecore films, titled "The New Talkies: Generation D.I.Y." 
In 2011, writers Megan Boyle and Tao Lin released their film titled Mumblecore, which in 2021 was shown in the NPC film festival at Cinema Village in New York City. 
The big-budget films Magic Mike (2012) and its sequel Magic Mike XXL (2015) have been described as having mumblecore elements due to their use of naturalistic dialogue. Some TV series, including the HBO series Girls (2012), Looking (2014) and Togetherness (2015), and the Netflix series Easy (2017) have been called mumblecore-inspired, or, in the words of one critic, "mumbleshows". 
Horror films using mumblecore techniques have resulted in the term "mumblegore." Films that have been described as "mumblegore" include Baghead (2008), The House of the Devil (2009), Entrance (2011), You're Next (2011), V/H/S (2012), The Sacrament (2013), and Creep (2014). Directors associated with mumblegore cinema include Swanberg and Duplass, as well as Adam Wingard, Roxanne Benjamin, Ben Wheatley, the trio Radio Silence, Patrick Brice, Patrick Horvath, and Ti West. 
A review of the independent quasi-documentary Bloody Nose, Empty Pockets, in which actors were served real alcohol and filmed interacting in improvised scenes in a recreated dive bar, noted that "the film may be the first-ever in a new 'stumblecore' genre, a risky fusion of indie-mumblecore and on-camera drunkenness." 
Work began in 1956 on development of a fully tracked armored personnel carrier (APC) to equip the Japan Ground Self-Defense Force, with two prototypes being completed by Komatsu (the SU-I) and by Mitsubishi (the SU-II) in 1957. These two prototypes were evaluated against the American M59. They were followed by a second series of 11 prototypes, including both APCs and carriers for 81-mm and 107-mm mortars, with a third series of four prototypes being completed and tested in 1959. 
Initial production orders were placed in 1959, and the type was standardised in 1960 as the Type 60 Armored Personnel Carrier. About 430 were built. 
The Type 60 was superseded by the Type 73 Armored Personnel Carrier from 1974, but only 225 Type 73s were built, and the Type 60 continued in large scale use until the 2000s. Roles included training, with several Type 60s being modified to visually resemble the Soviet BMD-1 airborne infantry fighting vehicles. 303 Type 60s were listed as in service in 1998, with 33 remaining in service in 2005, but none were listed as in service in 2006. 
It is noteworthy that this year's awards will be replaced by special merit awards and no awards will be given in the categories of screenwriting, editing, music direction and art direction. The film Getawarayo won the most awards with eight including Best Film. 
The brush mouse can be found from northern California to eastern Colorado and western Texas, and south to Baja California and southern Mexico. Fossils of brush mice up to 35,000 years old have been discovered, but none have been definitively identified from outside the current range of the species. 
In southern California, brush mice were captured on leaf mold in an oak hardwood association of coast live oak, white alder (Alnus rhombifolia), whiteflower currant, and sumac (Rhus spp.). They were also trapped under logs and dense vegetation and on wet seepage slopes next to a creek. In coastal California, brush mice were captured primarily under coast live oak, false-willow (Baccharis douglasii), California buckeye, and California bay. 
New Mexico habitats are characterized by rabbitbrush (Chrysothamnus spp.), Apache plume (Fallugia paradoxa), fourwing saltbrush, common hoptree and crispleaf buckwheat (Eriogonum corymbosum) in addition to a pinyon-juniper-mountain-mahogany (Pinus-Juniperus-Cercocarpus spp.) overstory. Texas plant associates include Pinchot juniper (Juniperus pinchotii), algerita (Mahonia trifoliolata), clapweed (Ephedra antisyphilitica), featherplume (Dalea formosa), and prickly-pear (Opuntia spp.). 
Brush mice are nocturnal. Brush mice appear to limit activity during cooler months in the Sierra Nevada of California, although they are not known to hibernate or enter torpor. In southern areas, such as Arizona, Texas, and northern Mexico, brush mice are active year-round. 
Brush mice have a promiscuous mating system. Four of seven litters in a California study were fathered by several males. Males and females did not share nests, and mating pairs did not remain together for long periods of time. 
Few Peromyscus spp. mice live longer than six months in the wild, but individuals may live up to five years in captivity. 
Brush mice are semiarboreal and can be found foraging in shrubs and trees for leaves and fruits. Females were captured more often than males foraging in canyon live oaks (Q. chrysolepis). The individuals with the longest tails appear to spend more time climbing than those with shorter tails. 
Brush mice have been observed caching pinyon pine seeds. This observation suggests the brush mouse may play a role in seed dispersal for some plant species. 
Klein was born in Jerusalem, Israel, to an Ashkenazi Jewish family. She was raised in a right-wing Likud-voting household. Klein was serving as a soldier in the Israel Defense Forces during her participation in the Miss Israel pageant. 
Sivan Klein joined the Miss Israel pageant ("Israel's Beauty Queen") in 2003, in which she won the most-coveted title Israel's Beauty Queen, replacing last year's winner Yamit Har-Noy. She won the rights to represent Israel at the Miss Universe 2003 pageant in Panama. 
Sivan Klein flew to Panama for the Miss Universe 2003 pageant. She was a favourite to make it into the Top 15. However, she did not make the cut. She was 19 years old when she represented Israel in this pageant. 
This biography article about an Asian contestant in a beauty pageant is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Fogasavai'i is a village on the island of Savai'i in Samoa. It is situated on the south coast of the island in the district of Satupa'itea and the electoral district of Salega 2. The population is 354. 
This article about a geographical location in Samoa is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Upon the conviction of former New York State Senator Thomas W. Libous, Fiala announced her candidacy for the vacated senate seat. She launched her campaign for the November 2015 special election in July promising to bring jobs to the Southern Tier. Fiala said, "The one major issue here in the Southern Tier is jobs, good-paying jobs." 
This article about a politician from the state of New York is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Then 30 April 1956 the line via Dromore to Banbridge and Newcastle, County Down was closed under the auspices of the Ulster Transport Authority. 
Glyphoturris quadrata, common name the square glyph-turrid, is a species of small carnivorous sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusk in the family Mangeliidae. 
The subspecies Glyphoturris quadrata rugirima (Dall, 1889) is a synonym of Glyphoturris rugirima (Dall, 1889) 
G. quadrata can be found in Atlantic waters, ranging from the eastern coast of Florida and the Gulf of Mexico, south to Brazil, and also surrounding Bermuda.; in the Gulf of Mexico, the Caribbean Sea and the Lesser Antilles. 
The shell is strongly biangulated on the body whorl. The ribs are distant and conspicuous. The revolving sculpture is fine and close. The color of the shell is whitish or yellowish. The interstices of the ribs often are chestnut-colored. 
Glyphoturris diminuta was previously thought to differ from Glyphoturris quadrata (Reeve, 1845) in the greater strength of the sculpture. The aperture and the columella are white. 
This is a list of accidents and incidents involving the Bristol Freighter, a twin-engined transport aircraft used as both a freighter and airliner as well as a troop transport and car ferry. 
Sixty-eight of the 214 Freighters built were destroyed or damaged beyond economical repair in accidents. At least 45 of these were fatal, resulting in the deaths of at least 385 passengers and crew. 
Horridovalva tenuiella is a moth of the family Gelechiidae. It was described by Sattler in 1967. It is found in Algeria. 
This article on a moth of the subfamily Anomologinae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
A species described in 2009, Maotherium asiaticus, sheds light on the evolution of the mammalian middle ear.  In modern mammals, the Meckel's cartilage appears during development but disappears before adulthood.  In Maotherium asiaticus, that cartilage not only remained, but turned into bone. This event in evolution may be an example of heterochrony, a change in the timing of development. 
The Thunder Machine is a fictional, four wheeled, armored, weaponized vehicle used by the Dreadnoks, a biker gang/mercenary group in the G.I. Joe: A Real American Hero comic books and cartoon series. The Dreadnoks work for Cobra, the primary enemy for G.I. Joe. 
As a toy, it was available for purchase in 1986, complete with the action figure of the Thrasher. It featured belt-fed synchronized "Penetrator" Gatling guns, and had room for a driver, passenger, and eight people standing on the running boards. 
In 1993, it was recast, and released as the "Beast Blaster", as part of the Street Fighter II toy line, also produced by Hasbro at the time. It was also released in Venezuela, in slightly different colors. 
In issue #69, Thrasher, Monkeywrench and Zarana were in it as it was driven out a besieged Cobra base called a Terror Drome situated in the fictional war-torn country of Sierra Gordo. It was driven to a large airfield and abandoned when the Dreadnoks took over a G.I.Joe transport plane. 
In issue #76, Thrasher, his vehicle and other Dreadnoks are captured after a brief firefight with the G.I.Joe team. During the shooting, Thrasher says "I got a brand new Thunder Machine and it ain't even warmed up yet!". 
The Dreadnoks and the Thunder Machine are featured in issue #79. Despite explicit orders to lay low, the Dreadnoks decide to attack a military convoy on the streets of New Jersey. This version was totalled by Cross Country driving the H.A.V.O.C., with the assistance of the K-9 teams Law and Order and Mutt and Junkyard.  
The vehicle stayed with the Dreadnoks over the intervening seven years that Cobra was thought to be inoperative. It is used early on by Zanya, daughter of Zartan, as her personal conveyance. She drives it away from Dreadnok headquarters a short time before it comes under siege by Joe forces. The Machine ends up involved in the fight anyway, it was knocked into the swamp by Wild Bill. 
Later, it is seen being loaded on a supply plane. The Dreadnoks were helping to rescue Cobra Commander from a new army led by Serpentor, who had established themselves on Cobra Island. 
In IDW's continuation of the original Larry Hama storyline, the Thunder Machine is seen being upgraded in an abandoned gas station in the New Jersey Pine Barrens.  Later it is used as an escape vehicle by an assortment of fighters temporarily opposed to Cobra Commander's plans. One of the opposition group is Zartan, who convinced the Dreadnoks to assist.  
The Thunder Machine debuted in the five part mini-series "Arise, Serpentor, Arise". Thrasher uses it to pursue Joe forces in an ultimately successful attempt audition for membership in the Dreadnoks. 
The Thunder Machine is also featured in a puzzle image from Milton Bradley, with art by Dave Dorman. 
The Thunder Machine toy is briefly featured in the fiction novel 6 Sick Hipsters. In the story, the character Paul Achting spent four years collecting G.I. Joe figures to set up a battle scene between the Joes and Cobra. As he imagined the characters in his head, he described the Thunder Machine as "a red and black behemoth that was as postapocalyptic as Mad Max himself". 
The Thunder Machine was pictured in a September 1986 issue of 'Mother Jones' magazine, in an article about the television industry's relation to toys. 
Geographically, this region centres around a fertile plateau, which has been an agricultural region since the Neolithic. It forms a watershed between the Meuse and Scheldt drainage basins. While in modern times "Hesbaye" and "Haspengouw" are geographical terms which are used for example in tourism and agriculture, and do not have the geo-political importance that they had in Late Antiquity or the early Middle Ages. 
In the earliest records, the Germanic element "gau" was not included as part of the name, and the typical Latin spelling is Hasbania. Occasionally the name is in an adjectival form indicating "(of the) Hasbanien(s)" (Hasbaniensis). Later come forms with the "gau" element such as Haspengewe in 966 and Haspengouue in 982, similar to the modern Dutch word for the area, "Haspengouw". 
According to some proposals, the name may once have applied to a much smaller area, for example, the area near Overhespen and Neerhespen, both now in Linter. Toorians has proposed that such place-names might derive from villas owned by Roman era land owners with the Gaulish name Casibennos. 
In the 4th century, the Salian Franks were permitted to settle by the Roman emperor Julian the Apostate, just north of the Hesbaye in Texandria. He met them in Tongeren, the Roman capital of the Civitas Tungrorum, which is today a part of the Dutch-speaking part of the Hesbaye (or Haspengouw). During the following centuries, the southern more-Romanized population sent missionaries north to convert the Franks to Christianity. 
The Franks, for their part, contributed heavily to the Roman military, and according to Gregory of Tours, they established small kingdoms in each of the old Roman civitates. 
The Hesbaye became a particularly important region for the Frankish aristocracy and clergy, straddling the northernmost stretch of the medieval Germanic-Romance language border in Europe. Nobility associated with the area had numerous relations with the major family dynasties of the medieval Franks. 
In the 9th century, there appear to have been several leaders in the Hesbaye. Count Ekkebard was reported to be one of the leaders of the pagus of Hesbaye in 834 who tried to negotiate the release of Emperor Louis the Pious. (Possibly the same person as Count Etkard who was killed, and had two sons captured, at the siege of Toulouse against Pepin II, King of Aquitaine.) 
Traditionally, the 10th-century Count Rudolf, discussed below, is seen as a grandson of Reginar I, and younger brother of Reginar III. 
The Treaty of Meersen of 8 August 870 gave a relatively detailed description of Lotharingian territories, in dividing them between Louis the German, King of East Francia, and his half-brother Charles the Bald, King of the West Franks. 
Vanderkindere proposed a large "northwestern" county of Louvain already existing in 870, stretching as far east as Diest, and all within the original pagus of Hasbania named in the Treaty of Meerssen. Verhelst and Baerten agreed that there probably was such a western county in 870, though not necessarily already named "Louvain", and smaller, not including Diest and Zoutleeuw. 
However, neither Baerten nor Verhelst list it as one of the 4 likely 870 counties, believing it only came into existence after 870. Verhelst argued explicitly that it was a newer creation that split out of the older western county in the 10th century. Baerten (1965a) argued that at least the part around Jodoigne had been part of the central county of Avernas. 
There are only a small number of mentions of a smaller county named after the greater pagus or gau of Hasbania: 
Also, the city of Maastricht, which is at the point where the Geer enters the Meuse, was also referred to sometimes as being in a county of Hasbania. See below. 
The northeastern county in 870, according to Baerten and Verhelst, was the one called "Huste" or "Hufte" in the mid-10th century, when it was under the jurisdiction of a Count Rudolf, who apparently also had jurisdiction over Avernas and at least part of the Maasland or Maasau. 
This county is the apparent predecessor of the later County of Loon, because like that 11th-century county, its jurisdiction apparently united places near both Borgloon and Maaseik, which is in a different pagus, the Masau. 
To support this conclusion, Baerten emphasized that a Sint-Truiden land transaction (now dated between 927 and 964 and probably around 950) distinguished several places in the small area between Sint-Truiden and Borgloon as being in the two different counties: 
Baerten noted that the two groups are close, but separated by the old medieval deanery boundaries of Sint-Truiden and Tongeren, and in the 11th century probably also the boundaries between the counties of Duras and Loon probably ran in a similar way. 
Huste appears to have been a geographical area that included Maaseik on the river Meuse (Dutch: Maas). 
Furthermore, this Count Rudolf is traditionally seen as a grandson of Reginar I, and younger brother of Reginar III who was banished to Bohemia in 958. Vanderkindere, Baerten, and others accept this identification. To support it, they note that like Reginar III, a Rudolf in this area was accused of infidelity to the king: 
This Count Werner thus appears to have been a count of the count of "Huste" or "Hufte". Hlawitschka has identified him as a probable member of the Matfrieder family. He died in 973 with his brother, fighting members of the Reginar family. It is not clear who replaced him in Hasbania, but in Hainaut, where he died, his probable relative Count Godfrey "the captive" took control in subsequent years. 
Another difference between Baerten and Verhelst, as mentioned above, is that the "Brunengeruz" area around Hoegaarden the Great Gete was originally part of the western county according to Verhelst, whereas Baerten felt Jodoigne at least had originally been part of Avernas. 
The only Count clearly named in the Hesbaye after Werner was named Eremfried, whose family connections are unclear. His county included Velm, very close to Sint-Truiden, Kerkom, Muizen and Buvingen, and he appears to have had a close connection to a family in the Ardennes which used the name Rudolf: 
Both names, Eremfridus and Rodulfus, had appeared earlier as witnesses in the grant by Bertha, the mother of Count Arnulf of Valenciennes, of land in Brustem (near Sint-Truiden) to Sint-Truiden Abbey in 967. 
In contrast, Baerten described the hinterland of Maastricht, between it and Tongeren, as part of the "district" of Maastricht, which is separately named in the treaty of 870, and therefore not one of the four counties of Hasbania. 
In 1078, a grant to the bishop was made by a widow named Ermengarde. It included properties at not only the important Loon towns of Borgloon and Kuringen, but also closer to St Truiden, and even to the north, outside the Hesbaye. It has been suggested that in order to explain this she must have been married to Count Arnulf, but had no children with him. 
In Vanderkindere's "southeast", the county of Moha existed between the Meuse and its tributary the Mehaigne. It was an allod that was sometimes referred to as a county because it was under the lordship of the counts of the Etichonid family who were Counts of Eguisheim and Dagsburg. 
Grez-Doiceau, in Wallonia just between Louvain and Wavre, was also the site of a little-known county in the 11th century. Counts Werner of Grez and his brother Henry of Grez are known from several records and accompanied Godfrey of Bouillon to Jerusalem. 
In 1036 and 1078, a County of Dongelberg is referred to. It contained Incourt and its neighbouring hamlet Brombais. Incourt is just south of Dongelberg, which is just south of Jodoigne. As with Steppes, Vanderkindere believed this was never a real county, but an area of jurisdiction under the Bishop, conveniently referred to this way. 
The Kansas City Journal-Post was a newspaper in Kansas City, Missouri, from 1854 to 1942. It was the oldest newspaper in the city when it went out of business. 
It started as a weekly, The Kansas City Enterprise, on September 23, 1854, a year after the city's founding and shortly after The Public Ledger went out of business.  Kansas City's first mayor, William S. Gregory, and future mayors Milton J. Payne and E. Milton McGee, along with city fathers William Gillis, Benoist Troost, Thompson McDaniel, Robert Campbell and Kansas City's first bank and biggest store, Northrup and Chick, pooled $1,000 to start it. 
William A. Strong was its first editor, and David K. Abeel the first publisher.  It operated above a tavern at Main Street and the Missouri River in the River Market neighborhood. 
In 1855, Strong enlisted another future mayor, Robert T. Van Horn, to take over the paper.  Van Horn bought it for $250 and retained Abeel as publisher. 
In 1857 it became The Western Journal of Commerce, and in 1858 it became The Kansas City Daily Western Journal of Commerce. 
Before the American Civil War the paper espoused the popular Missouri view that the status quo should be maintained, that Missouri should remain in the Union and remain a slave state.  When the war began, Van Horn enlisted in the Union Army, and the paper became staunchly Republican. 
The paper encouraged city officials to persuade the Hannibal and St. Joseph Railroad to build the first bridge across the Missouri River at Kansas City. 
In 1880 William Rockhill Nelson started The Kansas City Star, which became The Journal-Post's primary competitor. 
In 1896 Van Horn sold the paper to Charles S. Gleed and Hal Gaylord, who renamed it The Kansas City Journal. 
In 1909 Denver Post publisher Frederick Gilmer Bonfils and Harry Tammen bought The Post, with J. Ogden Armour as a silent partner. The Post, with its tabloid format, red headlines and yellow journalism was linked to the rise of the Tom Pendergast political machine. 
In 1921 Walter Dickey bought The Journal. He bought The Post in 1922 and combined their operations at 22nd and Oak.  Dickey invested in the papers so as to compete with The Star, ultimately bankrupting his own lucrative clay-pipe manufacturing company.  The papers combined as The Kansas City Journal-Post on October 4, 1928. 
The paper's last publication was on March 31, 1942.  It had been the last daily competition to The Star. 
In 2006, the Macoun Marsh team won international recognition in the Volvo Adventure. The Volvo Adventure is an environmental award connected to the United Nations Environmental Program. 
The marsh name honours Canadian naturalist John Macoun, and was chosen by the students of Educarium. 
In 2009, the Macoun Marsh team built connections with international youth groups to create the Second International Youth Symposium for Biodiversity. This event brought youth from Barbados, Canada, Honduras, India, Japan, Mexico, and the United States together to share their biodiversity projects.  This event was held in Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.  They also began work on a Youth Accord (first written in 2005 in Mexico) to present in Japan for the International Year of Biodiversity in 2010. 
James Kent Hamilton was born in Milan, Erie County, Ohio, May 17, 1839. He was the son of Thomas and Sarah O. (Standart) Hamilton. His father was a merchant and shipper, and served as a Whig in the Ohio Senate. James graduated from Milan schools, and from Kenyon College in 1859. He studied law in Mount Vernon, Milan, and Toledo, Ohio, and was admitted to the bar in 1862. He served as a captain in the 113th Ohio Infantry until the end of the American Civil War. 
Hamilton resumed the practice of law in Toledo after the war, and was prosecuting attorney of Lucas County in 1869. He was elected mayor of Toledo in 1887 and 1889, serving four years. 
Hamilton was married October 13, 1876 to Sibyl Williams, who died in 1877. He married July 27, 1898 to Ethel B. Allen. He was a member of the Methodist Episcopal Church. 
With the construction of the Chandil Dam as a part of the Subarnarekha Multpurpose project, the traffic between Chandil and Tiruldih was diverted to a newly constructed line via Haslang & Bakarkudi in 1990 as the older route via Pakridih & Ichhadih became submerged in the dam waters. 
He was born in Ste-Marie de Buctouche, New Brunswick, and educated at St. Joseph's College in Memramcook. He taught school briefly in Sainte-Marie-de-Kent before becoming a general merchant in Buctouche in 1870. In 1872, he married Sophia Baker. Girouard resigned his seat in 1883 to accept the position of customs collector for Richibucto. He died of tuberculosis in Buctouche at the age of 38. 
Death Party is an EP by punk blues group The Gun Club, released in 1983. It is the only official release of the Jim Duckworth and Dee Pop line up of the band which existed for about eight months.  
A scheduled recording session for Tex & the Horseheads, the band Jeffrey Lee Pierce had put together around his girlfriend Linda/Texacala Jones was going to go unused. So the Gun Club filled the booking and recorded the Death Party EP with a bassist called Jimmy Joe Uliana who was a friend of Dee Pop's. Patricia Morrison was the bassist but didn't play on the EP because of the recording session's spur of the moment nature. 
Death Party was produced by Chris Stein, although he came to the sessions after most of the recordings were completed.  
Brodie Matthew Brazil (born April 3, 1981) is an American television broadcaster who has won 13 Regional Emmy Awards and nominated for 32. 
Brazil is the older brother of Darren Brazil, a Bay Area Regional Emmy Award winning editor, producer and videographer.  He is married to Amanda "Blackwell" Brazil. 
Since 2003, Brazil has been nominated 32 times and has won 13 Regional Emmy Awards for his work with KTVU/KICU-TV and NBC Sports Bay Area. 
Shipbroking is a financial service, which forms part of the global shipping industry. Shipbrokers are specialist intermediaries/negotiators (i.e. brokers) between shipowners and charterers who use ships to transport cargo, or between buyers and sellers of vessels. 
Some brokerage firms have developed into large companies, incorporating departments specialising in shipping's various sectors, e.g. Dry Cargo Chartering, Tanker Chartering, Container Chartering, Sale & Purchase, Demolition, Futures and Research; other "boutique" shipbroking firms concentrate on specific sectors of the shipping market. 
The principal shipping and shipbroking centres worldwide are London, New York City, Singapore, and Tokyo, as well as where many shipowners are based such as Oslo and Athens. Other places continue to develop in international shipping services, such as Hong Kong and Shanghai, Delhi and Mumbai, Copenhagen, Geneva, Genoa, Hamburg and Paris in Europe; and in North America, Connecticut, Houston, and Montreal are important shipbroking centres. 
Until the late 20th century, it was commonplace for shipbrokers to cover more than one discipline, although nowadays the vast majority of shipbrokers specialize in a specific sector. Like many financial services, historically shipbroking grew out of the City coffee houses, becoming established at the Baltic Exchange; among its most famous members being Ernest Simpson, ex-husband of The Duchess of Windsor (died 1972), and Alderman the Lord Mountevans. 
The Institute of Chartered Shipbrokers sets educational standards throughout the industry worldwide, whose Fellows are accorded the privilege of using the post-nominal letters FICS. 
Tanker brokers specialize in the chartering of tankers, which requires a different set of skills, knowledge and contacts from dry cargo broking. Tanker brokers may specialize in crude oil, gas, oil products or chemical tankers. Tanker brokers similarly negotiate maritime contracts, known as charter parties. The main terms of negotiation are freight/hire and demurrage. 
Oil being a fast moving trade, freight rates for crude oil tanker charters are most commonly based on the Worldscale Index; the Worldscale Association publishes flat rates annually. 
For some specific voyages, such as named voyages (i.e. from A to B) and for specialist ships, like LNG tankers (a highly specialized sector of the tanker market), freight rates can be agreed on a lumpsum (or dollar per ton) fixed rate between both parties. 
Container brokers specialize in the chartering of container ships and provide container shipowners and charterers with market-related information and opportunities. 
Whilton Locks is the name of a flight of seven locks on the Grand Union Canal near Daventry, in the county of Northamptonshire, England. They are also referred to as Buckby Lock Flight. 
Father Chevalier claimed a Marian apparition and titled it as Our Lady of the Sacred Heart. The image was crowned by Pope Pius IX in 1869 and her sanctuary raised to the status of minor Basilica in 1874. 
Born in Richelieu, France, he was initially apprenticed as a shoemaker at age 12 after he was told his parents could not afford to send him to the seminary.  He was later able to join the seminary, after his father's boss sponsored him and at the age of 30 was sent to the parish of Issoudun. In 1854 he founded the religious institute of the Missionaries of the Sacred Heart, and in 1874 the Daughters of Our Lady of the Sacred Heart. 
Next season she was Sylvia in Cymon, Hermia in Midsummer Night's Dream, Imogen, Cora in Columbus, and on 12 March 1816, the first Lucy Bertram in Daniel Terry's adaptation of Guy Mannering. Among original parts in lesser works in the next season stands out Diana Vernon in Isaac Pocock's Rob Roy Macgregor. She also played Cowslip in the Agreeable Surprise. 
High as was the reputation Stephens made in opera, it was still higher as a concert singer. She sang with John Duruset in Dublin in July 1821 and again in 1825; and in Edinburgh in 1814. She also visited Liverpool and other places. Until her retirement in 1835 she starred at concerts and festivals. 
On 19 April 1838, Stephens married, at 9 Belgrave Square, George Capel-Coningsby, 5th Earl of Essex, an octogenarian widower, who died on 23 April 1839. As Countess of Essex, she survived him forty-three years, taking an interest in theatrical matters. She died of bronchitis on 22 February 1882 in the house in which she was married, and was buried at Kensal Green Cemetery. 
Brantt Robert Myhres (born March 18, 1974) is a Canadian former professional ice hockey winger. He was drafted by the Tampa Bay Lightning in the fifth round, 97th overall in the 1992 NHL Entry Draft. 
Myhres played for the Tampa Bay Lightning, Philadelphia Flyers, San Jose Sharks, Nashville Predators, Washington Capitals, and Boston Bruins. He was suspended four times by the NHL for failing drug tests and was eventually banned from the league for life.  After becoming clean and sober and studying substance abuse behavioral health at Mount Royal University in Calgary, Myhres was hired by the Los Angeles Kings in September 2015 as the team's player assistance director. 
This biographical article relating to a Canadian ice hockey winger born in the 1970s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Bruckmann was the younger son of the publisher Friedrich Bruckmann. After his father's death in 1898 Hugo and his brother Alphons became the owners of F. Bruckmann KAG in Munich. Bruckmann and his wife Elsa Bruckmann were among the early and highly influential promoters of Adolf Hitler, and they helped him with gaining access to, and acceptance within, upper-class circles in Munich. 
After the outbreak of World War II Bruckmann was, because of personal connections, able to have his publishing house declared of special importance for the war effort. After his death in 1941 he was honored with a state funeral. 
KLEO (106.1 FM) is a radio station broadcasting a hot adult contemporary format simulcasting co-owned KKBG from Hilo. Licensed to Kahaluu, Hawaii, United States.  The station is currently owned by Pacific Radio Group, Inc. 
The Romanian Embassy in Washington, D.C. is the main diplomatic mission of Romania to the United States of America.  It is located at 1607 23rd Street, Northwest, Washington, D.C. 20008. 
Both reception rooms on the first floor, although very different, are influenced by French tradition. Two Ionic columns frame the door of the small meeting room on the left, which displays a Louis XV influence. White boiserie has Rococo shell-motif decorations, while over door paintings depict rustic scenes in the manner of Fragonard. 
On the opposite side of the waiting room, the ballroom displays elements of late Louis XV and early Louis XVI style. A handsome crystal Art Nouveau chandelier is reflected by symmetrical mirrors placed on three of the walls. Other focal points of the room are a magnificent Louis-Philippe commode, as well as a white marble fireplace and sculptures by Marcel Guguianu. 
The first occupant of the house was Navy Colonel Robert Means Thompson, an ardent supporter of the Navy League of the United States, who served several years as its president. When he left the house in 1921, Frank Ellis sold it to the Romanian Government represented by the Minister of the Legation, Prince Antoine Bibesco. 
Three Spartans were selected for the 1968 All-Big Ten Conference football teams. Defensive back Al Brenner was selected as a first-team player by both the Associated Press (AP) and the United Press International (UPI).  Tackle Charles Bailey received first-team honors from the AP, and linebacker Rich Saul received second-team honors from both the AP and UPI. 
After defeating Michigan State, the Wolverines were ranked #17 in the weekly AP poll.  It was the first time since early in the 1966 season that Michigan had been ranked. 
Jerome P. "Dee" Richard (born March 27, 1955), is, as of April 2019, one of four Independent members of the Louisiana House of Representatives. A native and resident of Thibodaux, Richard has since 2008 represented District 55, which encompasses Lafourche Parish, Louisiana. 
Richard served two stints as a Democrat on the Lafourche Parish School Board, from 1982 to 1984 and again from 1986 to 1994.[self-published source] In 1998, while still a Democrat, Richard was elected to the at-large seat on the Thibodaux City Council. He polled 2,511 votes (61.1 percent) to defeat another Democrat, Stella Chiasson Lasseigne, who received 1,601 votes (38.9 percent). 
In announcing his campaign for a second term in the House in 2011, Richard cited his chief accomplishments as support for higher educational institutions in Acadiana, protection of the coastal wetlands, and reducing the size of state government. 
"I have maintained my independence and have not been afraid to go against the 'powers-that-be' in state government, especially when it came to voting against the legislative pay raise. I was so dead set against the pay raise that I actually signed an affidavit declining the increase in the event the legislation was eventually signed into law by the governor," said Richard. 
Richard was handily reelected to the state House in the primary election held on October 22, 2011, when he defeated a restaurant/bar owner from Raceland,[citation needed] the Republican Bobby "Beck" Grabert, 8,123 (78 percent) to 2,286 (22 percent). 
Richard is politically conservative and frequently appears on the statewide radio talk show, The Moon Griffon Show, broadcast from Lafayette. 
The Italian Socialists (I Socialisti Italiani) was a minor social-democratic political party in Italy. 
The party was founded on 7 February 2006 as the result of a split from the New Italian Socialist Party (NPSI) by the wing favourable to a political alliance with The Union on the centre-left, and an immediate discontinuance of ties with the centre-right House of Freedoms. The party was originally led by Bobo Craxi, son of the late Bettino Craxi, former leader of the Italian Socialist Party and former Prime Minister of Italy. 
In July 2007, the party decided to merge into the modern-day Italian Socialist Party (PSI), which was launched on 5 October 2007, but, in July 2008, Zavettieri left that party and re-organised The Italian Socialists. In October 2009 also Craxi left the PSI, paving the way for a new party with Zavettieri into which The Italian Socialists were finally merged, the United Socialists. 
Wesley Ryan Harris (born September 22, 1986) is a Democratic member of the North Carolina General Assembly representing the State's 105th House district. 
Harris won the election on November 6,  2018 from the platform of Democratic Party. He secured fifty-two percent of the vote while his closest rival Republican Scott Stone secured forty-eight percent. 
This biographical article relating to an American baseball outfielder born in the 1900s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Walter Vaughan (died 1598), of Golden Grove, Carmarthenshire, was a Member of Parliament for Carmarthenshire in 1572 and 1593, and Mayor of Carmarthen 1574, 1580 and 1597. 
This article about a Member of the Parliament of England (before 1707) representing a Welsh constituency is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Aderus populneus is a species of ant-like leaf beetle in the family Aderidae. Native to the west Palaearctic (very common in England, it has been introduced in North America. Large eyes, pubescent antennae, 1.5-2mm 
The Standard Life Assurance Company of Canada (also known as Standard Life) was an investment, retirement and financial protection company and is now part of Manulife Financial. 
Standard Life first established a presence in Canada through John George Irvine, who took an agency in Quebec in 1834. Spencer Campbell Thomson, son of the manager of the Standard Life Assurance Company, visited Canada in 1882 and approved a new Canadian head office in St James Street. 
 Wangki Lowang a politician from Bharatiya Janata Party party is a Member of the Member of Legislative Assembly representing Namsang in the Arunachal Pradesh Legislative Assembly since 1999. He was member of Indian National Congress until December 2015. He was one of 21 MLA who broke from Indian National Congress to join People's Party of Arunachal. He became Speakers of the Arunachal Pradesh Legislative Assembly of in February 2016. Alo Libang is his deputy. 
In July 2016 he was one of the 30 MLAs of People's Party of Arunachal to defect back to Indian National Congress. 
Note: Anastasia Potapova, who entered late and played in the qualifying tournament, would have been seeded 7th if she had entered the tournament prior to the initial entry cutoff date of 3 June 2019. 
Haloprogesterone, sold under the brand name Prohalone, is a progestin medication which was previously marketed by Ayerst but is now no longer available. 
This article about an association football-related organization is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Open-pit mining began in 1957 and was discontinued in 2001. Since 2009, it has been active as an underground diamond mine. 
The Mir mine was the first developed and the largest diamond mine in the Soviet Union. Its surface operation lasted 44 years, finally closing in June 2001. After the collapse of the USSR, in the 1990s, the mine was operated by the Sakha diamond company, which reported annual profits in excess of $600 million[clarification needed] from diamond sales. 
The mine was recommissioned in 2009, and is expected to remain operational for 50 more years. The underground Mir mine flooded again in 2017, trapping over 140 miners, all but 8 of whom were rescued.  
The research was widely varied, and included projects devoted to new and more accurate bombs, reliable detonators, work on the proximity fuze, guided missiles, radar and early-warning systems, lighter and more accurate hand weapons, more effective medical treatments, more versatile vehicles, and, the most secret of all, the S-1 Section, which later became the Manhattan Project and developed the first atomic weapons. 
From October 1943 to October 1946, OSRD used conscientious objectors from Civilian Public Service as subjects for research of malaria, altitude pressure, life raft rations, high altitude, frostbite, psycho-acoustics, poison gas, ingestion of and exposure to seawater, temperature extremes, climate, physiological hygiene, thiamine, bed rest and aero medicine. 
This article about a location in Dunn County, Wisconsin is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Stefan Corbin Burnett is an American rapper, songwriter, and visual artist, better known under his stage name MC Ride. He is the frontman of experimental hip hop group Death Grips. 
He began his career in the late 1990s, before forming Death Grips with drummer Zach Hill and keyboardist Andy Morin in 2010. While within the group, Ride has garnered attention for his aggressive rapping style and cryptic lyrics. 
Stefan Corbin Burnett hails from Sacramento, California. He studied visual arts at Hampton University in Hampton, Virginia, but dropped out. 
Death Grips' next release, the EP Steroids (Crouching Tiger Hidden Gabber Megamix), a single 22-minute mix of eight separate songs, was released in May 2017. The band's sixth studio album, Year of the Snitch, was released in June 2018. In June 2019, Death Grips released a previously unreleased megamix entitled Gmail and the Restraining Orders for Warp Records' 30th anniversary. 
In a Pitchfork interview, Ride stated that although he has favorite musicians such as Jimi Hendrix, he takes more inspiration from his internal struggles than human achievements. He has a side career as a visual artist. His art consists of dark, monochromatic portraits. His first exhibition took place at Slow Culture in Los Angeles' Chinatown from January 7 to January 28, 2017. 
Contrary to his aggressive rap style, Burnett appears to be soft spoken; in a 2012 interview with Spin, he said, "I'm a very private person, I have very few people that I call my friends. I'm very distrustful of human beings in general; I'm very distrustful of media. I have no interest in sharing my personal life with the world. Zero." He has been described as "reclusive" and "super private" by his bandmate Zach Hill, and is quiet and introverted in interviews. 
David began practising law in 1905, and was a partner in the law firm of Elliott & David. He joined the Liberal party, and was elected to the Legislative Assembly of Quebec in 1916 as the Liberal Party member for the Terrebonne riding, serving until 1936. David directed the Department of Education, and in 1930 he sponsored a controversial bill which would have created a separate Jewish school board in Quebec. 
David created the Prix Athanase-David literary prize in 1922. In 1923 was made a Knight of the Legion of Honour by the government of France; he was made an Officer in 1925 and a Commander in 1934.[citation needed] 
A sports fan, David was president of the Montreal Canadiens ice hockey club from 1930 to 1935. The club won three Stanley Cups during his tenure in 1924, 1930, and 1931. In 1928 he partnered with Montreal stockbroker Ernest Savard and American baseball executive George Stallings to revive the Montreal Royals baseball franchise as part of the International League and to build Delorimier Stadium.[citation needed] 
David resigned from the provincial government in February 1940 to accept an appointment as Senator in the Parliament of Canada where he served until his death in 1953. 
David was married to Antonia Nantel (known as Madame Athanase David), who was an arts administrator and patron in Montreal. He helped her in establishing the Montreal Symphony Orchestra in 1934 and the Montreal Festivals in 1936. Their son, Paul David, was a cardiologist and later Canadian senator. 
Panayiota Grivastopoulos (born March 18, 1943 in Paris, France) is a French-Greek soap opera actress. 
She is best known for her roles on the now defunct long running Greek soap operas, Kalimera Zoi, and Lampsi on the ANT1 network, she will also temporarily join the cast of Erotas later this[which?] year, which coincidentally her daughter Vera Kondos guest stars in. It was confirmed that she will be playing a villain. She suffers from osteoporosis and osteo-arthritis. In 2006 she discovered that her year of birth had been miscounted, instead of being born in 1942 she was in fact born in 1943. 
Cyrtochites is a genus of taxonomically-problematic tooth-shaped small shelly fossil reconstructed as the jaw of a predatory organism. 
In 1066 the Lord of Somerville, Sir Gaultier / Walter de Somerville joined William the conqueror on his invasion of England, for his support Sir Gaultier de Somerville was given land in the North of England. By the twelfth century, the Somervilles were granted land and title of lord in Scotland and were at one time among the noble families of Scotland. Alternatively, Somerville can also be a Scottish[citation needed]clan surname. 
Tim Kidd OBE is the UK Chief Commissioner for The Scout Association. As the Chief Commissioner he is the top administrative volunteer of The Scout Association. The UK Chief Commissioner acts as the association's Deputy Chief Scout and appoints a team of chief commissioners and UK Commissioners who are responsible for programmes in their respective fields. 
Kidd's first involvement in Scouting was as a Cub. He has served in numerous leadership roles including Scout Leader, Assistant County Commissioner (Scouts), District Commissioner and County Commissioner. Prior to his current position Kidd was UK Commissioner for Adult Support for four years. Kidd replaced Wayne Bulpitt to become the UK Chief Commissioner in August 2016, serving until the appointment of Carl Hankinson in September 2021. 
Kidd was appointed Officer of the Order of the British Empire (OBE) in the 2016 Birthday Honours for services to young people through the Scout Movement. 
Peacock was born in Barrie, Ontario. She studied at the University of Western Ontario, receiving her BFA in 1978, and went on to the University of California in San Diego for her MFA in 1981. Peacock lives in Halifax, Nova Scotia, where she teaches at NSCAD University. 
Peacock's work is found in international public and private collections, including the National Gallery of Canada, the Museum of Modern Art in New York, and Museum Ludwig in Cologne. 
She has won awards at the Atlantic Film & Video Festival (Best Experimental, 1990) the Chicago International Film & Video Festival (1992), and the Atlanta Film & Video Festival (1997). She is a recipient of the Bell Canada Award and the Canada Council Medal for her contribution to the field of video. Peacock received a Governor General's Award in Visual and Media Arts in 2012. 
She married first to Alula of Yejju (sometime governor of Damot and then of Gojjam), with whom she had a son, Ras Ali II of Yejju around the year 1819. After the death of her first spouse, she married the future emperor Yohannes III.  
On a meeting of the chief nobles of the Yejju at the dynastic capital of Debre Tabor, after the death of Ras Dori on July 1831, Dori's cousin, Menens son Ali was appointed Ruler of Begemder and Imperial Regent at the age of 12. As his father Alula was dead by this time and Ali was a minor, a council of regents was appointed from the nobles of that people. However, Menen soon came to control this council and exerted much influence over political decisions for the next decade. 
Following the death of Ras Kinfu, people fought for control of his lands in Gojjam. Eventually Menen gained the upper hand in the Battle of Chenti Ber (October, 1839), defeating and capturing Kinfu's relative Walda Tekle. Not long afterwards, she deposed Sahle Dengel on 29 August 1840 in favor of her husband Yohannes. However, Yohannes offended her son Ras Ali by favoring his rival Wube Haile Maryam, and Ras Ali restored Sahle Dengel in October 1841.  
On her part, in order to have influence over Kassa Menen offered her granddaughter Tewabech Ali as a bride to him. Nevertheless, Kassa came to love her and was faithful to her until her death in 1858. Menan also awarded Kassa all of Ye Meru Qemas for the same reasons. 
"Black Swan" received general praise from music critics for its "honest and raw" lyrics and dark production, with comparisons being drawn to the band's 2018 single, "Fake Love". Commercially, the former debuted at number seven on South Korea's Gaon Digital Chart and at number one on the US Billboard World Digital Song Sales chart. The song debuted at number 46 on the UK Singles Chart and number 57 on the US Billboard Hot 100, in addition to entering record charts in several other territories. 
The song achieved substantial popularity, earning the Melon Popularity Award for five consecutive weeks. 
Phytomyza stolonigena is a leaf mining fly in the family Agromyzidae, whose larvae burrow into leaves of Ranunculus. The larvae of the fly make characteristic mines in Ranunculus leaves; they mine in the petiole, making single corridors that fan out into the leaf blade. 
Joy Marini is an American executive who is currently the philanthropic director of Johnson & Johnson's international philanthropy for maternal and infant health, violence against women, and gender inequality. 
Marini has a background as a physician's assistant (PA-C), having earned her MS Physician Assistant degree from the University of Medicine and Dentistry of New Jersey in 1997. She received an Master of Business Administration degree from Rider University in international marketing, and Bachelor of Science from Western Kentucky University in animal science and agriculture. 
Marini became the Director of Corporate Contributions at Johnson & Johnson in 2007, having spent 6 years prior working with the Johnson & Johnson Pediatric Institute. 
Johnson & Johnson worked to develop an ebola vaccine to address the 2014 ebola outbreak, and also cooperated with the government of Sierra Leone, UNICEF, and the Liverpool School of Tropical Medicine to improve the health system there, focusing on the local health workforce. 
Marini has also advocated for empowering midwives, noting gender equity problems and the extreme gender pay gap for women in health, who often cannot go on strike to protest due to their essential work. Johnson & Johnson and the International Confederation of Midwives support leadership programs that help train and empower midwives. 
Under her leadership Johnson & Johnson pledged its support in 2016 for the UN Population Fund Safe Birth Even Here campaign to reduce maternal mortality in crisis settings as part of humanitarian responses. In support of the UN Sustainable Development Goal for universal health coverage, she advocated at a 23 September 2019 meeting of global health leaders, where the role of midwives and nurses was a key theme, Marini advocated for inclusivity and technological responsiveness to local needs. 
She has served on the board of GBCHealth since 2015, a business coalition for private activity and investment in global health issues. 
This biographical article related to medicine in the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
"Dancing Like A Gun" is the title of a John Foxx song, released as a single in October 1981, taken from The Garden album released a month previously. 
It was the first John Foxx solo single not to make the Top 75 singles chart in the UK. Smash Hits declared that "despite his recent success Foxxy (sic.) hasn't lived up to his early promise. This has all the ingredients - the pips and the peel - but without the juice". 
"Swimmer 1" and "Swimmer 2" produced by John Foxx engineered by Jo Dvorniak. Recorded at Moody Studios. 
The 2008 issue also features the tracks "Swimmer III" and "Swimmer IV" previously released on the Meridians C60 cassette compilations on the Touch label in 1983. "Swimmer III" was featured on issue 2 under the name of "The Quiet Man 3" and "Swimmer IV" on issue 1 under the name of "The Quiet Man 4". 
"Swimmer II" is the opening track to the 2013 John Foxx compilation album Metadelic, and was also performed live by Foxx and Louis Gordon in 2007 as documented on the Neuro Video live album (2008). 
Anthony Norris (born June 6, 1963) is an American retired professional wrestler and football player. He is best known for his appearances with the professional wrestling promotion World Wrestling Federation (WWF) from 1995 to 1998, under the ring name Ahmed Johnson. In the WWF, he held the WWF Intercontinental Championship, making him the first African American to win a singles championship in the WWF. He also headlined the In Your House 9: International Incident pay-per-view event. 
Norris was born in Lake Alfred, Florida, on June 6, 1963. While attending high school, he performed well at American football, basketball, amateur wrestling, and track and field. 
Norris trained as a professional wrestler under Skandor Akbar, Scott Casey and Ivan Putski. After making his debut in 1989, he competed on the independent circuit for the next few years before debuting in the Global Wrestling Federation (GWF) in 1993 as Moadib. In 1995 he worked for NWA Dallas, feuding with John Hawk for the NWA North American Heavyweight Championship. He also toured Japan that year with Big Japan Pro Wrestling. 
In June 1997, Johnson turned on WWF Champion The Undertaker and joined the New Nation, with Kama Mustafa, D'Lo Brown, and Faarooq. Johnson was injured soon after this; he was scheduled to face Undertaker at Canadian Stampede for the WWF Title, but was plagued by injuries and was replaced by Vader. 
The Nation turned on him after he recovered and returned in August 1997, which resulted in Johnson turning face once more. He restarted his feud with the Nation, and would reunite with the Legion of Doom as well as join forces with Ken Shamrock during the feud. At Survivor Series 1997, they defeated the Nation in a Survivor Series match. 
Norris stayed away from wrestling after his release from WCW until he wrestled his return match for Arlington, Texas, based Professional Championship Wrestling in 2002 against Jared Steele. He wrestled his final match in 2003 in a tag team match for Maximum Pro Wrestling, teaming with Monty Brown in a losing effort against Sabu and Gangrel. 
Since retiring, Norris began working for Booker T and Stevie Ray's Pro Wrestling Alliance wrestling school. 
Norris grew up in Florida before taking up residence in Houston, Texas, with his daughter Nina. He endured a harsh childhood, where his father abused his mother regularly and abused him as well if he intervened, he states. 
Norris briefly attended the University of Tennessee and left soon after to play for the Dallas Cowboys. According to Norris, he joined the United States Army but was later discharged due to striking his captain over viewing his orders as "kind of cowardly." 
In July 2016, Norris was named part of a class action lawsuit filed against WWE which alleged that wrestlers incurred traumatic brain injuries during their tenure and that the company concealed the risks of injury. The suit was litigated by attorney Konstantine Kyros, who has been involved in a number of other lawsuits against WWE. US District Judge Vanessa Lynne Bryant dismissed the lawsuit in September 2018. 
Maron was born in Greensboro, North Carolina and grew up in central Johnston County; she had also lived in Italy. She and her husband, artist Joe Maron, lived in Brooklyn before returning to her home state in 1972. Maron died of complications from a stroke. 
Maron was the author of numerous short stories and more than 20 mystery novels to date.[as of?] One series of novels features Sigrid Harald, a loner lieutenant in the NYPD whose policeman father was killed in the line of duty when she was a toddler (The Right Jack: a Sigrid Harald Mystery). Another series follows the adventures of Judge Deborah Knott, attorney and daughter of an infamous North Carolina bootlegger. 
Her works have been translated into a dozen languages and are on the reading lists of many courses in contemporary Southern literature, as well as Crime and Mystery literature courses. 
Maron was a founding member and past president of Sisters in Crime and of the American Crime Writers' League, and a director on the national board for Mystery Writers of America. She was a keynote speaker at the Great Manhattan Mystery Conclave in 2004. 
Maron received a number of awards for her work from the various awarding bodies of the mystery fiction genre. 
Her first novel to receive recognition was Corpus Christmas, which was nominated for the 1989 Agatha Award and the 1990 Anthony Award in the "Best Novel" category. Her first short story to be met with critical acclaim was "Deborah's Judgment", which won the 1991 Agatha Award and was also nominated for the Anthony Award and the Macavity Award the following year for "Best Short-story". 
Her novel Bootlegger's Daughter was very well received, winning the 1992 Agatha and the Anthony, Edgar and Macavity awards for "Best Novel" the following year. Additionally in 1993, Marons short story "...That Married Dear Old Dad" was nominated for the "Best Short-story" Agatha and her novel Southern Discomfort was nominated for the "Best Novel" Agatha award. Southern Discomfort was again honoured the following year, picking up a nomination at the 1994 Anthony Awards, again for "Best Novel". 
Last Lessons of Summer  was nominated for an Agatha Award in 2003; High Country Fall was nominated for an Agatha Award in 2004 and also picked up a Macavity nomination the following year, the same year in which her novel Rituals of the Season picked up yet another Agatha nomination. Hard Row also received an Agatha Award nomination, this time in 2007. Three-Day Town won the 2011 Agatha Award for "Best Novel". 
Maron received an honorary doctorate from and gave the commencement address to the University of North Carolina at Greensboro in May 2010, where she was a student for two years. In 2016, she was inducted into the North Carolina Literary Hall of Fame. 
Woodhull is a town in Steuben County, New York, United States.  The population was 1,524 at the 2000 census. 
The first settlers arrived circa 1804. Among the first settlers were Caleb Smith, who built the town's first three houses. The town was formed from the Towns of Troupsburg and Addison in 1828.  In 1856, part of Woodhull was taken for the Town of Rathbone. 
There were 550 households, out of which 34.2% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 57.3% were married couples living together, 9.3% had a female householder with no husband present, and 25.6% were non-families. 20.0% of all households were made up of individuals, and 9.8% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older.  The average household size was 2.77 and the average family size was 3.15. 
In the town, the population was spread out, with 28.2% under the age of 18, 8.6% from 18 to 24, 28.0% from 25 to 44, 24.0% from 45 to 64, and 11.2% who were 65 years of age or older.  The median age was 35 years. For every 100 females, there were 100.0 males.  For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 96.8 males. 
The median income for a household in the town was $32,032, and the median income for a family was $34,583. Males had a median income of $27,228 versus $22,150 for females. The per capita income for the town was $13,674.  About 12.7% of families and 16.3% of the population were below the poverty line, including 13.8% of those under age 18 and 18.3% of those age 65 or over. 
Pierre Salvi (born 8 April 1948) is a French cross-country skier. He competed in the men's 30 kilometre event at the 1976 Winter Olympics. 
This biographical article relating to French cross-country skiing is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
10 is the tenth album by Turkish singer Tarkan. It was released on 15 June 2017 by HITT Production and distributed by DMC. 
Jeffrey Lee Eppinger (born ca 1960) is an American computer scientist, entrepreneur and Professor of the Practice at the Carnegie Mellon University, School of Computer Science, Institute for Software Research. 
Eppinger was a student at Carnegie Mellon University where he earned a Bachelor of Science in 1982, a Master of Science in 1987, and a PhD in Computer Science in 1988. His advisors were Alfred Spector and Richard Rashid. 
At Carnegie Mellon, Eppinger's dissertation demonstrated the integration of the Mach Operating System's virtual memory with the Camelot Transaction System.  This recoverable virtual memory concept was subsequently used to implement the Coda File System. 
In 1983, Eppinger won the George E. Forsythe Award for his research in binary search trees. Eppinger had made empirical studies of their behaviour under random deletions and insertions. 
Miriam Nash is a Scottish poet, performer and arts facilitator. She has published a pamphlet, Small Change (2015) and a full-length poetry collection, All the Prayers in the House, (2017). She received an Eric Gregory Award in 2015, was shortlisted for the Edwin Morgan poetry award in  2016, and won the Somerset Maugham Award in 2018. 
Miriam Nash was born in Inverness, Scotland in 1985. She grew up in Scotland, and England and Wales. She won a Fulbright Scholarship to study poetry at Sarah Lawrence College in New York, where she obtained an MFA in 2014. 
Nash's pamphlet Small Change was published by Flipped eye publishing in 2013. In 2016, she was Writer-in-residence at Greenway, the holiday home of Agatha Christie.  In 2017, her first full-length collection, All the Prayers in the House,, was published by Bloodaxe. As a poet and arts facilitator, Nash has worked with schools, museums, mental health organisations and prisons in the UK, USA and Singapore. 
Nash currently lives and works in London where she teaches creative writing at the Ministry of Stories. 
Nash received an Eric Gregory Award in 2015 and was nominated for the Edwin Morgan Poetry Award in 2016, for her pamphlet Small Change.  Nash was winner of the Somerset Maugham Award in 2018 for her poetry collection, All the Prayers in the House. 
Mecidea is a genus of narrow stink bugs in the family Pentatomidae. There are about eight described species in Mecidea. 
Paul Clayton Newell (born 23 February 1969) is an English former professional footballer who played as a goalkeeper. 
Pendidikan Stadium is a multi-use stadium in Wamena, Indonesia.  It is currently used mostly for football matches and is used as the home stadium for Persiwa Wamena.  The stadium has a capacity of 15,000 people. 
A Machakos County Assembly is the forum through which the people of Machakos participate in the making of laws, formulation of policies for taxation, budgeting, and the establishment of the Machakos County public service. 
Through the same forum, the people maintain surveillance and oversight on how they are governed; while the Machakos County Executive gives an account of its operations in governing the Machakos County. 
A Machakos County Assembly is composed of both elected and nominated Members. The process for the election and nomination, including how the stakeholders participate are set out in the 2010 Constitution of Kenya and statutes - County Governments Act, 2012, Political Parties Act, 2010 and Independent Electoral and Boundaries Commission Act, 2011. 
a)Members elected by the registered voters of the Wards, each Ward constituting a single member Constituency, on the same day as a general election of Members of Parliament, being the second Tuesday in August, in every fifth year. 
b)The number of Special Seat Members necessary to ensure that no more than two-thirds of the Membership of the Assembly are of the same gender 
c)The number of Members of Marginalised Groups, including Persons with Disabilities and the Youth, prescribed by an Act of Parliament; and 
The Members contemplated in clause (b) and (c) above shall, in each case, be nominated by Political Parties in proportion to the seats received in that, election in that county by each Political Party under paragraph (a) in accordance with Article 90. 
The filling of Special Seats under clause (b) shall be determined after declaration of elected Members from each Ward. 
Machakos  County Assembly exercises and executes the mandate, role and function by the sovereign power to participate in governance, delegated to them under Section 1 (2), (3) and (4) of Constitution of Kenya 2010. 
On the basis of the current philosophies and practices of governance and from Constitution of Kenya 2010 and pertinent statutes, the mandate, role and function of the County Assemblies in Kenya are: 
i)They are the home of and executer of the legislative authority of a County by making and unmaking laws to facilitate the due execution of the powers and functions of a County Government under existing statute 
ii)They exercise oversight over all  issues and  matters of governance, especially, the operation of the County Executive Committee and all organs of the County Executive 
(a) All development plans, programmes, policies and budget of a County Government; as set out in Sections 207,   220 (2), 201 and 203 of CK 2010 and Part !V of the Public Finance Management Act, 2012 
(b) Vetting all nominees for appointment as County Secretary and Chief Officers of the County Public Service 
(c)The borrowing by a County Government in accordance with provisions of Section 212 of Constitution of Kenya  2010 
(d)Appointment of a Clerk of a County Assembly (CCA) on recommendation of the County Assembly Service Board (CASB). 
iv)They represent the electorate of a County in the governance, including providing leadership in deliberation on all matters of concern and interest 
v)However, Members of a County Assembly, do not get directly involved in the Executive or functions of a County Government or in the delivery of services meant to be done by the County Public Service 
Speaker of Machakos County Assembly   an ex-officio member of Machakos County Assembly in Kenya. The Current speaker of Machakos Assembly is Hon. Florence Mwangangi. 
The inaugural holder of the office was Bernard Mung'ata who was elected into office on 26 March 2013  
Rail transport in Staffordshire has a long history. Stafford itself is a major "crossroads" on the West Coast Main Line, handling passenger and freight services between London and Scotland along with traffic travelling between Manchester and Birmingham. Stoke-on-Trent was once a major railway centre, especially for traffic associated with the coal mining and pottery industries, but in recent years this traffic has almost completely disappeared. 
Staffordshire's railways were considerably reduced by the Beeching cuts in the 1960s. The famous Loop Line along with several other routes were closed, while several  stations, such as Uttoxeter, only narrowly missed closure. A considerable number of coal mines retained their railway connections, but with the decline of the industry, very few survive. 
Barlaston, Norton Bridge and Wedgwood last saw rail services in 2003. Etruria, no longer used by local workers, closed in 2005. 
Martlets Hospice is a hospice in Hove, England, established in 1997. It is a registered charity (no. 802145). The hospice provides end-of-life care to people in the Brighton and Hove area. 
The hospice is named after the mythical Sussex bird, a Martlet, which also appears in the Sussex crest. 
Martlets Hospice opened in 1997, following the merger of three separate charities. These were: Tarner, which opened in 1935; Coppercliff, which opened in 1967; and the MacMillan Day Hospice. 
The hospice provides care in the hospice building, which has 18 beds and in peoples' homes in Brighton and Hove and surrounding areas including Newhaven and Peacehaven.  Care is provided free for adults aged over the age of 18 who have terminal illnesses including cancer, motor neurone disease, parkinsons and alzheimers. 
The hospice is not part of the National Health Service, although reports that just under one third of its funding comes from the NHS. Patients need to be referred to the hospice by a health professional. 
They have seven charity shops throughout the Brighton and Hove area and own Martlets Care, a paid-for care agency. 
The hospice Patron is HM Lord Lieutenant Peter Field. Ambassadors for the charity include Carol Harrison, Fatboy Slim and Peter James. 
The current Chair of Trustees is Juliet Smith, a former magistrate. She has been the Chairwoman since 2016. 
Other notable supporters include TV Vet Marc Abraham, who campaigned for Lucy's Law in the United Kingdom. 
British glovemaker Corneila James died in the hospice in 1999, her son is the crime author Peter James, who remains as a patron and supporter of the charity today. 
33rd U-boat Flotilla ("33. Unterseebootsflottille") was a front-line unit of Nazi Germany's Kriegsmarine during World War II. 
The flotilla included U-boats that had been based at the French submarine bases captured by the Allied advance during the Normandy Campaign, as well as U-boats operating in the Indian Ocean (the Monsun Gruppe). The flotilla was disbanded in May 1945 after the German surrender. 
The Cray XC50 is a massively parallel multiprocessor supercomputer manufactured by Cray. The machine can support Intel Xeon processors, as well as  Cavium ThunderX2 processors, Xeon Phi processors and NVIDIA Tesla P100 GPUs. The processors are connected by Cray's proprietary "Aries" interconnect, in a dragonfly network topology. The XC50 is an evolution of the XC40, with the main difference being the support of Tesla P100 processors and the use of Cray software release CLE 6 or 7. 
In 1995 the municipality was merged with the other, neighboring municipalities Amlikon, Griesenberg and Strohwilen to form a new and larger municipality Amlikon-Bissegg. 
Much of the village was owned by the Abbey of St. Gallen.  During the High Middle Ages it was under the influence of the Baron of Bussnang.  Between the mid-13th Century to 1798, it was under the court of the Griesenberg family, which was a side branch of the Bussnang family.  It was always part of the parish of Bussnang, until in 1857 Bissegg and Junkholz became part of the Reformed parish of Leutmerken. 
The local economy was based on grain cultivation, and some vineyards until the 19th Century when it transitioned to cattle and dairy farming.  Starting about 1870 milk from the village went to Holzhof village in the municipality of Griesenberg.  Finally, in 1905, a cheesemaker opened in Bissegg. 
Bassett Senior High School is the only comprehensive high school for the Bassett Unified School District and is located at 755 N Ardilla Ave, La Puente, California 91746. The school mascot is The Olympian, a Greek god. The school colors are Black and Gold.  The school coat of arms features three interlocked Olympic rings with the profile of an Olympian and feathers. The campus opened in 1965 and celebrated 50 years in 2015. The principal is Hector Vasquez. 
Bassett has many clubs from Drama, Band, Choir, Color Guard, Ecology, Spanish, French, H.O.S.A., Interact, AVID, Renaissance and Academic Decathlon and many more. There is a chapter of the National Honor Society (NHS) at Bassett High. 
The official results of the Women's Pole Vault at the 2000 Summer Olympics in Sydney, Australia, held on Monday 25 September 2000. There were a total number of 30 participating athletes in this event, which made its Olympic debut. The qualifying round was held on Saturday 23 September 2000, with the qualifying height set at 4.35 metres. 
While the pole vault had been a standard Olympic event for a century, dating back to the first revival in 1896, this was the first time the event had been held for women. 
Prior to the competition[update], the existing World record was as follows. As this was a new event in the Olympics, no previous Olympic record existed. 
This biographical article related to association football in Hungary, about a defender, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Villa Colloredo Mels is a suburban palace located on Via Gregorio XII, on the western edge of the urban center of Recanati, province of Macerata, Marche, Italy. It presently houses the civic archeologic and art museum of the town.  
The villa was present prior to the 16th century, and was rebuilt in its present form in the 18th century. The staircase was built in the 16th century. The rooms were frescoed in the 18th century. 
In the mid-18th century the palace was the property of the aristocratic Colloredo Mels family, a prominent family which included Filippo di Colloredo-Mels as one of its members. The Colloredo, who originated from Friuli Venezia Giulia, married the Countess Delia Maria Silvestri of Cingoli. Their son Fabio, born in 1705, married the Countess Teresa Flamini-Antici thus inheriting the original villa. 
The last member of the Colloredo family owning the property was the former-count Rudolf Colloredo who died in 1961. The villa was acquired by the commune, and restorations were begun. The museum was opened in 1998. 
The archeologic section has findings from Neolithic and pre-Roman cultures, such as the Picena culture of the 9th century BC. Historical collections include objects from Roman through Renaissance period. 
The painting gallery has works from the 14th through the 20th century: including works by Giacomo di Nicola da Recanati, Olivuccio di Ciccarello, Felice Damiani da Gubbio, Ludovico da Siena, Vincenzo Pagani, Lorenzo Lotto, Pomarancio, Pier Simone Fanelli,  and Biagio Biagetti. The museum has ceramics by Rodolfo Ceccaroni. 
Among the highlights of the collections are master works by Lorenzo Lotto such as the Recanati Polyptych (1508) originally from the church of San Domenico, the Recanati Annunciation, a San Giacomo Maggiore, and a Transfiguration. 
The men's pole vault event at the 1996 World Junior Championships in Athletics was held in Sydney, Australia, at International Athletic Centre on 23 and 25 August. 
After the fall of Tula Xicocotitlan, a large desert region was populated by the Otomi people and Nahua people, in this way making a new kingdom (1220-1395) from Tecpanecapan. They were later defeated by the tepanecs from Azcapotzalco. With the collapse of Xaltocan (old city-state inside Lake of Texcoco), the Otomies in 1395, escaped to the north by the attacks. Otomi people from Xaltocan occupied other lands as Teotlalpan, a land after the Lake Zumpango. 
The annals actually show that the Mexicas had little interest in the area, in times of tepaneca dominion when Chimalpopoca ruled, was conquered Tequixquiac (1413) and its surroundings, later during the expansion of tenochca dominion, Moteuczoma Ilhuicamina submits Axocopan, Atotonilco and Xilotepec, however the consolidation of northern occurred until 1488 in the days of Ahuitzotl by the need for greater supply of materials for the great metropolis of Tenochtitlan. 
The viceregal government justified this by religious orders means in Teotlalpan region, Franciscans and Augustinians was a evangelizers of indigenous people of The Teotlalpan; this land was very necessary the easy evangelization for the religious conquest from Huaxtec Region. This lands was scorned by tenochcas, with the delivery of encomiendas, the region was destined to be populated by Spaniards and to maintain a cattle activities. 
This territory was known by Chichimeca-Nahuas as strange land, dangerous and arid planes or deserts, was administrated by Kingdom of Acolhuacan. The fields are irrigated along the Tula River, the edges of the rivers were used for irrigation and husbandry, the region is characterized by green river valleys and very dry hills. 
This demarcation was diluted in three decades after the Conquest of Mexico and it turned in the Colonial divisions. No one Indigenous document draw the demarcation of a region or province called Teotlalpan, just as there is no record of armed uprisings of the peoples from north of the central lakes, its population either by trade agreement or quick submission, they produced huge amounts of quicklime and textile fibers since Teotihuacan times. 
We should understand that the north was not important or priority for the Mexica state, hence the late consolidation; it wasn't also a threat because the people in the region did not form a unit or were part of some sort of confederation, another important factor is that the otomi people had maintained its independence through trade agreements and being allies of central power as well. 
In the United States community archaeology can broadly be separated into three distinct types: projects that collaborate with indigenous peoples, projects that collaborate with other local and descendant communities, and outreach specifically for public education. 
As a form of public outreach and collaboration, many archaeology projects in the United States have taken steps to present their work in schools and to children.  These projects vary from a "one time" presentation to local schools, to long-term commitments in which public education is an intricate part of the research design. 
In a reduced sense, communities are aggregations of people that "are seldom, if ever, monocultural and are never of one mind." "For understanding the goals of community archaeology projects it is helpful to classify these communities into three broad and overlapping types.  That is local communities, local descent communities, and non-local descent communities or diasporas." 
Another method in community archaeology for the sharing and distribution of archaeological knowledge is the publication or presentation of materials specifically for the community.  This includes books, pamphlets, children's stories, school-oriented workbooks, comic books, websites, public lectures, radio programs, television shows and news coverage, dramatic reenactments, artistic and literary creations, open access publications, and other forms. 
Participatory action research is another method archaeologists have used in community archaeology projects. 
Some community archaeologists have had difficulty sticking to their original commitments to the community. 
Dumba Festival is an annual festival celebrated by the chiefs and people of Wa of the Wala Paramouncy in the Upper West Region of Ghana. It is usually celebrated in the month of September or October. 
During the festival, visitors are welcomed to share food and drinks. The people put on traditional clothes and there is durbar of chiefs. There is also dancing and drumming. 
In 2017, the second-generation Note was replaced by the French-built K14 Micra for the European market. The Versa Note was discontinued in North America in 2019 due to the decreasing demand for subcompact hatchbacks in the region. It continued to be produced and sold in Japan up to the introduction of the third-generation Note. 
The Note was introduced with a series hybrid drivetrain in late 2016 as the Note e-Power. Due to its popularity and the push of electrification, the third-generation Note is only available with the e-Power drivetrain. 
The Note was introduced as a concept car called the Tone Concept. It was a five-door hatchback with Intelligent Key with proximity sensors, arched roof line, double-deck four-slot grille, 17 inch alloy wheels, and brushed aluminium display panel with satellite navigation screen and climate control system. The vehicle was unveiled at the 2004 Paris Motor Show. 
The trim levels for the European market were the S, SE and SVE, while later it is replaced by Visia, Visia+, Acenta, Acenta R and Tekna. In Russia/CIS region, Nissan sold Note with Comfort, Luxury and Tekna trim levels. Cars made for this market before 2009 have standard OBDII diagnostics especially software disabled by Nissan.[citation needed] 
It is a version of the Nissan Note inspired by multi-sports brand adidas, with user-changeable treatment on the front/rear bumpers; fabrics and rubber materials used on dashboard, door trim, etc. 
The 2006 Nissan Note, 1.4 Acenta (SE), five-door hatchback passed, July 2006, passed the Euro NCAP car safety tests with these ratings: 
A CD single called 'C'mon Everybody Note&Pencils' was released by Pony Canyon on 9 August 2006, which included Eddie Cochran's C'mon Everybody (original, DJ UTO remix, instrumental) used in the Nissan Note commercial premiered on 12 May 2006. The CD cover shows a Marine Blue Note 15S V package drawing on a 50m x 40m notebook with blue tire tracks. The Note commercial was performed by Toshihiro Yashiba of JFCT INC. 
In 2007, Nissan slightly facelifted Note. Both bumpers become fully painted. Radio antenna moved to the rear of the roof. Headlamp washer lost its dedicated button and become fully automatic which lead to excessive cleaner fluid consumption. New radio models were offered and some less significant and invisible changes were made. 
Japanese models went on sale on 16 January 2008. Early models include 15X F package, 15X, 15G, 15RS, 15RX, 15X FOUR F package, 15X FOUR, 15G FOUR. 
European model was unveiled at the 2008 Paris Motor Show. The 1.5-litre dCi engine models went on sale in September 2008, followed by 1.4-litre petrol engine models in October 2008. 
They are versions of Nissan Note 15X SV and 15X FOUR SV for the Japanese market, with intelligent air conditioning system with 1-touch clean switch. 
As part of the 2008 Nissan Note launch in Japan, a series of television commercials based on The World of GOLDEN EGGS characters was produced. The corresponding web site <http://note-notte.com/> opened on 21 December 2007, followed by the 1st television commercial premiere in January 2008, and the opening of a special Nissan Note web site with The World of GOLDEN EGGS characters. 
As part of the 2009 Nissan Note market launch in Japan, a series of animated commercials were premiered on 20 May 2009. The commercial was inspired by the Heidi, Girl of the Alps animated series, featuring Junichi Koumoto and Tomochika (as Heidi). The series was produced by studio crocodile inc. 
This concept is a hatchback concept built on the V platform, designed to be sold alongside Nissan Micra and Nissan Juke. It included Nissan's "Squash Line" at the side body panel, independent front MacPherson struts with coil springs, torsion beam rear axle, Around View Monitor (AVM) safety technology, Nissan Safety Shield System. The vehicle was unveiled at the 2012 Geneva International Motor Show. 
The vehicle was unveiled at the Osanbashi venue in Yokohama, followed by Nissan Gallery on 28 August 2012. 
It would replace the Nissan Livina for other countries' markets (except China and parts of Asia) within 2013. 
Hong Kong models went on sale on 21 September 2012. Early models included DIG-S with HR12DDR engine, XTRONIC CVT transmission, ISS idle mode. 
Latin American models went on sale in July 2013. Early models included Sense (manual and CVT) and Advance (manual and CVT). 
European models went on sale in summer 2013, with deliveries beginning in autumn 2013. Early models include a choice of 3 engines (1.2-litre 80PS petrol, 1.2-litre 98PS DIG-S petrol, 1.5-litre 90PS turbo diesel), manual or CVT transmission, 3 trim levels (Visia, Acenta and Tekna). 
Nissan said the drag coefficient is 0.298. The frontal area is 2.13 m2, making the drag area CdA to be at 0.639 m2.  
It is a version of the Nissan Note for the Japanese market, with plated door handles, exclusive Beatnic Gold body color, suede-like cloth seats and artificial leather, piano-like center cluster finisher and genuine leather-wrapped steering wheel. The highest grade "MEDALIST" is also a model that inherits the concept of Tidus and comes from Laurel 's grade of the same name. 
The Nissan Versa Note is a version of the Nissan Note for the US market, as a replacement of the outgoing Nissan Versa hatchback. 
US model went on sale in Summer 2013 as 2014 model year vehicle. Early models include 1.6-liter DOHC 4-cylinder engine with dual fuel injection and Twin CVTC (Continuously Variable Timing Control), 5-speed manual or Xtronic CVT transmission, 5 grade levels (S, S Plus, SV, SL). A sporty SR model has been added to the 2015 lineup. New for 2017 a facelift with a new front bumper cover as well as rear (previously only available on the SR model), wheels and color choices. 
In April 2019, Nissan announced that the Versa Note would be discontinued at the end of 2019, and that only the Versa sedan will be offered for the 2020 model year, despite diminishing sales for both the Versa and Versa Note models. 
The Japanese model of Nissan Note is manufactured at Nissan Motor Kyushu, while European models of Nissan Note were developed at Nissan Technical Centre Europe (NTCE) in both the UK and Spain and produced in Nissan Manufacturing UK in Sunderland.[citation needed] 
Both the North American Nissan Versa Note and Latin American models of the Nissan Note are built in Nissan Mexicana SA de CV in Aguascalientes, Mexico. 
As part of Nissan Note's market launch in Japan, Nissan Note's Japan web site featured a flip book animation. 
On 24 October 2016, Renault-Nissan CEO Carlos Ghosn revealed at the Nissan Note factory in Japan the facelifted MY2017 Note model, with a special powertrain called e-Power. It uses only an electric motor to move the car, while a petrol engine is used as a generator producing electricity that goes directly into propelling the electric motor or, when electricity is in excess, to charge the batteries (similar to BMW's REX).[citation needed] 
As of 2017, the Nissan Note is being sold only in Asia and Americas. UK production for European and Argentine markets ended in March that year to increase capacity for Qashqai. 
The third-generation Note was revealed in Japan on 24 November 2020 and went on sale on 23 December 2020. For this generation, the Note is only available with an e-Power series hybrid 2WD or 4WD drivetrain (introduced later in 2021), in which one electric motor powering the front axle and another motor powering the rear axle. 
In 2013, the Note won the RJC Car of the Year award, beating out the Suzuki Wagon R and the Mazda CX-5. Five years later, it became the top-selling compact car in Japan for 2018 and won the Japanese environmental award on the same year. 
In 2014 OperaUpClose began operating as a charity. Ending their residency at the King's Head Theatre in 2015 allowed them to develop touring; education and participation programmes; and "to create more ambitious and innovative productions than a residency in one small theatre allowed". 
In 2015 OperaUpClose presented the world premiere of Unborn in America by composer Luke Styles and librettist Peter Cant, as part of the Vault Festival; revived their production of Verdi's La Traviata at Tricycle Theatre; opened a new production of Bizet's Carmen at Soho Theatre; presented the World Premiere of Anthony Young and Leanna Brodie's family opera Ulla's Odyssey at Kings Place; and continued to tour the UK with their production of Mozart's The Marriage of Figaro. 
In 2016 OperaUpClose created their first education and participation programme. Partnering with Theatre in Education company, Big Wheel, and funded by Arts Council England, they created a series of workshops that tour with their children's opera, Ulla's Odyssey. The workshops explore what an opera is, how they are performed etc., to give children from as young as seven the tools and confidence to enjoy opera for the rest of their lives. 
The 2012 winner was Two Caravans by composer Guy Harries and librettist Ace McCarron. The 2013 winner, The Blank Canvas, was written by composer Spyros Syrmos from a libretto by Fay Wrixon. Ulla's Odyssey by composer Anthony Young and librettist Leanna Brodie won in 2014. 
Faria is located on Pitas Point, a popular surf spot also known as "Whistles." The rocky point faces south, with stretches of sandy beach running northeast and northwest from the point. 
Beach access at one of the beachfront homes was the subject of the 1987 US Supreme Court case Nollan v. California Coastal Commission. 
In total 128 players are granted Tour Cards, which enables them to participate in all Players Championships and European Tour Qualifiers. 
Raymond van Barneveld retired after the 2020 PDC World Darts Championship, and Corey Cadby also resigned his card which allowed Toni Alcinas and Simon Stevenson to move into the top 64 and retain their Tour Cards. Jamie Bain resigned his Tour Card after the 2020 PDC World Darts Championship, as he couldn't commit to the full schedule, which opened a space in Q-School as Bain was outside the Top 64. 
"The Other Woman" is the title track from the album The Other Woman by Ray Parker Jr.. It was his first solo hit single without his longtime group, Raydio. Released as a single in March 1982, it peaked at number four on the Billboard Hot 100, number two on the Hot Black Singles chart, number twenty-four on the dance chart, and number thirty-three on the Adult Contemporary chart. It also spent one week at number one in Australia. 
There are two music videos for the single. One  had a definite cheesy horror film feel, akin to The Rocky Horror Picture Show, with a lyrics-inspired sexy spin on Dracula.  
The other  featured actress/model Patricia Kotero, better known as Apollonia. She would later go on to co-star in the film Purple Rain. 
Pitta Pitta (also known under several other spellings) is an extinct Australian Aboriginal language. It was spoken around Boulia, Queensland. 
The name pituri for the leaves chewed as a stimulant by traditional Aboriginal people has been claimed to be derived from the Pitta Pitta word pijiri. though Walter Roth pointed out in 1897 that the word 'pituri', thus pronounced, was the term used by the neighbouring Yurlayurlanya people, and added that the Pitta Pitta people called it "tarembola". 
This Australian Aboriginal languages-related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
DOVO Solingen, or DOVO Steelware, or DOVO, is an independent German company, based in Solingen. They are a manufacturer of scissors, shaving equipment such as straight razors and safety razors, as well as manicure tools. Shaving equipment and razors are produced by Merkur Solingen, a subsidiary of DOVO. 
DOVO was founded in 1906. The name derives from the last names of the original founders Carl Dorp + Carl Arthur Voos. Starting from 1950s onwards DOVO has acquired multiple companies like Tennis (1952), Bismarck (1957), "Ankerflagge" (1957), "Teufelskerle" (1968). "Kronpunkt" (1969), Fontana (1970), Heups & Hermes company (1973) and Merkur company (1996). 
As of 31 December 2001, the company employed 86 staff, who produced a daily output of 1200 scissors, 900 nippers, and 150 open razors and shavers. 75% of these products were exported to other countries, while the remaining 25% were sold in Germany. Since the early 2000s, the company has seen an increase in demand and as of 2016 produced tens of thousands of razors a year, with 20 employees working exclusively on razors. 
Since 2013 DOVO moved towards focusing mainly on their shaving products and introducing new range of straight razors. 
Merkur 38C & Double Edge Blades. An example of current Merkur DE safety razor design and double edge blade packaging. 
Poster of the DOVO Meisterwerke in Solingen. This shows the names of the original owners (as the DOVO brand name was not yet used) and the original location of the factory. 
The school was founded by the Reverend Reynell Cotton in around 1760. Cotton was succeeded as headmaster by his son-in-law, the Reverend Charles Richards. 
This Hampshire school or sixth form college related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The list of ship commissionings in 1904 includes a chronological list of all ships commissioned in 1904. 
Film Society of Lincoln Center: Li's film earns its emotional payoff thanks to the incredible performances of the young leads. Featuring the sand-blown splendor of infinitely sprawling vistas, ghost towns, and touches of the fantastic, River Road is an absolute masterpiece of Chinese filmmaking. 
The Society For Film's Fernando Gros: River Road is a bold and surprising film, an ecological parable that gently draws the viewer in and delivers with surprising, emotionally compelling conclusion. One of the best Chinese dramas I have seen in the last twenty years this is essential viewing. Highly recommended. 
Rukor: China's indie film makers have a hard time, and little opportunity to connect with wider audiences. River Road so easily could slip back into the shadows, having had screenings only in a few film festivals. Yet it is the most compelling climate change movie yet, and it deserves to be better known. 
This biographical article relating to association football in the country of Georgia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Calciavis is an extinct genus of bird from the Eocene of Wyoming. It is a lithornithid, a member of a lineage of flying palaeognaths, distantly related to modern ratites. Like many other fossils from the Green River Formation, it is exceptionally well preserved, bearing soft-tissue impressions of skin and feathers. 
Calciavis is recovered as a sister taxa to Pseudocrypturus, as sister-taxa to all other lithornithids. 
As mentioned above, skull and limb proportions are different among both species, implying that they occupied different ecological niches. 
A recent study on Calciavis vindicates previous statements of competent flying in lithornithids, indicating that not only they were capable of sustained flapping but also migratory behaviour. 
At the end of June 2003 a nature trail, the Lothar Path (Lotharpfad), was opened at the Schliffkopf on the topic of storm damage. Along an 800-metre-long educational and experience trail, visitors can see how this ten-hectare area, heavily damaged by Hurricane Lothar in 1999, has gradually recovered and been recolonized. The Lothar Path runs along footbridges, ladders and steps and shows how the forces of nature act, how nature deals with destruction in such an area and what naturally regrows. 
A 520.1-hectare part of the raised bog-like summit region has been designated as a nature reserve since 1938. In 1986, on the territory of the district of Freudenstadt, a further 876.2 ha was granted reserve status. This is intended to protect the typical landscape of the Black Forest grinden with their extensive woods, stands of mountain pine and the tarn of Buhlbachsee. Parts of the forest are also designated as Schonwald. 
The Schliffkopf is also part of the 2,897-hectare Special Area of Conservation known as the Wilder See-Hornisgrinde. In addition, the 36,045-hectare bird reserve of Nordschwarzwald includes the Schliffkopf and thus covers the SAC and nature reserves too. 
Ritchie street started as a radio market and then transformed into a market for televisions, computers, mobile phones and laptops. Today the street has over 2,500 shops employing 15,000 people. 
The series starts in 2016. Elite policeman Filip Marvan is forced to steal evidence to protect his brother who owes money to a mob. Filip is hit by a car the same day, and wakes up in a hospital in 1982. He has to find out why he is in the past and what circumstances changed the life of his family. 
Born in Bucharest, he attended school there until 1855, when he left for the University of Paris. Two years later, he obtained a doctorate in law from that institution. 
Foralumab is a fully human monoclonal antibody that binds to CD3 epsilon. Also called TZLS-401, it is currently in clinical development by Tiziana Life Sciences for treatment of Crohn's disease and other autoimmune diseases. 
This antineoplastic or immunomodulatory drug article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Avoca Handweavers, now mostly known simply as Avoca, is a clothing manufacturing, retail and food business in Ireland. The company began in Avoca, County Wicklow and is the oldest working woollen mill in Ireland and one of the world's oldest manufacturing companies.[citation needed] Since 2015, it has been owned by the American food service and facilities company, Aramark. 
The mill on the banks of the fast-flowing River Avoca survives from at least 1723.  Travel to and from the remote village was difficult and a barter system was used.  The mill was used for grinding corn for bread and spinning and weaving wool. 
In 1760, a flying shuttle loom, capable of weaving up to 20 metres of cloth a day arrived.  Workers, concerned about possible unemployment, resorted to burning some looms. 
Three sisters, Emily, Winifred, and Veronica Wynne, inherited the mill in the 1920s and introduced colour. Avoca Handweavers tweed was produced and exported, including for use by Italian designer Elsa Schiaparelli. The material was also used for a waistcoat for King George VI and baby blankets for the children of Queen Elizabeth II.[citation needed] 
In 1974, Donald Pratt, a solicitor and former cricketer engaged to handle the sale of the mill which now faced closure decided to buy it himself. Along with his wife, Hilary, a teacher, he set about getting Avoca Handweavers back on its feet.[tone] The Pratts began exporting handwoven rugs and throws to the UK and other countries. Avoca throws are still sold across the globe.[citation needed] 
As of 2020, Avoca has several retail outlets around Ireland, including at Powerscourt Estate, Malahide Castle and in Belfast. Several of these also have foodhalls and cafes attached as their food operations were expanded.[citation needed] 
The company has a number of women's clothing ranges which it sells through its own stores designed by Amanda Pratt, as well as wholesaling in Ireland and internationally. One of these ranges is known as 'Avoca Anthology'.[citation needed] 
Avoca is also associated with gardens and has several rare trees in its Kilmacanogue grounds and a garden at Mount Usher Gardens in Ashford, County Wicklow.[citation needed] 
Polyipnus oluolus is a species of ray-finned fish in the genus Polyipnus. It is found in the Marshall Islands. 
This class Actinopterygii (ray-finned fish) related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
One of the primary causes for the rise in the number of smaller land holders was a decline in the custom of primogeniture. Towards the end of the Kamakura period, inheritance began to be split among a lord's sons, making each heir's holdings, and thus their power, smaller. 
"Stronger Together" is the second single from freestyle singer Shannon's second album Do You Wanna Get Away. 
Nokdong station is a railway station on Gwangju Metro Line 1 in Nokdong, South Korea. The station is located near at the depot. 
This article relating to rapid transit systems in South Korea is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a railway station in South Korea is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Pelham station is a commuter rail stop on the Metro-North Railroad's New Haven Line, located in Pelham, New York. The station is one mile west of the New Haven Line's junction of the Northeast Corridor, and is located just east of the end of third rail power and start of overhead catenary power. 
The Pelham station was built in 1893 by the New York, New Haven, and Hartford Railroad. As with all New Haven Line stations in Westchester County, the station became a Penn Central station upon acquisition by Penn Central in 1969, and eventually became part of the MTA's Metro-North Railroad. As of August 2006, weekday commuter ridership was 2,284, and there are 356 parking spots. 
Mark Miyoshi is a Japanese-American taiko maker. He is the owner and principal craftsman at Miyoshi Daiko, based in Mt. Shasta, California. 
Mark Miyoshi was born and raised in Greeley, Colorado. He attended the University of Colorado at Boulder where he was active in the Asian American Equal Opportunity Program (EOP). 
Miyoshi is a founding member of Denver Taiko, the fourth taiko group in North America. In 1976, Denver Taiko started out with a dozen members and only two homemade drums donated by the Japanese American Association, so Miyoshi and the others learned how to make their own drums with the help of San Jose Taiko and Kinnara Taiko. Miyoshi left Denver Taiko in 1978 and moved to California. 
In 1982, Miyoshi received his first commission from Denver Taiko for an okedo, the first okedo to be made in the United States. Miyoshi is also the first North American Taiko maker to laminate staves with finger joints and carve out the interior of the nagodo in order to improve the quality of the sound. 
In the mid-1980s, Miyoshi began to make taiko full-time. He currently is the owner and principal craftsman at Miyoshi Daiko. Miyoshi Daiko produces Nagado, Shime-Daiko, Okedo-Daiko, Hira-Daiko and Uchi-wa Daiko in all sizes. 
Miyoshi has made taiko for San Jose Taiko, Shasta Taiko, Kenny Endo, Chizuko Endo, Denver Taiko, Portland Taiko, Ondekoza, Stanford Taiko as well as many other North American and international taiko groups. 
In 1989, Miyoshi was awarded a US/Japan Friendship Commission fellowship by the National Endowment for the Arts to study the art of taiko making in Japan. 
USS Inca (ID-3219) was a tugboat acquired by the U.S. Navy during World War I. She was assigned to the Parris Island, South Carolina, Marine barracks. She served until 1 February 1919. 
The fourth ship to be so named, Inca, an iron tug, was built in 1879 by J. H. Dialogue & Sons, Camden, New Jersey; and acquired by the Navy 31 July 1918. She commissioned 2 August 1918. 
The tug was assigned to the 6th Naval District, headquartered at Charleston, South Carolina, and operated until after World War I ended at Parris Island Marine Barracks, South Carolina. 
Laugh-Out-Loud Cats is a series of cartoons created by Adam "Ape Lad" Koford that features two anthropomorphic hobo cats named Kitteh and Pip. The series consists of mostly single-panel cartoons that combine internet memes associated with LOLcats (from which the series takes its name) and other forms of internet slang and contemporary humor with a visual style that pays homage to early 20th century comic strips such as Krazy Kat.  
 In January 2008, Koford published a small run of Meet the Laugh-Out-Loud Cats, the first Laugh-Out-Loud Cats book. In 2009, a second book was published by Abrams ComicArts: The Laugh-Out-Loud Cats Sell Out, with an introduction by comedian John Hodgman.  
The origins of the series can be traced to the development of society, the emergence of 'teen' culture, and the synthesis of exclusive slang use.  
As of January 2017, Koford has posted over 2,800 panels, which are presented on his blog HOBOTOPIA and on Flickr. 
The 1935 Women's Western Open was a golf competition held at Sunset Ridge Country Club, the 6th edition of the event. Opal Hill won the championship in match play competition by defeating Mrs. S.L. Reinhart in the final match, 9 and 7. 
Industrial Ethernet (IE) is the use of Ethernet in an industrial environment with protocols that provide determinism and real-time control. Protocols for industrial Ethernet include EtherCAT, EtherNet/IP, PROFINET, POWERLINK, SERCOS III, CC-Link IE, and Modbus TCP. Many industrial Ethernet protocols use a modified  Media Access Control (MAC) layer to provide low latency and determinism. Some microcontrollers such as Sitara provide industrial Ethernet support. 
Some industrial networks emphasized deterministic delivery of transmitted data, whereas Ethernet used collision detection which made transport time for individual data packets difficult to estimate with increasing network traffic. Typically, industrial uses of Ethernet employ full-duplex standards and other methods so that collisions do not unacceptably influence transmission times. 
When an industrial network must connect to an office network or external networks, a firewall system can be inserted to control exchange of data between the networks. This network separation preserves the performance and reliability of the industrial network. 
Industrial environments are often much harsher, often subject to oil sprays, water sprays, and physical vibrations, so often industrial Ethernet requires a more rugged and watertight connector on one or both ends of the Cat-5 or Cat-6 cable, such as M12 connectors or M8 connectors, rather than the 8P8C connectors extremely commonly used in homes and businesses. 
Programmable logic controllers (PLCs) communicate using one of several possible open or proprietary protocols, such as EtherNet/IP, Modbus, Sinec H1, Profibus, CANopen, DeviceNet or FOUNDATION Fieldbus. The idea to use standard Ethernet makes these systems more interoperable. 
The 2000 Grand Prix motorcycle racing season was the 52nd F.I.M. Road Racing World Championship season. 
Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Simultaneously, he began his career at the federal criminal courts of Argentina, reaching the status of clerk of the court after years of several promotions. 
He completed postgraduate studies at the Laws and Economics Institute of the Complutense University of Madrid, Spain, as well as at the United Kingdom, where he was invited by the Foreign and Commonwealth Office and the British Council. 
Before Garavano was appointed Attorney General of the city of Buenos Aires in 2007, he performed as Counselor of the Council of Magistracy of the city of Buenos Aires and judge at the Criminal Court No. 12 of the city. He was also elected vice-president of the Board of Trustees of Justice Studies Center of the Americas (CEJA-JSCA), chosen for this position by the General Assembly of the Organization of American States (OAS), proposed by the Argentine government. 
In 2014 he was elected substitute Counsillor of Argentina's Council of Magistracy on representation of the lawyers of Buenos Aires, sharing the 4-year term with Adriana Donato. 
He has written fifteen books and numerous articles on Law and judicial reform, some of which have received awards. Starting on April 2014, he also performed as the academic director of the non-governmental organization Unidos Por la Justicia. Regarding his personal life, Garavano is married and has three sons. 
During his term as Minister, the United States declassified secret files about the so-called National Reorganization Process and gave them to Argentina's government. Garavano received around 50,000 digitalized pages of documents. 
In 2018, when Italy's president Sergio Mattarella visited Argentina, he awarded Garavano with the Order of the Star of Italy. 
From April 1968 to May 1977, Secretary of the Central Committee of the Communist Party of the Soviet Union (for relations with socialist countries, member countries of the Council for Mutual Economic Assistance, member countries of the Warsaw Pact), at the same time since 1972, head of the Department of the Central Committee of the Communist Party of the Soviet Union for communications with the communist and workers' parties of the socialist countries. 
In 1985, he was appointed Chairman of the State Committee of the Soviet Union for Foreign Economic Relations. 
Academician of the International Academy of Spiritual Unity of the Nations of the World, Academician and Professor of the Academy of Security, Defense and Law Enforcement Problems. 
The Materials Testing Reactor (MTR) was an early nuclear reactor specifically designed to facilitate the conception and design of future reactors. It produced much of the foundational irradiation data that underlies the nuclear power industry. It operated in Idaho at the National Reactor Testing Station from 1952 to 1970. 
The design evolution for MTR began in 1944 at Clinton Laboratories (now Oak Ridge National Laboratory), originally for the production of fission products. The concept evolved from a 50-kW  homogeneous reactor to a heavy-water-cooled and moderated core, and then again at the suggestion of Eugene Wigner to a 30 MW light-water-cooled and moderated core. 
The Blaw-Knox Company was selected as the architect-engineer in July 1949 to complete the engineering design. Fluor was engaged in February 1950 as the construction contractor. Ground was broken for the MTR in May 1950, and construction was completed in February 1952. The first experimental tests were inserted in the reactor on August 2, 1952. 
The reactor had a highly-enriched uranium core made of metallic plate-type uranium-aluminum fuel clad in aluminum. Eighteen plates of fuel were constructed into fuel assemblies. The core ran with between 21 and 23 assemblies. The reactor was cooled and moderated with water pumped through the fuel elements. 
The core was surrounded by a beryllium neutron reflector held in an aluminum tank. Outside the tank was a space filled with graphite balls, and then block graphite. The graphite served to thermalize and reflect neutrons back into the core and to contain thermalized neutrons in a zone large enough to allow the placement of numerous experimental facilities. A thermal shield made of steel surrounded the graphite, and a 9-foot thick concrete biological shield surrounded that. 
The graphite was cooled with forced air flow. This air became activated by the neutrons and included about 1500 Ci of Argon-41 per day, which was exhausted through the 250-ft stack located downwind of the reactor. 
The reactor, the control room, the experimental facilities, and a fuel management canal were enclosed in a reactor building 
About 25% of the uranium in each assembly was consumed before needing removal. Assemblies were cut in the reactor canal using an underwater saw in preparation for transport to the chemical separation process to reclaim the unused uranium. 
Six Down Beam Holes provided space for additional removable material samples to be placed near the core. 
Vertical Graphite Holes were positioned vertically in the graphite reflector to position samples in thermal neutron fields. 
A Thermal Column Facility composed of a 6 ft square column of graphite extending from the outer face to the biological shield to the outer face of the outer thermal shield plate  had many holes with lower neutron and gamma radiation levels than the interior positions. 
A Hydraulic Rabbit device capable of inserting and removing small samples into and out of the reactor was located in an extension of the main canal below the reactor. The system had 4 tubes. A similar Pneumatic Rabbit facility driven by compressed air provided rabbit services to the beryllium reflector. 
Irradiation positions directly adjacent to the fuel assemblies were available through the Active Lattice Facilities. Material placed in these positions was cooled by the primary water coolant. 
A Bulk Shielding Facility was designed to be located on the west side of the reactor for studying reactor shielding materials but was filled with high density concrete due to construction economy considerations. 
Once operational, the MTR was constantly in high demand. It tested different candidate fuel forms for the US nuclear naval propulsion program, the proposed nuclear-powered bomber, reactors at the AEC's Savannah River weapons plant, and for prototype power reactors under development.  
The high flux of MTR was ideal for generating significant amounts of transplutonium nuclides, such as  Californium-252. MTR generated 30 micrograms of Cf-252 between 1952 and 1958.  
Atimura terminata is a species of beetle in the family Cerambycidae. It was described by Francis Polkinghorne Pascoe in 1863. 
He is the former Chairman of the Hong Kong Community Chest Fund and the Hong Kong Football Association. 
This business-related Hong Kong biographical article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Chlorolestes umbratus, the white malachite is a species of damselfly in the family Synlestidae. It is endemic to southern South Africa. This species is found along rivers and streams in both forest and fynbos. 
Although its range is restricted, and has declined in the past, this species is locally common and has recovered where alien tree species have been removed from waterways. 
This biographical article related to Zambian association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
St. Peter's Seminary is a Roman Catholic seminary located in the Diocese of London, Ontario, Canada. The seminary is a fully accredited member of the Association of Theological Schools of the United States and Canada. St. Peter's Seminary is the major seminary of the Roman Catholic Diocese of London in Ontario. It is affiliated with King's University College, a Catholic affiliate of The University of Western Ontario. The current rector of St. Peter's Seminary is Father Denis Grecco. 
St. Peter's Seminary is Canada's oldest English-speaking Roman Catholic diocesan seminary. Since it was founded by the Diocese of London in 1912, the seminary has produced more than 1,000 priests (including 23 who became bishops) and has educated permanent deacons and lay graduates. 
St. Peter's seminary was founded by the Right Reverend Michael F. Fallon, OMI, who was the bishop of London at the time. The seminary opened its doors on September 15, 1912. The students were initially housed and taught in the Bishop's Residence, which later became the rectory of St. Peter's Cathedral Basilica. However, this building is no longer present. 
St. Peter's Seminary Foundation is a public charitable organization whose sole purpose is to fundraise for St. Peter's Seminary so as to help build its faith and its future. The foundation does this by acting as a vehicle for fundraising, creating conditions for effective fundraising, mobilizing community support and exercising exemplary fiduciary and stewardship practices. 
St.Peter's Seminary has graduated a number of notable alumni who have been elevated to the rank or bishop; they include: 
The 2010 World Aesthetic Gymnastics Championships, the 11th edition of the Aesthetic group gymnastics competition, was held in Varna, Bulgaria from June 10 to 12, at the Palace of Culture and Sports. 
Ginka Georgieva, Stasi Chapanova, Stefani Petrova, Kamelia Radeva, Natalia Toncheva, Preslava Valova, Daniela Nikolaeva, Julia Georgieva 
The Pelham City School District is a public school district in Mitchell County, Georgia, based in Pelham. It serves the city of Pelham and the surrounding communities in Mitchell County. 
Following Plaything's remixed version of their single "Do You See The Light" in 2002, Snap! re-worked and re-mixed their singles with various artists', leading the release of the album, "The Cult of Snap!" in 2003. Three additional singles were released; "Rhythm Is a Dancer (2003)", "The Power (Of Bhangra)" and "Ooops Up (2003)" and all charted in Germany. 
James Pittillo was born between 1690 and 1698 in Scotland, likely in Perthshire. According to records in the British Archives of persons captured in the Jacobite rising of 1715 and deported to the colonies, James Pittillo was a laborer from the parish of Logierait in the ancient county of Perthshire (or Perth). Pittillo was captured at the Battle of Preston, tried, and transported on the ship Elizabeth and Anne to Virginia in June/July 1716.[citation needed] 
In 1728, William Byrd II was commissioned to survey the boundary line between the colonies of Virginia and North Carolina. He assembled an expeditionary force of about twenty men, including Pittillo, whom he considered expert woodsmen and Indian traders. They set out on 5 March 1728. After six weeks, the survey work was halted. They renewed the expedition in September when the weather was cooler. Byrd listed James Pittillo as part of both his spring and fall expeditions.[citation needed] 
In 1728, James Pittillo was appointed as a tobacco inspector in Bristol Parish.[citation needed] Tobacco was the important commodity crop of Virginia at the time; his position gave him influence in the parish, as he determined prices to be gained by planters.  
James Pittillo died about 1754 in Dinwiddie County, Virginia. His wife, Mary, and several children survived him.[citation needed] 
1. James Pittillo was born 25 December 1725 in Bristol Parish, Prince George County, Virginia. He married Martha Burge about 1745. He died about 1782 in Brunswick County, Virginia. His widow, Martha, and oldest son James were shown on the 1788 Brunswick County Tax List. 
2. Ann Pittillo was born 15 July 1728 in Bristol Parish, Prince George County, Virginia.  She married James Williams and they made their home in Lunenburg County, Virginia. 
3. Henry Pittillo was born 31 October 1730 in Bristol Parish, Prince George County, Virginia. This man was not the Rev. Henry Pattillo (later of North Carolina), known as a Presbyterian minister and teacher. 
5. Lucy S. Pittillo was born 11 November 1733 in Bristol Parish, Prince George County, Virginia. She may have married James Moses. 
6. John Pittillo was born about 1734 in Bristol Parish, Prince George County, Virginia.  His first wife was probably a Millington.  His second wife was Rachel (surname unknown). John Pittillo died 10 April 1827 in Burke County, North Carolina. 
Stuart Langridge (also known as 'Aq' or 'Zippy' ) is a podcaster, developer and author. He became a member of the Web Standards Project's DOM Scripting Task Force, an invited expert on the W3C HTML Working Group and is an acknowledged commentator on W3C Document Object Model and JavaScript techniques. 
Langridge is known as a presenter of the now defunct LugRadio, which was a free software podcast in the UK. Along with Jono Bacon, he was the longest-serving member of the team and often served to incite discussion about issues that more directly related to software freedom. In LugRadio he frequently advocated freedom, yet despite this often attracted criticism for using proprietary software. 
Langridge was involved in the Shot of Jaq podcast, in collaboration with his former Lugradio co-host Jono Bacon. He's now a part of the Bad Voltage podcast, together with Jono Bacon and Jeremy Garcia (founder of LinuxQuestions.org). Bryan Lunduke (founder of Jupiter Broadcasting) was also a founder member of the Bad Voltage podcast but has since moved on due to other commitments. The podcast first aired in October 2013. 
He has worked on projects including Jokosher, a multi-track audio editor for GNOME, and Jackfield, a program to run Mac OS X Dashboard widgets under GNOME. 
In January 2009 Langridge joined Canonical as a developer and left the company in 2013 to work as a freelancer for Kryogenix's consulting. At Canonical he worked on the Desktop Couch for Ubuntu in his role as Canonical Ltd. staffer. 
Langridge has written two books for technical publisher SitePoint, DHTML Utopia, and Run Your Own Web Server Using Linux & Apache (with Tony Steidler-Dennison) as well as writing the Stylish Scripting weblog during 2005. 
Liga Deportiva Universitaria de Quito's 1972 season was the club's 42nd year of existence, the 19th year in professional football and the 13th in the top level of professional football in Ecuador. 
Chango inc was an online marketing company in the field of data-driven digital advertising, specializing in search retargeting and programmatic marketing. 
The company was founded in 2008, acquired by Rubicon Project in 2015 for $122 million, and closed down in 2017 after its performance did not meet expectations. It used to be headquartered in Toronto with sales offices in NYC, San Francisco, Chicago, Los Angeles, Atlanta, Seattle, Austin and London. 
The company was founded in Toronto by Chris Sukornyk. Sukornyk previously co-founded the X-Stream Network, Bubbleshare and FiveLimes. Sukornyk devoted the first 12 months on research and development. 
In November 2012, Chango Inc., secured $12 million in funding. All of Chango's existing investors including iNovia, Rho Canada Ventures, Metamorphic Ventures, Mantella Venture Partners and Extreme Venture Partners took their full allocation in the round. 
In addition to Chris Sukornyk and Mazdak Rezvani, Chango's founding team includes Internet and Display media veteran Dax Hamman (CPO and ex head of Display Media at iCrossing). in 2012, Chango hired Paul McIntyre (VP of Operations ex Conversant), and recently hired Keith Lorizio (CRO and ex Microsoft) to take Chango to new levels. 
Most recently, Chango was recognized in Deloitte's Technology Fast 50 program and was ranked first overall in Canada with a growth rate of 69,800%  
Rubicon the company that acquired Chango in 2015 decided to shut down the project in 2017 stating that the company did not meet performance expectations. 
Chango was one of the pioneers to offer Search Retargeting[citation needed]. The company serves display ads to potential customers based on their recent search activity. As of the first quarter of 2013, Chango was working with 75 of the top 500 Internet Retailers.[citation needed] 
Chango claims to be able to capture the recent search activity of hundreds of millions of users, using anonymous cookies. The company then re-targets display advertisement to users if they match a specific campaign. Display advertisement is purchased through a Demand Side Platform (DSP) that operates across multiple ad networks, such as appnexus, rubicon and double click.[citation needed] 
Chango is a member of the Network Advertising Initiative (NAI). This allows consumers to "opt out" of the search retargeting campaigns delivered by Chango and partners. The company says that it does not capture Personally Identifiable Information (PII).[citation needed] 
In December 2012, Chango Inc. integrated directly with Facebook to bring search intent data to social media targeting. 
More recently, Chango Inc released the industry's first programmatic marketing platform, which combines Data Management Platform (DMP) with Demand Side Platform (DSP) capabilities.[citation needed] 
This article about a Bharatiya Janata Party politician from Delhi is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Ryan Samuel Brunt (born 26 May 1993) is an English semi-professional footballer who plays as a forward for National League South club Chippenham Town. 
Brunt joined fellow National League South side Chippenham Town on 9 October 2020, signing a short-term deal. 
Per Japanese census data, the population of Ichinohe peaked in the 1950s has declined steadily over the past 60 years. 
Ichinohe has a mayor-council form of government with a directly elected mayor and a unicameral town council of 14 members. Ichinohe, and the city of Ninohe together contribute two seats to the Iwate Prefectural legislature. In terms of national politics, the town is part of Iwate 2nd district of the lower house of the Diet of Japan. 
Ichinohe has seven public elementary schools and four public middle schools operated by the town government, and two public high schools operated by the Iwate Prefectural Board of Education. The prefecture also operates two special education schools for the handicapped. 
Kahama is a town in north-western Tanzania. The town serves as the headquarters of Kahama Urban District. 
She attended Laurel School in Shaker Heights, Ohio. She graduated from Smith College with a BA in English.  She studied at the Corcoran School of Art, and graduated from the University of Texas at San Antonio with an MFA. 
She moved to New York City in 1979.  as her art career prospered but she continued to return to her home in San Antonio throughout her life and lived at home in San Antonio in her final years. She spent her summers in Sagaponack, New York, where she painted, enjoyed the beach and the special light of Long Island with her family and friends. 
Her work is in the Guggenheim Museum, Brooklyn Museum, Newark Museum, Cleveland Museum of Art, San Antonio Museum of Art, McNay Art Museum and National Museum of Women in the Arts. 
FBXO11 is conserved from nematodes to mammals, and both human FBXO11 and its worm ortholog (DRE-1) form functional SCF ubiquitin ligase complexes. By binding to and mediating the degradation of its substrate proteins, FBXO11 plays important roles in regulating cell cycle regulation, tumorigenesis, and tumor cell metastasis. Well established targets of FBXO11 include BCL6, CDT2, and Snail. 
Arsenaria strictalis is a species of snout moth in the genus Arsenaria. It was described by Hans Georg Amsel in 1949 and is known from Iran. 
Bolundra is a village, princely state and Taluka in Modasa, India. The village (Ta - Modasa) is in Aravalli district in Gujarat state, western India, on the bank of the River Meshvo.[citation needed] 
The taluka was ranked a Sixth Class state, the lowest in the classification of the colonial Mahi Kantha Agency, and was ruled by Rajput chieftains. It covered six square miles, comprising five villages, and had a combined population in 1901 of 740, yielding a state revenue of 2,499 rupees (1903-4, mostly from land), paying a tribute of 134 rupees to Idar State. 
This article about a location in Sabarkantha district, Gujarat, India is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Prior to founding SheFinds.com, Madhok served as group director of editorial products for women at AOL. 
She was educated at University of California, Berkeley, achieving a BS in Communications and an MS  in Marketing from Northwestern University. 
On September 10, 2005 Michelle married entrepreneur and internet maven Michael Palka whom she met via Match.com. They live on the west side of Manhattan. 
This article about a chief executive from the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about an American businessperson born in the 1970s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Joseph Samachson was born on October 13, 1906 in Trenton, New Jersey, the son of Russian Jewish parents, Anna (Roshansky) and David Louis Samachson, a businessman. 
Samachson died of complications from Parkinson's disease on June 2, 1980 in Chicago, Illinois. He was survived by his wife, now deceased, a son, Michael Samachson, and a daughter, the photographer Miriam Berkley. 
As a writer, Samachson translated a number of scientific papers, and in addition to his scientific work, earned a well-deserved reputation as an author, writing books for young people such as Mel Oliver and Space Rover on Mars, which was also published in a Dutch translation. 
He is believed to have begun working for DC Comics in late 1942, working on comics scripts for characters notably including Batman. He also wrote scripts for comics and characters including Sandman, Green Arrow, Airwave and Robotman, as well as "a string of 17 science-fiction stories in 1955 and 1956". 
In 1975, DC Comics adapted an unused story he wrote in the 1940s featuring the Seven Soldiers of Victory into a six-part serial in Adventure Comics #438-443. 
With his wife Dorothy Samachson, he wrote about theater ("Let's Meet the Theatre" and "The Dramatic Story of the Theatre"), music ("Masters of Music" and The Fabulous World of Opera), ballet, archeology (Good Digging) and a number of other titles, including Rome, a Rand McNally "Cities of the World" title. 
In addition, Samachson was a frequent contributor to scientific journals and the author of The Armor Within Us: The Story of Bone. 
At Ablaincourt-Pressoir (Somme), a new station, Gare TGV Haute-Picardie, is served only by inter-regional TGVs. At Croisilles, Pas-de-Calais, a junction leads to the Agny link towards Arras. The LGV crosses the A1 autoroute at Seclin (Nord). 
At present, only Deutsche Bahn has applied for use of the line and in 2009 regulations were relaxed to allow its trains to use the Channel Tunnel. Other proposals are yet to be formalised. 
In September 2008, Air France-KLM indicated a desire to take advantage of the change in the law and apply to run rail services. However, in October 2009, Air France withdrew its interest. This led to Veolia looking for new partners, with the announcement that it would begin working on new proposals in cooperation with Trenitalia to run services from Paris to Strasbourg, London and Brussels. 
Spanish railway operator RENFE has also shown an interest in running AVE services from Spain to London via Paris, Lyon, Barcelona and Madrid via its AVE network which is connected to France via the Barcelona to Figueras and Perpignan to Figueras lines. 
Speranza quadrilinearia is a species of geometrid moth in the family Geometridae. It is found in Central America and North America. 
John F. Kennedy High School (simply referred to as Kennedy High School) is a public high school in Richmond, California, United States. It was established in 1967 and is part of the West Contra Costa Unified School District. Built on the site of Granada Junior High, the school adopted the red and white colors and Eagle mascot from Harry Ells High School, which at that time was slated for closure. 
A $500,000 grant from the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services in 2015 made it possible to open a health clinic, which serves students at the school and South Richmond residents. 
Kennedy's mascot is the Eagles. The school competes in the Tri-County Athletic League of the Bay Shore Conference in California's North Coast Section. 
The school fields boys' sports teams in baseball, basketball, cross country, football, soccer, and track and field. 
In track and field, the Kennedy boys won both the Meet of Champions and the Bay Championships Meet in 1974. 
The school fields girls' sports teams in basketball, cross country, soccer, softball, track and field, and volleyball. 
In 2013, the Kennedy girls sprinters team finished first in both the 3rd Annual Tiger Invite at South Pasadena High School, and the 46th Annual Arcadia Invitational at Arcadia High School, a track and field event that involved more than six hundred schools from over thirty states. Kennedy student Takkarist McKinley won first place at Arcadia in the boy's 200-meter dash. 
Also in 2013, the girls basketball team advanced to its first state basketball game at the NorCal Division III playoffs. 
88.0% of the students were eligible for free or reduced-cost lunch, and it qualified as a Title I school. 
The school is the location of the renovated Richmond Swim Center, which provides facilities for the school and the community. 
Billboard Top R&B Records of 1949 is made up of two year-end charts compiled by Billboard magazine ranking the year's top rhythm and blues records based on record sales and juke box plays. 
North of Kunka there is a stream called Hatun K'uchu (Quechua for "big corner", Hispanicized Atuncucho). It is an affluent of the Willkanuta River which originates near the pass. 
This Peru mountain, mountain range, or peak related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
George A. Burk is a retired captain in the United States Air Force, writer, and motivational speaker. Burk was the sole survivor of an Air Force airplane crash in 1970.  He has written several books about his experiences. 
On January 1, 1999, George's first book was published, "The Bridge Never Crossed: A Survivor's Search for Meaning".  Reporter Deborah Weisberg of the Pittsburgh Post-Gazette wrote a review about The Bridge Never Crossed, Deborah Weisberg, Reporter, Pittsburgh Post-Gazette Comment on The Bridge Never Crossed. 
On June 19, 2014 a memorial was dedicated at the crash site of "Visco 57" in which Captain Burk attended along with family members of others who died on the flight. "Memorial bench dedication for USAF flight 'Visco 57' south of Petaluma" on YouTube 
The company imports steel, chemical raw stock, and machine tools. It produces machine tools, metal parts, gears, electric motors, generators, hydroelectric generators, pumps, valves, mining equipment, rolling stock and other machinery. 
The Taean Heavy Machine Complex in Tongdaewon produces hydroelectric generators and other thermal power generating equipment, including turbines, motors, transformers, etc. Taean manufactures different sizes classes of hydroelectric equipment in its Tongsuse Class, including a 50,000 kVA generator. 
Huichon Machine Tool Factory in Huichon is North Korea's leading manufacturer of heavy-duty machine tools for domestic use and for export.[citation needed] The 50-year-old factory group is involved in machine tool production processes including steel-making, casting, processing, assembly, painting and packing. Product is produced on serial basis and small lot basis. 
Its output of precision machine tools includes an assortment of spline-grinding machines and industrial lathes. 
Endre Hellestveit (born 7 August 1976 in Rosendal in Kvinnherad) is a Norwegian actor.  He plays Isachsen in the Varg Veum series of crime films. 
Hellestveit was previously a ski instructor at Gautefall in Telemark before he joined the military service in Norway. He was there for just two years and served in their diving squad. He then continued his studies in Australia, but ended up at BI Norwegian Business School in Bergen. He was then taken up by the Norwegian National Academy of Theatre in Oslo. 
In 2014, Bethan Knights ran in the Pac-12 Conference. Bethan's 5th place at Pre-NCAA on October 18, 2014 was the highest of any Pac-12 runner. Bethan garnered All Conference (3rd place), All Region (4th place), and All American honors (25th place) in her California Golden Bears Cross country freshman campaign. 
In 2015, Bethan opened her outdoor campaign by winning Cal Open 1500m in 4:21. Bethan did not score in the 1500 m against Stanford University in their dual big meet but ran a pb in 4:19.60. She did not score in a 9th place 10,000 m finish in the Pac-12 Conference at UCLA. Bethan ended her outdoor ncaa season as a 2nd team all-American 5000 meters runner by placing 16th. 
On September 26, 2015, Bethan won the Roy Griak Invitational in Minneapolis with a time of 20:53.8, edging Boise State freshman Allie Ostrander by 15 seconds. 
On February 27, 2016, Bethan earned a silver medal at the 2016 Mountain Pacific Sports Federation Indoor Track and Field Championships in 3000 metres and won gold medal in the Distance medley relay in 2nd best time in Cal Bears history. 
In 2016, Bethan opened her outdoor campaign as a runner-up Big Ten - Pac 12 Invitational 1500m in 4:20.83. Bethan ran 5000 m at Stanford University Invitational in 15:52.91. She raced 3000 m against Stanford University in their dual big meet finished second in 9:18.55. She scored in a 3rd place 5,000 m finish in the Pac-12 Conference at University of Washington. Bethan ended her season as a 28th place in 5000 meters at NCAA Women's Division I Outdoor Track and Field Championships. 
In high school, Knights won the 2013 California state cross country title and the 2014 CIF California State Meet title at 3200 meters after finishing second in 2012 and the 2013 CIF California State Meet title at 3200 meters while running for Northwood High School in Irvine, California. She also competed in the Foot Locker Cross Country Championships as a senior of her prep career. She is signed to run for the University of California, Berkeley under coaches Tony Sandoval and Shayla Houlihan. 
She improved upon Aisling Cuffe's listed U.S. high school record in the Girl's 2 mile 9:53.54 while winning the 2014 Brooks PR Meet in Seattle, Washington 
Orange County Girls cross country runner of the year Orange County Varsity Girls track AOW June 9 Orange County Championships 2014 Varsity Girls track athlete of the meet 2014 Orange County Athletic Directors Association Pacific Coast League MVP 2014 FloTrack Girls 2 mile national record  United States High School Outdoor 2014 Rankings 1600 metres: 3rd Mile: 24th 3000 metres: 7th 3200 metres: 1st 2 Mile: 1st 
Knights is an alumna of Northwood High School (Irvine, California) located in Irvine, California. She runs collegiately for the University of California, Berkeley.  While currently a British citizen, she has stated she intends to apply for U.S. citizenship. 
The Anticosti Group is a geologic group in Quebec. It preserves fossils dating back to the Silurian period. 
This article about a specific stratigraphic formation in Canada is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article about a person notable in connection with Judaism is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Coscoroba swans have escaped or been deliberately released in to Florida, USA, but there is no evidence that the population is breeding and may only persist due to continuing releases or escapes. 
The coscoroba swan feeds on various plant matter, small aquatic insects, and small fish. The female incubates the eggs, while the male stands guard and aggressively helps to protect the fledglings against predators after hatching. Coscoroba swans live to an age of approximately twenty years. 
Jan Hejda (born June 18, 1978) is a Czech former professional ice hockey defenceman who played with the Edmonton Oilers, the Columbus Blue Jackets and the Colorado Avalanche in the National Hockey League (NHL). 
Hejda was originally selected in the 4th round, 106th overall in the 2003 NHL Entry Draft by the Buffalo Sabres. He played six seasons with HC Slavia Praha of the Czech Extraliga, two seasons with HC CSKA Moscow of the Russian Super League, and one season with Khimik Moscow Oblast, also of the Russian Super League. 
In July 2006, Hejda was traded to the Edmonton Oilers by the Sabres in exchange for a seventh-round draft pick. He was then signed to his first NHL contract by the Oilers, to a one-year deal the same week. 
Hejda resides in Denver, Colorado and is married to his wife Tereza with whom he has two children, a daughter, Natalia, and son, Matheas. He coached his son's youth team at the   9280 Pond Hockey Tournament in Keystone. He has the role of Director of Player Development of Europe/Western U.S. for Edge Sports Management. 
This biographical article related to association football in the Czech Republic, about a defender, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Lawrence E. Blume is the Distinguished Arts and Sciences Professor of Economics and Professor of Information Science at Cornell University, US. 
Blume was one of the general editors of The New Palgrave Dictionary of Economics, to which he contributed several articles on mathematical economics: Convexity, convex programming, and duality.  Currently he is the associate editor of the Journal of Economic Literature. 
Anne Charleston (born  30 December 1942) is an Australian-born actress, notable for her career locally and in the United Kingdom in theatre and television.  
Charleston's best known roles are the soap opera Neighbours as Madge Bishop and in British soap Emmerdale as Lily Butterfield, she had recurring roles in internationally  successful cult series drama Prisoner and its re-imaging series Wentworth 
Anne Charleston first became widely recognisable in Australia in the early 1970s on television, taking various guest roles in the Crawford Productions police dramas Homicide, Division 4 and Matlock Police. Other appearances included guest roles in other Crawford's adventure series Hunter (1967) and Ryan (1973), and in Network Ten-produced police drama The Long Arm (1971). 
Charleston had also enjoyed a busy career acting in the Australian theatre. With St. Martin's Theatre she acted in Wrong Side of the Park, The Irregular Verb, To Love, Angels in Love, A Far Country, The Anniversary, Invitation to a March, Eden House, The Cavern, Have you Any Dirty Washing Mother Dear, Blithe Spirit and Children's Day. 
She also appeared in J C Williamson's Woman in a Dressing Gown starring Googie Withers, Juggler's Three for the Melbourne Theatre Company Workshop, and The Secretary Bird starring Patrick Macnee. Other theatre includes Busybody, Port Wine, Night of the Ding Dong, Burst of Summer, Murder in the Cathedral, The Rivals, The Tower, Everyman, Antigone, The Man of Destiny, Otherwise Engaged and The Shifting Heart. 
In 1986, Charleston was cast as Madge Bishop (Mitchell) in the Australian soap opera Neighbours. Madge was a new character added to the series when it switched to Network Ten. The series became popular in Australia and the United Kingdom in the years following. Through the series Charleston became internationally recognised, and won a Penguin Award in 1987 for Best Actress. 
In 1989, Charleston took on the role of another 'Madge', Madge Allsop in an episode of The Dame Edna Experience on ITV in the UK, when Dame Edna Everage asked Doctor Christiaan Barnard to give her bridesmaid a face lift. Dame Edna didn't like Madge's new face, so asked the surgeon to reverse the operation restoring Emily Perry to the role. 
In 2013 Charleston played a role in the Prisoner remake, Wentworth. The role saw her portraying the mother-in-law of prisoner Lizzy Birdsworth. 
After leaving Neighbours for the first time, Charleston lived in Ireland for several years, and returned there after leaving the series again in 2001. With the high levels of popularity enjoyed by Neighbours in the UK, Charleston has now relaunched her career there, and has undertaken theatre and radio work in the UK and Ireland since leaving Neighbours in 2001, and is also a regular performer in pantomime. Also in 2001, she appeared on Lily Savage's Blankety Blank. 
She took the role of Dossa in comedy series Dossa and Joe and then had the regular role of Betty Waddell in the relaunched series of Crossroads in 2003. In 2004 she was a contestant in the second series of the Living TV reality television show, I'm Famous and Frightened! 
In 2005, she had cosmetic surgery performed on her neck, live on British television, on the Channel 5 programme, Cosmetic Surgery Live. In the same year, she also "regressed into a previous life", as a poor Irish farm girl, when she appeared in the programme Have I Been Here Before?. 
In late 2006 Charleston joined the cast of Emmerdale, originating the character of Lily Butterfield, the estranged sister of Edna Birch (Shirley Stelfox) who arrives to attend her great niece Eve's wedding blessing. Unbeknown to Edna and Lily, Edna's son Peter has invited them both to try to get them to make amends. However, a dark family secret will ensure their reunion does not run smoothly. 
Charleston has appeared in theatre roles both locally and internationally in her native Australia her theatre credits go back to the early 1960s 
In January 2010 it was announced that Charleston would be joining the touring production of Calendar Girls as Jessie (Miss January). 
In July 2012, it was revealed that Charleston would appear alongside Mischa Barton in an Irish stage production of Steel Magnolias. Charleston will play Ouiser Boudreaux in the production, which will premiere at the Gaiety Theatre, Dublin in September and will be followed by a nationwide tour. In August 2012, Charleston was a contestant on BBC TV's Celebrity Masterchef. 
In 2012, Charleston toured the UK in a production of The Cemetery Club alongside Anita Harris, Shirley Anne Field and Peter Ellis. 
National conservatism is a variant of conservatism common in Europe and North America that concentrates on upholding national and cultural identity, usually combining this nationalist concern with conservative stances promoting traditional values. 
The majority of conservative parties in post-communist Central and Eastern Europe since 1989 have been national conservative. 
National conservative parties are "socially traditional", and support the traditional family and social stability. According to the Austrian political scientist Sieglinde Rosenberger, "national conservatism praises the family as a home and a center of identity, solidarity, and tradition". Many national conservatives are thus social conservatives, as well as in favor of limiting immigration and enacting strict law-and-order policies. 
The following political parties have been characterised as national conservative, at least as one of their ideological influences. 
General elections were held in Dominica on 24 March 1975. The result was a victory for the Dominica Labour Party, which won 16 of the 21 seats. Voter turnout was 79.0%.  
The 296th traces its history back to the Spanish colonization of the Americas as an infantry militia constituted on May 17, 1762, as part of the reorganization of the Milicias Disciplinadas (English: "Disciplined Militias") decreed by Spain. However, on February 12, 1870, the militia were reduced to en cadre until their disbandment in April 1898 after Puerto Rico was ceded to the United States.[a] 
After WWII, the 296th simply served as the sister National Guard regiment of the 65th Infantry Regiment. With the outbreak of the Korean War in June 1950, the 65th Infantry Regiment was ordered to Korea. While the 65th Infantry Regiment was on its way, the 296th was mobilized on September 14, 1952, so that it could provide replacements to its sister company deployed in Korea, like many other National Guards did. 
Most recently, the 1st Battalion, 296th Infantry Regiment was deployed in 2002 in support of Operation Enduring Freedom as part of the Global War on Terrorism. It also deployed to the Iraq War while attached to the 3rd Armored Cavalry Regiment. 
U.S. Soldiers with the 1st Battalion, 296th Infantry Regiment, Puerto Rico Army National Guard, conduct a skills presentation at Camp Santiago Joint Maneuver Training Center, in Salinas, Puerto Rico, during a change of responsibility and retirement ceremony for the 1st Battalion, 296th Infantry Regiment senior enlisted advisor, Command Sgt. Maj. Angel Alvarado, April 27, 2013. 
A member of the Puerto Rico Army National Guard, Bravo Company, 1/296th Infantry Regiment patrols outside Camp Delta, December 8, 2010. The regiment is supporting the Joint Task Force Guantanamo mission. 
The overall concept of grammar-translation has been criticized since few verifiable sources support the existence of such a method until the 19th century. 
Users of foreign language want to note things of their interest in the literature of foreign languages. Therefore, this method focuses on reading and writing and has developed techniques which facilitate more or less the learning of reading and writing only. As a result, speaking and listening are overlooked. 
There is usually no listening or speaking practice, and very little attention is placed on pronunciation or any communicative aspects of the language.  The skill exercised is reading and then only in the context of translation. 
[T]hough it may be true to say that the Grammar-Translation Method is still widely practiced, it has no advocates. It is a method for which there is no theory. There is no literature that offers a rationale or justification for it or that attempts to relate it to issues in linguistics, psychology, or educational theory.
Laxmi Nagar is a village in the Nicobar district of Andaman and Nicobar Islands, India. It is located in the Great Nicobar tehsil. It is the location of India's southernmost land tip, Indira Point. 
Laxmi Nagar and Joginder Nagar were originally Shompen camping sites. The Shompens deserted the place when forests were cleared to make way for a village of ex-servicemen. 
According to the 2011 census of India, Laxmi Nagar has 13 households. The effective literacy rate (i.e. the literacy rate of population excluding children aged 6 and below) is 63.6%. 
Mike Hawker (born June 25, 1956) was a Republican member of the Alaska House of Representatives, representing the 28th District from 2003 to 2017. He served as Chair of the Legislative Council and  the Legislative Budget & Audit Committee. He is former Co-chair of the Finance Committee and Ways and Means Committees. Mike Hawker is also a retired Certified Public Accountant and an Accounting and Management Consultant. 
Mr. Hawker was born and raised in Manchester, Iowa, graduating from West Delaware High School. He received a Bachelor of Arts in Accounting and Humanities, and his public accountant certification from the University of Northern Iowa in 1979. 
Representative Hawker has a wife: Carol Carlson, the daughter of John Carlson, who was mayor of the Fairbanks North Star Borough from 1968 to 1982. 
A picket boat is a type of small naval craft. These are used for harbor patrol and other close inshore work, and have often been carried by larger warships as a ship's boat. They range in size between 30 and 55 feet. 
Patrol boats, or any craft engaged in sentinel duty, are sometimes referred to as picket boats, using "picket" in the generic sense, even if much larger than actual picket boats. 
GameChanger is a US-based technology company whose mobile app and website provide scorekeeping, stats, video streaming, and recap stories to teams and connected fans at the local level. The platform supports features for sports including baseball, softball, and basketball. 
Over 24 million games have been scored on GameChanger corresponding to over 500,000 active scoring teams across multiple sports in all age groups. 
GameChanger is free for coaches, scorekeepers and team admins. GameChanger uses the Freemium model to generate most of its revenue. Some content, such as live game scores and game stat overviews, is free and accessible to all with a GameChanger account. Premium Fan Content, such as a live GameStream of plays, box scores, season stats, recap stories, and in-game alerts, requires a monthly or yearly Fan Subscription. @gamechangerup42 
In June 2018, the company branched out to the clinic business following a new partnership with USA Baseball. GameChanger is currently led by Sameer Ahuja and is wholly owned by DICK'S Sporting Goods. 
GameChanger automatically calculates over 150 stats for baseball and softball teams. GameChanger is the first company to attempt to quantify the Quality At-Bat when it created its QAB stat. The QAB stat is a developmental stat that attempts to minimize the effect of luck while valuing the batting process over the results of the at-bat. 
This article about a railway station in the Indian state of West Bengal is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Being able to recognise enterprises as open, socio-technological, economic, multifaceted and networked systems, the IfU helps to describe and explain the complex phenomena which occur within these contexts. 
The Institute for Management Cybernetics e.V. (IfU) forms an institute cluster with the Center for Learning and Knowledge Management and the Department of Information Management in Mechanical Engineering at the RWTH Aachen University. 
The IfU carried out projects in several areas of expertise; these cover cost-effectiveness, micro and start-up enterprises, co-operations processes and change management and are explained below in more detail. 
Consequently, several projects profited from this method; NowBITs - investments in computing services were valued and a code of practice was compiled. AutoPreforms - the efficient manufacture of fibre reinforced composites in the car industry. 
Additionally, with the intent to help enterprises use limited resources more efficiently by converting relevant information into applicable knowledge, the IfU researches success factors in co-operations processes and co-ordinates corresponding joint projects. To illustrate the work carried out in this field, in project SENEKA (Service networks for Education and Further Education ) the IfU has co-ordinated the cross-sectional task of innovation management. 
Corina Newsome is an American ornithologist, birder, science communicator, and graduate student at Georgia Southern University. In response to the racism faced by Black birder Christian Cooper in Central Park, Newsome co-organized Black Birders Week to celebrate Black birders. 
Newsome grew up in Germantown, Philadelphia, and obtained her Bachelor of Arts in zoo and wildlife biology from Malone University in 2015. She was inspired to pursue a career in ornithology after learning about blue jays in her ornithology field class. Newsome is currently a graduate student at Georgia Southern University, focusing on avian conservation. 
Newsome worked as a zookeeper at the Nashville Zoo, where she specialised in outreach, environmental education, and training animals. She has also worked at the Philadelphia Zoo and Cleveland Metroparks Zoo. Currently, Newsome's graduate research is focused on studying the roles of climate change and predation on MacGillivray's seaside sparrows. 
Newsome developed the Pathway to Animal Care Careers program at the Nashville Zoo and served as the director of the Malone University Wildlife Careers Program to provide career exposure to high school students from low income backgrounds. 
Mount Lawit (Gunung Lawit) is a mountain on the island of Borneo. It is 1767 metres tall and sits on the international border between Indonesia and Malaysia. On the Indonesian side of the border, the mountain is within the Betung Kerihun National Park. 
Mercer is the only university of its size in the United States that offers programs in eleven diversified fields of study: liberal arts, business, education, music, engineering, medicine, nursing, pharmacy, law, theology, and continuing and professional studies. Mercer enrolls approximately 8,300 students in its eleven colleges and schools. 
When Green Bay Bombers and Madison Mad Dogs owner Keary Ecklund announced his intentions to start a new league in 1999, Indoor Football League (IFL), Shafer stood by him and proclaimed the Wildcats would be a part of the IFL. Although the Colorado Wildcats ceased operations, much of the roster and staff transitioned to become the Rocky Mountain Thunder, competing in the newly-formed Indoor Professional Football League (IPFL) for the 1999 season. 
Sangrampur railway station is a Kolkata Suburban Railway Station on the Diamond Harbour Branch line. It is under the jurisdiction of the Sealdah railway division in the Eastern Railway zone of the Indian Railways. Sangrampur railway station is situated beside Mandirbazar Road at Sangrampur, South 24 Parganas district in the Indian state of West Bengal. 
The platform is very much well sheltered. The station possesses many facilities including water and sanitation. There is a proper approach road to this station. 
This article about a railway station in the Indian state of West Bengal is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The 2018 Manila Stars season is the 1st season of the franchise in the Maharlika Pilipinas Basketball League (MPBL). 
Radio Feniks is a Bosnian local Commercial radio station, broadcasting from Bosanska Dubica/Kozarska Dubica, Bosnia and Herzegovina. 
Radio Feniks was founded on 6 May 1997 in Prijedor, where it operated until 22 February 2002 after which radio station was relocated to current location in Bosanska Dubica/Kozarska Dubica. 
Program is mainly produced in Serbian language at one FM frequency (Bosanska Dubica/Kozarska Dubica 94.7 MHz ) and it is available in the Bosanska Dubica/Kozarska Dubica area and in neighboring Croatia. 
Malawian athletes have so far achieved qualifying standards in the following athletics events (up to a maximum of 3 athletes in each event at the 'A' Standard, and 1 at the 'B' Standard). 
Veteran director K Balachander who has won several accolades for memorable films was part of his troupe where he acted and wrote scripts. The INA closed down a decade later and Raghavan entered the cinema world and acted in supporting roles. He has acted in around 1000 films and has also featured in many MGR films. He is also very well known for his role in the TV serial Anni created by K Balachander. 
In 1949 Fairweather started a band with his school friend Sandy Brown. In 1953 the pair went south to London with Stan Greig recorded a number of sides for Esquire Records as the Sandy Brown and the Fairweather-Brown All Stars. They performed at the Royal Festival Hall. 
When Brown went back to Scotland to finish his architecture studies, Fairweather joined the Cy Laurie Jazz Band.  From 1966 to 1968, he worked for clarinetist Acker Bilk. Following a second career as a teacher in Harrow, London, Fairweather returned to Edinburgh in 1987, where he remained and played until his death in 1993 at the age of 66. 
This article about a jazz musician from the United Kingdom is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Murray was the second son of John Murray, 3rd Duke of Atholl. He was Archdeacon of Man from 1787 to 1801.  On 19 November 1800, Murray was nominated bishop of St. David's. He was elected on 6 December, confirmed on 7 and consecrated on 11 February 1801.  He caught a chill waiting for his carriage on leaving the House of Lords, and died at Cavendish Square on 3 June 1803. 
The James H. Bolton House is a historic house located at 117 West Washington Street in Bath, Steuben County, New York. 
It was built in 1909, and is a 2 1/2-story, Queen Anne style frame dwelling. It is sheathed in clapboard and has a cross-gable roof with roof brackets and scalloped shingles on the gable ends. It features a broad porch with a square spindle balustrade between equally spaced rounded columns with Doric order capitals. 
This article about a historic property or district  in Steuben County, New York, that is listed on the National Register of Historic Places, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The peninsula and surrounding sand bars that now form the Toronto Islands were surveyed in 1792 by Lieutenant Joseph Bouchette of the Royal Navy. D.W. Smith's Gazetteer recorded in 1813 that "the long beach or peninsula, which affords a most delightful ride, is considered so healthy by the Indians that they resort to it whenever indisposed". Many Indigenous communities were located between the peninsula's base and the Don River. The peninsula was actually a series of many sand spits and ponds. 
During the 1790s, the British built the first buildings on the island. The Gibraltar Point Blockhouse and storage structures were built at Gibraltar Point in 1794. The garrison was known as the Blockhouse Bay garrison, and it supported the garrison on the mainland. By 1800, another blockhouse and a guard house were built. These were destroyed in the Battle of York. Another garrison was built, but it was abandoned by 1823 and demolished in 1833. 
In 1899, there was a colony of eight summer tenants on Ward's Island paying $10 rent for the season. By 1913, the number of tents pitched had increased to the point where the city felt it necessary to organize the community into streets, and the tents eventually evolved into a seasonal cottage community. 
In 1894, a land reclamation project by the Toronto Ferry Company created space for an amusement park at Hanlan's Point. In 1897, the Hanlan's Point Stadium was built alongside the amusement park for the Toronto Maple Leaf baseball team. The stadium was rebuilt several times over the years, and in 1914, Babe Ruth hit his first professional home run into the waters of Lake Ontario from this stadium. In the 1920s, the Maple Leaf team moved to a new stadium on the mainland. 
From 1915 to 1916, a temporary wooden hangar was built at the beach by the Curtiss Flying School. This floatplane aerodrome was used for flight training for World War I. 
In 1852, a storm flooded sand pits on the peninsula, creating a channel east of Ward's Island. The channel was widened and made permanent by a violent storm on April 13, 1858. The channel became known as the Eastern Gap. The peninsula to the west became known as the Toronto Islands. To the east of the Gap, the area of today's Cherry Beach was known as "Fisherman's Island". 
A community of about 300 homes is located on the Toronto Islands, concentrated at the eastern end of the island chain on Ward's Island and Algonquin Island. Under the terms of the Toronto Islands Residential Community Stewardship Act there are strict rules under provincial law governing the buying and selling of these homes. 
Artscape Gibraltar Point (formerly The Gibraltar Point Centre for the Arts) occupies buildings previously used by the Toronto Island Public School, and comprises more than 15 artist work studios occupied by a mix of painters, ceramists, sculptors, musicians, theatre companies, and a recording studio. The centre provides a long and short-term studio and bedroom rental service for artists, together with meeting, conference and special event services and an artist residency program. 
Centreville Amusement Park is a children's amusement park which was built in 1967 with a 1900s-style turn-of-the-century theme. The park includes a miniature railway and an antique carousel and is open daily in summer. The Far Enough Farm is nearby and displays common farm livestock and birds. The Franklin's Garden children's garden was created in the 2000s and is located to the west of the Avenue of the Islands. A splash pad, hedge maze, and playground is also located nearby. 
On the western side of Ward's Island is a world-class flying disc golf course. There are public tennis courts located at Hanlan's Point and a community tennis club at the Ward's Island Tennis Club. 
Until 2007, Caribana held an annual arts festival at Olympic Island on the August long weekend. Other Island events include the Olympic Island Festival, an annual rock concert held from 2004 until 2010. It was initiated in 2004 by Sloan's Jay Ferguson. The Wakestock festival has also been held on the islands. Starting in 1975, the Canadian Open Frisbee Championships were held on Olympic and Ward's Island. 
Other TDSB schools attended by students that live on the Island include The Waterfront School, Jarvis Collegiate Institute, Central Technical School, Central Commerce Collegiate Institute, and Northern Secondary School. However, these schools are located on the mainland. 
In addition to the TDSB, three other public school boards also provide schooling for residents of Toronto Islands, Conseil scolaire catholique MonAvenir (CSCM), Conseil scolaire Viamonde (CSV), and Toronto Catholic District School Board (TCDSB). CSV is a public French first language secular school board. CSCM, and TCDSB are public separate school boards, the former being a French first language school board, the latter being an English first language school board. 
There is no fixed road link from the mainland to the Toronto Islands, which therefore rely on ferries, water taxis and other boats for their transport needs. 
In addition to the public ferry services, several yacht clubs and marinas located on the islands provide private tender services for their members and guests. In June 2017, Centreville purchased a used ferry boat, the Dartmouth III, from Halifax Transit in Nova Scotia and planned to operate its own service, Toronto Island Transit Service, to supplement the public ferry. The ferry arrived in Toronto but due to flooding and the pandemic, it was never used to bring passengers across the harbour. 
There are fewer restrictions on motor vehicles on the airport lands, with a vehicular ferry providing access to parking lots and service access at the airport, however there is no public road access from the airport lands to the rest of the islands. 
The Toronto Islands have appeared as significant settings in Canadian literature. Examples include Margaret Atwood's The Robber Bride and Robert Rotenberg's Old City Hall. 
The novel Heyday, by Marnie Woodrow, has two narratives, one set on Ward's Island in the present day, and the other set on Hanlan's in 1909. 
In Take This Waltz, a 2011 film by Canadian director Sarah Polley, the main character Margot (Michelle Williams) rides the Scrambler at the Centreville Amusement Park. 
The second season of Sensitive Skin is set predominantly on the islands when the main character, Davina moves to a houseboat located on the islands. 
Canadian singer-songwriter Jordan Paul composed his song Ward's Island, inspired by and during a visit to the island.  The song was subsequently recorded with Jon Anderson, producer of Aidan Knight and Said The Whale. 
After three years at the Air Ministry in London, he was trained as a pilot before going as Chief Engineering Instructor at the RAF Cadet College at Cranwell. He then went on a guided weapons course with the Army at Shrivenham. In 1953 he became Project Officer responsible for the Thunderbird missile at the Royal Aircraft Establishment. After a course at the RAF Staff College, he was posted to Los Angeles as Ballistic Missile Liaison Officer at the USAF Missile Division there. 
In retirement he became a Technical Director with W. S. Atkins. He was a Member of the Board of the Council of Engineering Institutions from 1980 to 1984 and vice-chairman from 1983 to 1984. He stood as a Social Democrat for the constituency of Bury St Edmunds in the 1983 and 1987 elections. He lived in the town and was President of the Bury St Edmunds Society, a local preservation group. He died on 30 July 2013. 
In 1942 he married Doreen Romanis, born in Harley Street, the daughter of the well known surgeon W H C Romanis, and elder sister of comedian Tony Hancock's first wife. Lady Harland died in November 2011. 
Sir Reginald and Lady Harland had three sons (one of whom is deceased) and two daughters (one of whom is deceased). 
He was the great-nephew of British shipbuilder, Sir Edward Harland, and a relative of geologist, W. Brian Harland. 
Five Directorates is a general term referring to the 5 service agencies in the central government during the Sui, Tang, and Song dynasties of China, other than the Nine Courts. 
"Don't Waste the Pretty" is the third single by Allison Iraheta of her debut album Just Like You. It was written by Michael Dennis Smith, Stefanie Ridel, Miriam Nervo and Olivia Nervo and was produced by Howard Benson. The single version of the song, featuring Orianthi on guitar, made its online debut on EW.com and Zap2it.com on June 2, 2010 and was released digitally on June 8, 2010. It was released to radio stations on June 22, 2010. 
Iraheta performed the original version of "Don't Waste the Pretty" on Lopez Tonight on Wednesday, May 26, 2010 and the acoustic version of the song on Z100 New York on June 22, 2010. She performed the track with Orianthi and Adam Lambert on the Glam Nation Tour in 2010.  Iraheta and Orianthi performed the song on the Thursday, July 29, 2010 results episode of So You Think You Can Dance. 
AOL Radio writer Matthew Wilkening writes that "Orianthi's soloing adds dramatic tension to the country-tinged, mid-tempo pop song as Iraheta advises a friend not to take verbal abuse from her partner" 
Rodney Ho from the Atlanta Journal Constitution calls Iraheta "a really talented singer" and hopes "that radio embraces this song, which is pretty catchy," adding that "top 40 program directors should give it a spin." 
Zap2it Blogger Andrea Reiher praises the new version of the song, writing "We already loved this song, but it's even better with Orianthi's sick guitar licks in the accompaniment." 
There is no official music video for 'Don't Waste the Pretty'. However, Jive did release a video titled The Journey to Don't Waste the Pretty. This video is backstage footage of Iraheta, her band and Orianthi. It is intercut with scenes of Iraheta performing the song on stage at different gigs (which is in sync with the track).[citation needed] 
The original version of "Don't Waste the Pretty" appears on Iraheta's debut album "Just Like You" as the fourth track and does not feature Orianthi. 
Iraheta has also performed the song acoustically on Entertainment Weekly's online show "Realite", Yahoo! Music, Radio Disney and Z100 New York. She released the acoustic version of the song for download on June 8, 2010. 
Restraint is a 2008 Australian thriller film, directed by David Denneen, written by Dave Warner and starring Stephen Moyer, Travis Fimmel and Teresa Palmer. The film was shot on location around New South Wales, Australia in mid-2005. Working titles during production were Ravenswood, Guests and Power Surge. It also features a cameo by Vanessa Redgrave. 
Two fugitives from justice, Dale (Teresa Palmer) and Ron (Travis Fimmel), take hostage Andrew (Stephen Moyer), an agoraphobic art dealer who might have a dark past of his own.  All three soon find themselves participants in a game of survival. 
While Dale is gone, Andrew tells Ron that Gabrielle had left him after having an affair with his father and being paid by him to leave; he subsequently hired a hit man to kill his father.  To persuade Ron to leave him alive, he offers leverage in the form of a photo that proves he had his father killed.  While allegedly retrieving the photo, Andrew manages to lock Ron in the cellar, but Ron escapes and regains the upper hand. 
Dale returns and the couple prepare to leave.  Ron again makes a move to kill Andrew; Dale, who has been partly seduced by Andrew and his way of life, grabs their shotgun and shoots at Ron, without realizing that he has left the gun unloaded.  Ron knocks Dale out and leaves her in a locked car filling with exhaust, sadistically goading Andrew into braving his agoraphobia in order to save her.  Andrew manages to save her and wound Ron; reviving, Dale deals Ron a death blow. 
Over half the budget came from the Film Finance Corporation. The film was shot in late 2005 near Goulburn and Camden in New South Wales, originally using the title Guests, then Ravenswood. Stephen Moyer was imported from the United Kingdom to support his two Australian co-stars. 
The film was originally meant to be released in May 2006 by Accent Entertainment. Multiple test screenings resulted in the film's running time being reduced from 120 to 90 minutes, and the ending being changed to something more ambiguous. It eventually screened in one cinema in Sydney in April 2009. 
The Maranatha Living Hope Academy, commonly known as Maranatha or simply MLHA, is a private non-sectarian school located at Barangay Malusak, Santa Rosa City, Laguna, Philippines. 
This article related to a location in Kapurthala district, Punjab, India is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Marcus was born in Philadelphia in 1958 and grew up in a Jewish family in Livingston, New Jersey. Both her parents were pharmacists. She attended school in Livingston with and has remained a close friend of fellow columnist Mona Charen. She studied at Yale University where she wrote for the college newspaper. 
After receiving her Yale B.A. degree, Marcus wrote for the National Law Journal, before attending Harvard Law School, from which she received her J.D. degree  in 1984. 
Marcus began writing for The Washington Post while still in law school, and formally joined the paper after graduation. 
Marcus has been with The Post since 1984. She joined the national staff in 1986, covering campaign finance, the Justice Department, the Supreme Court and the White House. From 1999 through 2002, she served as deputy national editor, supervising reporters who covered money and politics, Congress, the Supreme Court, and other national issues. She joined the editorial board in 2003 and began writing a regular column in 2006.
Marcus is married to former Federal Trade Commission Chairman Jon Leibowitz, a Democrat. The couple have two daughters, Emma and Julia. 
Von Sabinin worked at a hospital from 1876 to 1878 during the Russo-Turkish War and afterward entered a nunnery of the Tsarist Sisters of the Annunciation. She became an abbess, founded hospitals herself, and died in 1892 in the Crimea. 
Nick Carter-Killmaster is a series of spy adventures published from 1964 until 1990, first by Award Books, then by Ace Books, and finally by Jove Books. At least 261 novels were published.  The character is an update of a pulp fiction private detective named Nick Carter, first published in 1886. 
Carter served as a soldier in World War II, then with the OSS, before he joined his current employer AXE. 
Carter practices yoga for at least 15 minutes a day. Carter has a prodigious ability for learning foreign languages. He is fluent in English (his native tongue), Cantonese, French, German, Greek, Hungarian, Italian, Portuguese, Putonghua (Mandarin), Russian, Sanskrit, Spanish and Vietnamese. He has basic skills in Arabic, Hindi, Japanese, Korean, Romansch, Swahili, and Turkish. In the early novels, Carter often assumes a number of elaborate disguises in order to execute his missions. 
Carter has used a variety of equipment in the novels, most of which have nicknames. These have included: 
In the first novel in the series (Run, Spy, Run), AXE is described as comprising 24 agents. They are identified by alpha-numeric code. The following agents/codes have been described: 
Benoist's fame grew after he exhibited forty-three wax figurines of the French Royal Circle at his residence in Paris. Thereafter, the king authorized the figurines to be shown throughout France. His work became so highly regarded that James II of England invited him to visit England in 1684. There he executed works of the English king and members of his royal court. 
The Roseburg Shamrocks were a minor league baseball team based in Roseburg, Oregon in 1904. The Roseburg Shamrocks played as  members of the Class D level Oregon State League, disbanding during the season.  
Roseburg, Oregon hosted early baseball clubs, with the first Roseburg baseball team forming in 1867. 
On June 4, 1904, a game between Albany and Roseburg teams required the teams to travel to the Vaughn Street baseball field in Portland in order to play their doubleheader, due to a facility issue. 
The name of the Roseburg minor league home ballpark is not referenced. Sources indicate both River Front Park and Gaddis City Park were in existence during the era. 
He was educated at Brasenose College, Oxford, and became curate of Bideford. He then became minister of St. Martin's Church in Exeter. He was vicar of St Mary's Church, Totnes from 1675 until 1681, when, at the invitation of the Duke of Somerset, he was made vicar of St Mary's Church, Berry Pomeroy, a post he held for over forty years. Here he seems to have authorised much building work, as the church and vicarage have several period features.[citation needed] 
The Dumnonii, Danmonii or Dumnones were a British Celtic tribe which inhabited Dumnonia, the peninsula now containing in its west the county of Cornwall and in its east Devon. Prince's Latin title signifies "Illustrious Eastern Dumnonii". 
A further edition was published in 1810 by Edward Upham, Exeter and Longman and Hurst, Rees and Orme, London, printed for Rees and Curtis, Plymouth. It was inscribed to "The Right Hon. Hugh, Earl Fortescue, Viscount Ebrington and Baron Fortescue of Castle Hill, Lord-Lieutenant and Custos Rotulorum of the County of Devon", whose "ancestors claim a distinguished place" in the work. It was funded by subscription, with a list of subscribers included after the list of contents. 
The Most Worshipful Grand Lodge of Free and Accepted Masons of the Philippines is the organizational body that governs Freemasonry in the Philippines.  It currently has its offices at the Plaridel Masonic Temple, a historic building in Ermita, Manila. 
In 1912, three American Lodges owing allegiance to the Most Worshipful Grand Lodge of California were already established in the Philippines. Those were Manila Lodge No. 342, Cavite Lodge No. 350 and Corregidor Lodge No. 386. The three lodges held a meeting on November 17, 1912 to fix a date for the First Convention of the delegates selected and to be selected for the purpose of considering the organization of a Grand Lodge. 
As of 2017, the Grand Lodge of the Philippines has approximately 19,000 members, spread over 375 lodges. 
The station has two unnumbered opposed side platforms serving two tracks. Automatic ticket vending machines are not installed, and tickets are only issued by POS terminals. 
The station opened on 28 December 1951. With the privatization of Japanese National Railways (JNR) on 1 April 1987, the station came under the control of JR West. 
According to the Kyoto Prefecture statistical book, the average number of passengers per day is as follows.[citation needed] 
To someone familiar with both the Italian and the U.S. college systems, Italian grades are best translated into American grades (and vice versa) according to the following table: 
In Italian primary and secondary school a 10-point scale is used, 6 being the minimum grade for passing. 
For ordinary exams, universities in Italy use a 30-point scale that can be divided into failing (0 to 17) and passing (18 to 30 cum laude) grades. For final assessment of the entire degree, a 110-point scale is used, which is divided into two as well, with 66 being the minimum for a degree to be awarded. The 110-point scale incorporates scores both on course exams and for the final thesis. For outstanding results, lode, "praise" or "cum laude," is added to the maximum grade. 
Heavy Love is an album by the American blues musician Buddy Guy, released in 1998. It was nominated for a Grammy Award, in the "Best Contemporary Blues Album" category. 
Produced by David Z, the album was recorded in Nashville. In an attempt to get the album played on popular radio, Guy added synthetic drums and tape loops to some tracks. 
Entertainment Weekly wrote that the album focuses on "tight songs, concise, off-kilter solos, funk-tinged grooves, and impassioned vocals." The Daily Herald called "Did Somebody Make a Fool Outta You" "a mesmerizing piece of fretwork and utter soul." The Chicago Tribune opined that "the methodical finale, 'Let Me Show You', showcases the singer's soft, tearful, underrated voice." 
AllMusic thought that "purists will cringe at the unabashed commercial concessions," but acknowledged that "Heavy Love works well when compared to the modern electric blues of the post-Stevie Ray Vaughan era, especially since Guy once again contributes some scorching solos." (The New) Rolling Stone Album Guide deemed the album "refreshingly modern, if uneven." 
The Babysitter is a novel series by R. L. Stine. The first novel in the series was published in 1989, and it led to establish Stine as a prominent author in the children's horror genre. The first novel follows a simple premise of a babysitter who finds she is the next in a series of babysitting victims to a crazed killer. Three sequels of this book were published: The Babysitter II on July 1991, The Babysitter III on October 1993 and The Babysitter IV on June 1995. 
Jenny Jeffers, a sixteen-year-old girl, takes a babysitting job for a child named Donny. While babysitting, she gets menacing phone calls from someone and finds a threatening note in her backpack. She soon figures out that Donny's father, Mr. Hagen, was the one making those calls after finding a stash of newspaper clippings in his closet. Apparently, Donny had a sister when he was younger, but she died in an accident when a previous babysitter wasn't paying attention to her. 
It was listed as the 37th most enjoyable book for boys and girls in a 1997 survey on literacy. In their positive review of the novel, Publishers Weekly felt that Stine effectively built suspense and created an intriguing cast of characters. 
After being released from a mental institution, Jenny Jeffers moves to another town and reluctantly accepts a new baby-sitting job next door in an attempt to finally put her dark past behind her by overcoming her fear. When unexplainable events begin to happen, she begins to fear her dark past has come back to haunt her. However, in an entirely different plot outline, she is terrorized by two murderous ghost children. 
A station was a defensible residence constructed on the American frontier during the late 18th and early 19th century. 
Many of these structures were built on the Kentucky frontier during the struggle with the British and Native Americans. According to Virginia law, settled land had to be surveyed, a corn crop planted and a dwelling built. On the frontier, this building had to be fortified. 
The home, often called a station, but could be called a fort in other regions, was usually built of logs and were supplied only while hostilities were continuing. Families often maintained a station and visitors were always welcome, since in numbers there was strength. Veterans were given land grants after the American Revolution, and many built a station to secure the area. 
The purpose for stations in Kentucky was for protection, since most Native Americans at the time supported the British and often attacked the settlers. 
This article about a building or structure in Kentucky is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
It is located on the A488 outside the large village of Pontesbury, southwest of Shrewsbury. The population as taken at the 2011 census can be found under Pontesbury. 
It approximates to the northern extremity of the Pontesford-Linley geological fault, which trends approximately 11 miles to Linley near Bishops Castle. On 2 April 1990, the Pontesford-Linley Fault - registered an earthquake with a magnitude of 5.1 on the Richter scale, known as the Bishop's Castle earthquake. Coal was mined there in the 19th century. 
Ferrante de Gemmis was born in Terlizzi, near Bari. His parents were the Baron Tommaso de Gemmis and Francesca Bruni. 
He was educated in Naples where he graduated in law. He inherited the properties of his uncle Minister Ferrante Maddalena.  
De Gemmis was a friend of the philosopher and political economist Antonio Genovesi. He founded an Academy in Terlizzi becoming the primary exponent of Illuminism in the region of Apulia. He refused to become a judge so he could continue writing about philosophy even though he wrote in anonymity for modesty. 
Cary Angeline (born September 8, 1997) is an American football tight end who is a free agent. He played college football for USC and NC State and was signed by the Arizona Cardinals as an undrafted free agent in 2021. 
After going unselected in the 2021 NFL Draft, Angeline was signed by the Arizona Cardinals as an undrafted free agent. He was waived on August 10. 
On August 22, 2021, Angeline was signed by the Philadelphia Eagles. He was waived again on August 29. 
Angeline has multiple family members who played football. His grandfather Fran played for Colgate, father Chris played for Columbia, uncle Larry played for Mansfield, uncle Jerry played for Hobart, and brother Ryley played for Delaware. 
The suprachiasmatic nucleus or nuclei (SCN) is a tiny region of the brain in the hypothalamus, situated directly above the optic chiasm. It is responsible for controlling circadian rhythms. The neuronal and hormonal activities it generates regulate many different body functions in a 24-hour cycle. The mouse SCN contains approximately 20,000 neurons. 
The SCN interacts with many other regions of the brain. It contains several cell types and several different peptides (including vasopressin and vasoactive intestinal peptide) and neurotransmitters. 
The SCN is situated in the anterior part of the hypothalamus immediately dorsal, or superior (hence supra) to the optic chiasm (CHO) bilateral to (on either side of) the third ventricle. 
The nucleus can be divided into ventrolateral and dorsolateral portions, also known as the core and shell, respectively. These regions differ in their expression of the clock genes, the core expresses them in response to stimuli whereas the shell expresses them constitutively. 
In terms of projections, the core receives innervation via three main pathways, the retinohypothalamic tract, geniculohypothalamic tract, and projections from some Raphe nuclei. Dorsomedial SCN is mainly innervated by the core and also by other hypothalamic areas. Lastly, its output is mainly to the subparaventricular zone and dorsomedial hypothalamic nucleus which both mediate the influence SCN exerts over circadian regulation of the body. 
The SCN sends information to other hypothalamic nuclei and the pineal gland to modulate body temperature and production of hormones such as cortisol and melatonin.[citation needed] 
Some of the others are the lateral geniculate nucleus (LGN), the superior colliculus, the basal optic system, and the pretectum: 
The circadian rhythm in the SCN is generated by a gene expression cycle in individual SCN neurons. This cycle has been well conserved through evolution and in essence is similar in cells from many widely different organisms that show circadian rhythms. For example, although fruit flies (like all invertebrates) do not have an SCN, the cycle is largely similar to that of mammals. It is currently thought that all animals share a common root in their circadian rhythm. 
In the fruitfly Drosophila, the cellular circadian rhythm in neurons is controlled by two interlocked feedback loops. 
The 24-hour rhythm could be reset by light via the protein cryptochrome (CRY), which is involved in the circadian photoreception in Drosophila. CRY associates with TIM in a light-dependent manner that leads to the destruction of TIM. Without the presence of TIM for stabilization, PER is eventually destroyed during the day. As a result, the repression of CLK-CYC is reduced and the whole cycle reinitiates again. 
CLOCK (circadian locomotor output cycles kaput) was first cloned in mouse and BMAL1 (brain and muscle aryl hydrocarbon receptor nuclear translocator (ARNT)-like 1) is the primary homolog of Drosophila CYC. 
Three homologs of PER (PER1, PER2, and PER3) and two CRY homologs (CRY1 and CRY2) have been identified. 
TIM has been identified in mammals; however, its function is still not determined. Mutations in TIM result in an inability to respond to zeitgebers, which is essential for resetting the biological clock.[citation needed] 
Recent research suggests that, outside the SCN, clock genes may have other important roles as well, including their influence on the effects of drugs of abuse such as cocaine. 
Neurons in the SCN fire action potentials in a 24-hour rhythm. At mid-day, the firing rate reaches a maximum, and, during the night, it falls again. How the gene expression cycle (so-called the core clock) connects to the neural firing remains unknown.[citation needed] 
The soundtrack for the 1997 film Anna Karenina, directed by Bernard Rose, was conformed of several Russian classical and traditional musical pieces. The music was performed by the St. Petersburg Philharmonic Orchestra, under the baton of Sir Georg Solti. The film's score was composed by Stewart Copeland. 
The score makes a prominent use of Tchaikovsky's Symphony No. 6 being used in pivotal scenes from the film. Sir Georg Solti and Bernard Rose agreed that this Symphony portrayed Anna Karenina's story perfectly, since the music contained several movements, from excessively cheerful allegros to exaggerated tragic adagios, that contained parallels to Anna's story. 
At the Quebec Conference of September 1944, the British Prime Minister Winston Churchill proposed to transfer a large part of Bomber Command to the Pacific, comprising from 500 to 1,000 heavy bombers, once Nazi Germany was defeated. US President Franklin D. Roosevelt accepted the offer, stating that a "long and costly struggle" still lay ahead of the Allies. 
RCAF Lancasters planned for inclusion in Tiger Force departed RAF Middleton St George on 31 May 1945 for modification in Canada prior to deployment in the Pacific Theatre. Before VJ Day, 141 RCAF Lancasters made the trip to RCAF Station Moncton for modification to Tiger Force requirements. 
Two RAF fighter squadrons had begun converting to the new Hawker Tempest II at RAF Chilbolton, in order to perform escort duties, when the war ended. Escorts would also have been available from the fighter units of the U.S. Far East Air Force, the Australian First Tactical Air Force and/or other Commonwealth units. 
The colour scheme for Tiger Force aircraft was white upper-surfaces with black undersides; this scheme, developed to reflect sunlight and thus lower the internal temperatures in the tropical heat, despite the cancellation of operations against Japan, was apparent on many post-war Lancasters and Lincolns. To enable the aircraft to operate at the long distances involved, flight refuelling using Liberator tankers was to have been employed, using equipment developed by Flight Refuelling Ltd. 
Tiger Force was officially disbanded on 31 October 1945, by which stage it included only British units. 
Eight presidents of the United States have made presidential visits to North Africa. The first trips by a sitting president to countries in North Africa were those of Franklin D. Roosevelt, and were an offshoot of Allied diplomatic interactions during World War II. Of the five countries in the region, only Libya has not yet been visited by an American president. 
Scrivener and Gregory dated the manuscript to the 13th century. Currently the manuscript is dated by the INTF to the 13th century. 
It was added to the list of New Testament manuscript by Scrivener (532) and Gregory (681). It was examined by North, Guildford. 
The manuscript was acquired along with seven other manuscripts (556, 676, 677, 678, 679, 680, and 682) by the late Sir Thomas Phillips, at Middle Hill in Worcestershire. 
Formerly it was housed at the Sotheby's, and it is the last known place of housing of this manuscript. The place of its actual housing is unknown. 
This Perry County, Kentucky state location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Gilgo-Oak Beach-Captree, frequently just called Oak Beach, was a census-designated place (CDP) in Suffolk County, New York within the Town of Babylon. The population was 333 at the 2000 census. 
Prior to the 2020 census, the Oak Beach-Captree CDP was further split into the Oak Beach and Captree CDPs. 
There were 161 households, out of which 14.9% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 50.9% were married couples living together, 6.2% had a female householder with no husband present, and 41.0% were non-families. 34.8% of all households were made up of individuals, and 11.8% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.07 and the average family size was 2.64. 
In the CDP, the population was spread out, with 13.5% under the age of 18, 1.5% from 18 to 24, 28.8% from 25 to 44, 34.8% from 45 to 64, and 21.3% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 48 years. For every 100 females, there were 109.4 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 100.0 males. 
The median income for a household in the CDP was $66,250, and the median income for a family was $105,870. Males had a median income of $61,250 versus $37,083 for females. The per capita income for the CDP was $55,813. None of the families and 0.9% of the population were living below the poverty line, including no under eighteens and none of those over 64. 
The census numbers are presumably for full-time inhabitants; many of these houses are second homes and not primary residences, although the proportion of seasonal residents is decreasing. 
The land for these communities is not privately owned, but leased from the State of New York through the year 2050.  However, the residences on the property are owned.  If the leases are not renewed at some point in the future, the owners will have to move the houses elsewhere, similar to what happened at High Hill Beach when Jones Beach was created. 
Annett Davis (born September 22, 1973) is an American beach volleyball player, who won the silver medal at the 1999 Beach Volleyball World Championships, alongside Jenny Johnson Jordan. 
In 1999, she and Johnson Jordan were the winningest USA men's or women's pro beach volleyball team with over $200,000 in winnings. 
Davis currently resides in Valencia, California with husband Byron and two children, Mya (born 2001) and Victoria (born 2005). 
This biographical article relating to volleyball in the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
 The Loves of Ariane is a 1931 British-German drama film directed by Paul Czinner starring Elisabeth Bergner, Charles Carson and Percy Marmont. It was an English-language version of the 1931 film Ariane. It was based on the 1920 novel Ariane, jeune fille russe by Claude Anet. The screenplay concerns a young woman studying at University who falls in love with Don Juan.  A German version of the film, Ariane was also made. 
This article related to a British film of the 1930s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article related to a German film of the 1930s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
It can be distinguished from all other Perigonia species by the uniform grey forewing upperside crossed by narrow, dark brown transverse lines. The hindwing upperside is most similar to Perigonia stulta but the yellow tornal patch is larger. 
In parliament, Pauget serves on the Committee on Economic Affairs. In addition to his committee assignments, he is part of the French-Israeli Parliamentary Friendship Group. 
In 2018, Pauget joined the leadership of Soyons Libres, where he is in charge of relations with the National Assembly. 
He was born the 2nd son of Robert Kirton (d. c.1565) of Wells, Somerset and educated at New Inn and the Middle Temple (1585), where he was called to the bar in 1596. He was Recorder of Wells from 1601 to 1610. 
He died by February 1611. He had married in 1599, Elizabeth, the daughter of Sir John Rodney of Pilton and Rodney Stoke, Somerset, with whom he had 3 sons and 2 daughters. 
This article about a 17th-century Member of the Parliament of England (up to 1707) is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Heliomata infulata, the rare spring moth, is a species of geometrid moth in the family Geometridae. It is found in North America. 
After the abdication of Charles II, the Seventeen Provinces went to the Spanish branch of the House of Habsburg. 
After the death of Philip VI the Seventeen Provinces returned to the Austrian branch of the House of Habsburg. 
The Myjava River is a river in western Slovakia and for a small part in the Czech Republic and left tributary of the Morava River. 
This article related to a river in the Czech Republic is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Elections to the Cumbernauld and Kilsyth District Council took place in May 1992, alongside elections to the councils of Scotland's various other districts. 
Following his father's steps, he also received a law degree from Tulane University Law School after completing his undergraduate at Centenary College of Louisiana. 
Wellborn Jack practiced law with his brother, George Whitfield Jack, Jr., who served as a colonel under General Matthew B. Ridgeway in World War II. He later founded the law firm, Jack & Jack, with his son, Wellborn Jack, Jr. (born 1936). Jack, Jr., a specialist in employment and labor law, recalls that his father had little interest in genealogy and said, "What matters most is not what you sprang from but what you sprang at." 
Just weeks after taking his oath of office as a state representative, Jack, along with the former mayor of Minden, J. Frank Colbert, ran unsuccessfully for Louisiana's 4th congressional district seat in the United States House of Representatives. He was eliminated from the runoff election, with victory claimed by the three-term incumbent Overton Brooks, also of Shreveport. 
Like virtually all of the Shreveport-area politicians during the 1950s, Jack was known for his fervent support of racial segregation. In 1956, he opposed a bill which would have exempted the Sugar Bowl in New Orleans from the state ban on "interracial activities". He supported a bill to require the labeling of blood by race of the donor. The raising of the Confederate flag at the Caddo Parish Courthouse embodied the sentiments of white segregationists of Jack's era. 
Jack's House tenure extended from the administrations of Governors Sam Houston Jones to the second term of Jimmie Davis. During his long career in the House, Jack served alongside numerous colleagues who reached the highest point in state politics, including Taddy Aycock, Bill Dodd, C. H. "Sammy" Downs, John McKeithen, Louis J. Michot, deLesseps Story Morrison, Sr.,  Dave L. Pearce, and William M. Rainach, along with his Caddo colleagues Algie D. Brown, Frank Fulco, and James C. Gardner. 
Days after U.S. President Lyndon B. Johnson signed into law the Civil Rights Act of 1964, Jack wrote a letter to the former Shreveport Journal reaffirming his own belief in segregation: "The white man and the Negro man are happy with their lot here in this area ..." 
From 1976 to 1984, Jack was an elected member of the final two terms of the former Caddo Parish Police Jury, the parish governing body. He lost his position on the police jury, when it was reorganized in 1984 as the Caddo Parish Commission. 
Galaxy Star is a singing competition television series broadcast in Myanmar on MRTV-4. The first season of Galaxy Star began airing on 7 April 2017, and has air weekly on Friday evenings at 9:15 on MRTV-4 Channel through September 2017. The series is produced by JBJ Entertainment , in collaboration with Samsung. 
The judges of the first season include notable Burmese musicians, namely Graham, Pho Ka, Sung Thin Par,  Phyu Phyu Kyaw Thein, and J-Me. Korean musicians and artists, namely Kim Hyung-suk, Daehyun of B.A.P (South Korean band), and Minzy, served as guest judges during the first season's Korea Training Camp mission. 
The Brandeis-Bardin Campus of American Jewish University is a Jewish retreat located since 1947 in the northeastern Simi Hills, in the city of Simi Valley, California.  Formerly known as the Brandeis-Bardin Institute, it is used for nondenominational summer programs for children, teens, and young adults. 
The Brandeis-Bardin Institute was founded in 1941 by Shlomo Bardin, inspired by the ideals of the early Zionist movement and the ideas and financial support of Justice Louis Brandeis.  In the 1950s, BBI was known as Brandeis Camp Institute (BCI), with Shlomo Bardin as the Director. The institute branched out into a program for college-aged Jews, now called Brandeis Collegiate Institute, and a summer and winter camp for young people named Alonim. 
In 1968 actor James Arness (of Gunsmoke) donated his entire campus adjacent Simi Hills ranch to the Brandeis Bardin Institute, making it the largest parcel of land owned by a Jewish institution outside the State of Israel. 
Founder Dr. Shlomo Bardin ran the Institute until 1976.  He is buried on the grounds of the Brandeis Bardin Institute. Dennis Prager ran it from 1976 to 1983. 
In March 2007, officials from both the Brandeis-Bardin Institute and the University of Judaism, a non-denominational institution of higher education offering undergraduate and graduate degrees along with a rabbinical studies program located in Bel Air, announced they would merge into a new organization called American Jewish University. 
Notable people who got their start at the Brandeis-Bardin Institute include Rabbi Zalman Schachter-Shalomi, the founder of Renewal Judaism; and Rabbi Shlomo Carlebach 
Rabbi Zvi Dershowitz directed the Brandeis-Bardin Institute in the early 1960s, before becoming director of Camp Ramah in California and rabbi at Sinai Temple.  In the 1970s Rabbis Abraham Joshua Heschel and Mordecai Kaplan frequented the institute.  Later Rabbi Joseph Telushkin would lead a weekly Torah discussion at the House of the Book on the campus, and Dennis Prager would be among the many leaders of the Institute. 
Journalist, Daniel Pearl, who was beheaded by Al Qaeda in Pakistan in 2002 (and about whom the Angelina Jolie film A Mighty Heart was made), and his family were long-time supporters of (and campers at) Brandeis. 
The futuristic architecture of the campus's House of the Book, which was designed by architect Sidney Eisenshtat, has appeared as a location in several film and television projects: 
Solomon Seisay was the scion of an influential, landowning family in Moyamba District, Sierra Leone. He is the older brother of former Consul General Tinga Seisay and cousin of Brigadier General John Bangura. 
Seisay later became Chief of Security in Kenema where he was responsible for security at Sierra Leone's diamond and gold mines. He devised effective policies for the prevention smuggling. After his retirement, the security in Kenema deteriorated drastically. 
In general relativity, background independence is identified with the property that the metric of spacetime is the solution of a dynamical equation. In classical mechanics, this is not the case, the metric is fixed by the physicist to match experimental observations. This is undesirable, since the form of the metric impacts the physical predictions, but is not itself predicted by the theory. 
Because of the speculative nature of quantum-gravity research, there is much debate as to the correct implementation of background independence. Ultimately, the answer is to be decided by experiment, but until experiments can probe quantum-gravity phenomena, physicists have to settle for debate. Below is a brief summary of the two largest quantum-gravity approaches. 
Physicists have studied models of 3D quantum gravity, which is a much simpler problem than 4D quantum gravity (this is because in 3D, quantum gravity has no local degrees of freedom). In these models, there are non-zero transition amplitudes between two different topologies, or in other words, the topology changes. This and other similar results lead physicists to believe that any consistent quantum theory of gravity should include topology change as a dynamical process. 
String theory is usually formulated with perturbation theory around a fixed background.  While it is possible that the theory defined this way is locally background-invariant, if so, it is not manifest, and it is not clear what the exact meaning is.  One attempt to formulate string theory in a manifestly background-independent fashion is string field theory, but little progress has been made in understanding it. 
A very different approach to quantum gravity called loop quantum gravity is fully non-perturbative and manifestly background-independent: geometric quantities, such as area, are predicted without reference to a background metric or asymptotics (e.g. no need for a background metric or an anti-de Sitter asymptotics), only a given topology. 
The club was founded in 1937 under the name "Dinamo Stalinabad", before changing its name to "Dynamo Dushanbe" in 1971. 
Kolev started his career in Naftex Burgas and played for the club in the A PFG. In January 2007 signed with Sliven 2000 for a free transfer. 
This biographical article related to association football in Bulgaria, about a midfielder, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The satellite has components from two long-standing Soviet spy satellite families. Bion's landing unit is from the Zenit 2M satellite and the satellite also carries an instrument section developed for the Yantar satellite. The satellite was made by TsSKB Progress of Samara, Russia. 
The animal-carrying space capsule will be launched into orbit in late 2023, by a Soyuz-2.1b launch vehicle from Baikonur Cosmodrome, Kazakhstan. 
The Dutch Athlete of the Year (Dutch: atleet van het jaar) is an annual award given to competitors in the sport of athletics from the Netherlands by the Atletiekunie. A shortlist is drawn up by a group of Atletiekunie officials and sports journalists. This shortlist then goes to a vote to all Atletiekunie members.  
The system debuted in 1993, when about 1 million students in fourth, eighth, and tenth grade took the exams, although only some of them were graded to save money. The system was originally nationally praised[by whom?] as an example of "'performance based' testing". 
Failure rates among all groups, particularly minorities, was so high that it generated concern. It was terminated in 1995 by the governor after two years.[citation needed] 
Minorities scored even lower than on standardized tests, huge numbers scored in the lowest categories, as open response questions with more than one answer proved to be even more difficult than multiple choice problems.[citation needed] 
In September 1994, Pete Wilson vetoed a bill[which?], introduced by Gary Hart, that would have continued CLAS for another five years and provided $24M in funding, and called on the California state legislature to enact another statewide testing program. According to Maureen DiMarco, Wilson vetoed this bill because it did not provide achievement scores for individual students, even though Wilson supported the CLAS exams overall. 
Maureen DiMarco testified to the California State Legislature in charge of the [CLAS] that no graders were allowed to give a "4" top score in mathematics in the first year. It was based on open responses scored holistically, so that the correct answer to how to share 5 apples among 4 people might be to give the 5th to a food bank.[citation needed] 
It was replaced by STAR, which is a testing system based on traditional rigorous academic standards which largely discards the theory of outcome-based education which was widely rejected by the late 1990s in the United States.[citation needed] 
This article relating to education in the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Nick Turnbull (born July 28, 1981) is a former professional gridiron football safety. He played college football for the FIU Golden Panthers. 
Turnbull was on the FIU Golden Panthers football team. During his career there, he finished with 16 interceptions making him the school's all-time leader. He also ties for 1st in single-season and single-game interceptions, and is 6th on the career tackles list with 267. 
He was one of the first three signings by the expansion Ottawa Redblacks on November 27, 2013 but retired before he could play for them.  
Turnbull lives in Miami, Florida. He is married with 3 children. He had a short-lived rap career where he was known as "The Truth". He went to school to become a firefighter but was never employed as one. He briefly did some modeling and appeared in GQ magazine[citation needed]. He is currently the head football coach at Dade Christian School[citation needed]. 
The 1998 Dutch Open was an ATP-tournament held in Amsterdam, Netherlands. The tournament was held from August 3 to August 9. 
Champion seeds are indicated in bold text while text in italics indicates the round in which those seeds were eliminated. 
Fabrizio Viola was the chief executive officer and general manager of Banca Monte dei Paschi di Siena, the oldest bank in the world. He was later employed by Banca Popolare di Vicenza as CEO and sister bank Veneto Banca as director. 
This business-related Italian biographical article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to a Brazilian association football defender born in the 1980s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
USS Nipmuc (ATF-157) was an Abnaki-class of fleet ocean tug that served in World War II. The tug was sold to Venezuela in 1978. 
The 2010 United States Census reported that Aguanga had a population of 1,128. The population density was 82.9 people per square mile (32.0/km2). The racial makeup of Aguanga was 929 (82.4%) White (69.2% Non-Hispanic White), 11 (1.0%) African American, 20 (1.8%) Native American, 24 (2.1%) Asian, 0 (0.0%) Pacific Islander, 109 (9.7%) from other races, and 35 (3.1%) from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 274 persons (24.3%). 
The Census reported that 1,128 people (100% of the population) lived in households, 0 (0%) lived in non-institutionalized group quarters, and 0 (0%) were institutionalized. 
The population was spread out, with 173 people (15.3%) under the age of 18, 89 people (7.9%) aged 18 to 24, 161 people (14.3%) aged 25 to 44, 365 people (32.4%) aged 45 to 64, and 340 people (30.1%) who were 65 years of age or older.  The median age was 53.4 years. For every 100 females, there were 102.5 males.  For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 104.5 males. 
There were 984 housing units at an average density of 72.4 per square mile (27.9/km2), of which 381 (81.1%) were owner-occupied, and 89 (18.9%) were occupied by renters. The homeowner vacancy rate was 1.3%; the rental vacancy rate was 8.2%.  881 people (78.1% of the population) lived in owner-occupied housing units and 247 people (21.9%) lived in rental housing units. 
According to the 2010 United States Census, Aguanga had a median household income of $49,618, with 8.5% of the population living below the federal poverty line. 
This biographical article relating to an American archery figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about an Olympic medalist of the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Common animals in the wilderness include yellow-bellied marmots, pikas, golden-mantled ground squirrels, Clark's nutcrackers, golden trout, and black bears. The wilderness area also includes California bighorn sheep zoological areas, which are set aside for the protection of the species. 
The name Tenthill is comes from the name of a pastoral property established by 1845 by Phillip Friell. 
Tenthill Creek forms part of the southern boundary before flowing through to form a small part of the northern boundary. Wonga Creek forms a small part of the southern boundary on its way to join the Tenthill. 
The women's triple jump event at the 2006 African Championships in Athletics was held at the Stade Germain Comarmond on August 13. 
^a Home grounds of many champions, especially ones who are defunct, may be unknown. This table should not be considered conclusive. 
Tango from Obango is the debut album by European jazz group the Vienna Art Orchestra (credited as Wiener Art Orchester) which was first released in 1980 on the Art label. The album was re-released on CD in 1997 with additional material along with a sampler disc. 
The Allmusic review by Tom Schulte called it "an important document in the post-modern jazz movement". 
This South Georgia and the South Sandwich Islands location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Thryptomene hubbardii is a species of flowering plant in the family Myrtaceae and is endemic to a small area in the west of Western Australia. It is a spreading shrub with crowded broadly egg-shaped leaves with the narrower end towards the base, and flowers with five pale pink petals and nine or ten stamens. 
Thryptomene hubbardii was first formally described in 2014 by Barbara Lynette Rye and Malcolm Eric Trudgen in the journal Nuytsia from specimens collected by near Mullewa by Bronwen and Gregory Keighery in 2004. The specific epithet (hubbardii) honours Richard T. Hubbard, who prepared a detailed but unpublished manuscript for the Myrtaceae of Western Australia. 
This thryptomene grows in tall shrubland and mallee woodland from the East Yuna Nature Reserve to Indarra Springs Nature Reserve in the Avon Wheatbelt and Geraldton Sandplains biogeographic regions of Western Australia. 
Thryptomene hubbardii is classified as "Priority Two" by the Western Australian Government Department of Parks and Wildlife meaning that it is poorly known and from only one or a few locations. 
Vassal was the second son of John Vassall and his second wife, Anna Russell, and was baptised at Stepney on 5 June 1586. His father was a Huguenot refugee who travelled to England from Normandy before August 1572 and who fitted out two ships, The Samuel and the Little Toby which he commanded against the Spanish Armada.[citation needed] 
Vassal lived for a time at Cockethurst Farmhouse, in what was then, Prittlewell, Essex, at the start of the 1600s. The house remained in the Vassal family until 1808. 
In 1663 Vassall was in Carolina making arrangements with the lords proprietors of the colony regarding a claim laid by him for part of a term not yet expired. He probably died in Massachusetts, but the exact time or place is not known. When letters of administration were granted in London to his son Francis on 24 September 1667, it was stated that he died abroad. 
Vassall married Frances Cartwright, daughter of Abraham and Joan Cartwright of St. Andrew's Undershaft, London. They had several children. 
David Anderson (born 8 December 1965) is an Australian former high jumper who competed in the 1992 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article relating to Australian athletics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
A Nightmare Wakes is a 2020 American psychological thriller film directed and written by Nora Unkel. The film stars Alix Wilton Regan, Giullian Yao Gioiello, Philippe Bowgen, Lee Garrett and Claire Glassford. It will premiere on Shudder on February 4, 2021. 
Mary is a young writer whose story comes to life in horribly vivid hallucinations, causing her to question the relationships she maintains with the people she loves and the reality around her. 
Morgan represented Brecon in the House of Commons from 1754 until 1763. That year, he accepted the Stewardship of the Manor of Old Shoreham to succeed his late cousin, Sir William Morgan in Monmouthshire, which he represented from 1763 until his death in 1771. 
He was briefly Lord Lieutenant of Brecknockshire and Monmouthshire in succession to his father, who died in 1769. Morgan died unmarried, and left his estates (Rhiwperra Castle and Tredegar House) to his younger brother Charles Morgan. 
The design was inspired by that of R. H. Robertson's Lincoln Building at Union Square. Both structures used the Richardson Romanesque style, specifically multi-story round-arched arcades upon a stone facade. The design also had smaller cornices above the 6th, 8th, and 10th floors. 
The eastern and southern facades are clad in limestone and divided into three horizontal sections: a base and shaft of six stories each, as well as a one-story capital. Small cornices run above the 6th, 8th, 10th, and 12th floors. The northern and western facades are faced in plain brick, with window openings. 
The steel frame was encased in brick and asbestos cement. The building was described in The New York Times as being "absolutely fireproof", with brick partitions and floors. Inside, the staircases were made of iron and stone, and the hallways were finished in marble. When opened, the building contained a mail chute and an electric clock on every floor. As originally built, wood was only used for furniture, doors, and the casement windows. 
Workfare is very closely linked to benefit sanctions, the temporary withdrawal or withholding of benefits payments by the DWP. This is imposed when the claimant is punished for failure to meet the contractual terms of the "workfare", or unpaid, work placement. A claimant has the right to appeal against this measure, under fixed guidelines.[citation needed] 
This article related to the politics of the United Kingdom, or its predecessor or constituent states, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The 1951 census recorded Maha Khera as comprising 2 hamlets, with a total population of 741 people (365 male and 376 female), in 153 households and 127 physical houses. The area of the village was given as 195 acres. 118 residents were literate, 102 male and 16 female. The village was listed as belonging to the pargana of Sareni and the thana of Sareni. 
The 1961 census recorded Maha Khera as comprising 1 hamlet, with a total population of 827 people (404 male and 423 female), in 162 households and 123 physical houses. The area of the village was given as 195 acres. 
The 1981 census recorded Maha Khera as having a population of 917 people, in 187 households, and having an area of 79.33 hectares. The main staple foods were listed as wheat and rice. 
The Kralingse Plas is a lake located in the suburb of Kralingen in Rotterdam, the Netherlands. The water is mainly used for watersport, fishing and recreational activities. Several sport associations are located around the lake, including rowing, sailing and fishing.[citation needed] 
The Magenta class consisted of two broadside ironclads built for the French Navy (Marine nationale) in the early 1860s. They were the only ironclad two-deckers ever built, and the first ironclads to feature a naval ram. 
Caloundra West is a mixed-use suburb of Caloundra in the Sunshine Coast Region, Queensland, Australia. In the 2016 census Caloundra West had a population of 6,297 people. 
Caloundra West is within the Caloundra urban centre directly west of the Caloundra central business district. 
The north of the suburb has some residential housing, an industrial estate, and undeveloped bushland. Caloundra Airport occupies the centre of the suburb. The west of the suburb is residential housing, while the south of the suburb is undevelopment marshland. 
The suburb was named and bounded on 18 June 1988. The name Caloundra is from the Kabi language Cullowundoor with Kal Owen meaning beech tree (Gmelina Leichhardtii) and Dha meaning place. 
The Sunshine Coast Regional Council operates a mobile library service which visits Lomond Crescent in the Bellvista Estate. 
In the beginning of 2006, Yang was commissioned by Nike Taiwan to make a 5-minute-long commercial for the upcoming 2006 FIFA World Cup, in Germany. During the filming, Yang felt the story was too touching to be fulfilled by only four short videos, and therefore he decided to extend the project into a feature-length documentary and asked his student and cameraman, Chang, to be the co-director.[citation needed] 
The life keeps going on. After graduation, some players enter National Hualien Senior High School, whereas the others enter Hualien Vocational High School of Agriculture. They meet each other again in a friendly match between the two school teams, but they are now competitors. 
The Apostolic Nunciature to Guyana is an ecclesiastical office of the Catholic Church in Guyana. It is a diplomatic post of the Holy See, whose representative is called the Apostolic Nuncio with the rank of an ambassador. The nuncio resides in Port of Spain, Trinidad. 
Surprise! is a 1995 short film by German director Veit Helmer. It won a Golden Space Needle award at the 1995 Seattle International Film Festival. The story centers on a Rube Goldberg device. 
The Kadaru are a sub-ethnic group of the Nuba peoples in the Nuba Mountains of South Kordofan state, in southern Sudan.  They live in the Kadaru Hills between Dilling and Delami in South Kurdufan. 
14 September (Departure) 13 November (Celebration transferred from 14 September) 27 January (Translation of Relics) 30 January (Three Holy Hierarchs) Coptic Christianity 17 Hathor (Departure) 16 Thout (Translocation of Relics) 12 Pashons (Commemoration of Relocation of Relics from Comana to Constantinople AD 437) 
John was born in Antioch in 347 (. Different scholars describe his mother Anthusa as a pagan or as a Christian, and his father was a high-ranking military officer. John's father died soon after his birth and he was raised by his mother. He was baptised in 368 or 373 and tonsured as a reader (one of the minor orders of the Church). It is sometimes said that he was bitten by a snake when he was ten years old, leading to him getting an infection from the bite. 
As a result of his mother's influential connections in the city, John began his education under the pagan teacher Libanius. From Libanius, John acquired the skills for a career in rhetoric, as well as a love of the Greek language and literature. Eventually, he became a lawyer. 
As he grew older, however, John became more deeply committed to Christianity and went on to study theology under Diodore of Tarsus, founder of the re-constituted School of Antioch. According to the Christian historian Sozomen, Libanius was supposed to have said on his deathbed that John would have been his successor "if the Christians had not taken him from us". 
John lived in extreme asceticism and became a hermit in about 375; he spent the next two years continually standing, scarcely sleeping, and committing the Bible to memory. As a consequence of these practices, his stomach and kidneys were permanently damaged and poor health forced him to return to Antioch. 
In the autumn of 397, John was appointed archbishop of Constantinople, after having been nominated without his knowledge by the eunuch Eutropius. He had to leave Antioch in secret due to fears that the departure of such a popular figure would cause civil unrest. 
Around 405, John began to lend moral and financial support to Christian monks who were enforcing the emperors' anti-Pagan laws, by destroying temples and shrines in Phoenicia and nearby regions.[unreliable source?] 
The best known of his many homilies is an extremely brief one, the Paschal Homily (Hieratikon), which is read at the first service of Pascha (Easter), the midnight Orthros (Matins), in the Eastern Orthodox Church. 
Chrysostom's extant homiletical works are vast, including many hundreds of exegetical homilies on both the New Testament (especially the works of Saint Paul) and the Old Testament (particularly on Genesis). Among his extant exegetical works are sixty-seven homilies on Genesis, fifty-nine on the Psalms, ninety on the Gospel of Matthew, eighty-eight on the Gospel of John, and fifty-five on the Acts of the Apostles. 
The homilies were written down by stenographers and subsequently circulated, revealing a style that tended to be direct and greatly personal, but formed by the rhetorical conventions of his time and place. In general, his homiletical theology displays much characteristic of the Antiochian school (i.e., somewhat more literal in interpreting Biblical events), but he also uses a good deal of the allegorical interpretation more associated with the Alexandrian school. 
John's social and religious world was formed by the continuing and pervasive presence of paganism in the life of the city. One of his regular topics was the paganism in the culture of Constantinople, and in his homilies he thunders against popular pagan amusements: the theatre, horseraces, and the revelry surrounding holidays. In particular, he criticizes Christians for taking part in such activities: 
If you ask [Christians] who is Amos or Obadiah, how many apostles there were or prophets, they stand mute; but if you ask them about the horses or drivers, they answer with more solemnity than sophists or rhetors.
 One of the recurring features of John's homilies is his emphasis on care for the needy. Echoing themes found in the Gospel of Matthew, he calls upon the rich to lay aside materialism in favor of helping the poor, often employing all of his rhetorical skills to shame wealthy people to abandon conspicuous consumption:
Do you pay such honor to your excrements as to receive them into a silver chamber-pot when another man made in the image of God is perishing in the cold?
 According to Robert H. Allen, "Chrysostom's learning and eloquence spans and sums up a long age of ever-growing moral outrage, fear and loathing of homosexuality." His most notable discourse in this regard is his fourth homily on Romans 1:26, where he argues as follows: 
All these affections then were vile, but chiefly the mad lust after males; for the soul is more the sufferer in sins, and more dishonored, than the body in diseases. ... [The men] have done an insult to nature itself. And a yet more disgraceful thing than these is it, when even the women seek after these intercourses, who ought to have more sense of shame than men.
Apart from his homilies, a number of John's other treatises have had a lasting influence. One such work is John's early treatise Against Those Who Oppose the Monastic Life, written while he was a deacon (sometime before 386), which was directed to parents, pagan as well as Christian, whose sons were contemplating a monastic vocation. Chrysostom wrote that, already in his day, it was customary for Antiochenes to send their sons to be educated by monks. 
 Regardless of his lesser influence than, say, Thomas Aquinas, John's influence on church teachings is interwoven throughout the current Catechism of the Catholic Church (revised 1992).[citation needed] The Catechism cites him in eighteen sections, particularly his reflections on the purpose of prayer and the meaning of the Lord's Prayer:[citation needed]
Consider how [Jesus Christ] teaches us to be humble, by making us see that our virtue does not depend on our work alone but on grace from on high. He commands each of the faithful who prays to do so universally, for the whole world. For he did not say "thy will be done in me or in us", but "on earth", the whole earth, so that error may be banished from it, truth take root in it, all vice be destroyed on it, virtue flourish on it, and earth no longer differ from heaven.
Christian clerics, such as R. S. Storr, refer to him as "one of the most eloquent preachers who ever since apostolic times have brought to men the divine tidings of truth and love", and the 19th-century John Henry Newman described John as a "bright, cheerful, gentle soul; a sensitive heart". 
James Joyce's novel Ulysses includes a character named Mulligan who brings 'Chrysostomos' into another character (Stephen Dedalus)'s mind because Mulligan's gold-stopped teeth and his gift of the gab earn him the title which St. John Chrysostom's preaching earned him, 'golden-mouthed': "[Mulligan] peered sideways up and gave a long low whistle of call, then paused awhile in rapt attention, his even white teeth glistening here and there with gold points. Chrysostomos." 
Most of John's relics were looted from Constantinople by Crusaders in 1204 and taken to Rome, but some of his bones were returned to the Orthodox Church on 27 November 2004 by Pope John Paul II. Since 2004 the relics have been enshrined in the Church of St. George, Istanbul. 
Today, the monastery at Vatopedi posits a rival claim to possessing the skull of John Chrysostom, and there a skull is venerated by pilgrims to the monastery as that of Saint John. Two sites in Italy also claim to have the saint's skull: the Basilica di Santa Maria del Fiore in Florence and the Dal Pozzo chapel in Pisa. The right hand of Saint John[unreliable source?] is preserved on Mount Athos, and numerous smaller relics are scattered throughout the world. 
Cherish is the forty-fifth studio album by Seiko Matsuda. It came in two different versions, a regular edition which contains the CD album and a first press special edition that contained the CD album plus a 36-page photobook. The album release wasn't preceded by any single release, so all the songs in the album are new songs. 
The delegates of the CIM continued to press for international agreements throughout the Americas that effect change and protect women. In 1998, they adopted the Declaration of Santo Domingo, which recognised that women's inalienable rights exist throughout their lifetime and are an "integral, and indivisible part of universal human rights". 
The treaty is written in the four official languages of the Organization of American States; 'each [language version] is equally authentic' (Article 25): 
Austin was born in Dorchester, Massachusetts to William Downes Austin and Catherine D. Austin (daughter of William Austin). 
He wrote a history of the Boston Society of Architects. He was a member of the Boston Society of Architects and American Institute of Architects. 
Austin married Emily W. Barker of Roxbury, Massachusetts on June 8, 1887 in Boston. Barker's parents were William T. Barker and Emily W. Barker. 
This article about a United States architect or architectural firm is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The name Baetasii could stem from the Proto-Celtic root *baidos ('wild boar'; compare with Welsh baedd). The suffix -asio- is rather common in the Gaulish language, whereas it has hardly any connection with Germanic. 
Votive stones dedicated to the deity Hercules Magusanus were found on the territory of the Baetasii. 
Hiller collaborated on films with screenwriters Paddy Chayefsky and Neil Simon. Among his other films were The Americanization of Emily (1964), Tobruk (1967), The Hospital (1971), The Out-of-Towners (1970), Plaza Suite (1971), The Man in the Glass Booth (1975), Silver Streak (1976), The In-Laws (1979) and Outrageous Fortune (1987). 
Hiller served as president of the Directors Guild of America from 1989 to 1993 and president of the Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences from 1993 to 1997. He was the recipient of the Jean Hersholt Humanitarian Award in 2002. An annual film festival in Hiller's honor was held from 2006 until 2009 at his alma mater, Victoria School of Performing and Visual Arts. 
Arthur Hiller was calm, quiet and he knew exactly what he wanted. He never told you what to do. He took what you had and very gently focused it. It was such a joy to work with him. 
Hiller began his career as a television director with the Canadian Broadcasting Corporation. NBC, one of the main networks in the United States, seeing his work in Canada, offered him positions directing television dramas. Over the next few years, his work for the small screen included episodes of Thriller, Alfred Hitchcock Presents, The Rifleman, Gunsmoke, Naked City, Perry Mason, and Playhouse 90. 
Hiller directed his first film, The Careless Years (1957), the story of young couple eloping. This was followed by This Rugged Land (1962), originally made for television but then released as a film, and then Miracle of the White Stallions (1963), a Disney film. With these first films, Hiller already showed competence in directing unrelated subjects successfully. 
Hiller directed two comedy films in collaboration with playwright Neil Simon. The first film was The Out-of-Towners (1970), starring Jack Lemmon and Sandy Dennis, who were both nominated for Golden Globe awards for their roles. Their next collaboration was Plaza Suite (1971), starring Walter Matthau, which was nominated for the Golden Globe Award for Best Motion Picture. Both films were driven by intense comedy dialogue and were considered "crisply directed" by reviewers. 
Hiller returned to directing serious drama with The Man in the Glass Booth (1975), starring Maximilian Schell, in a screen adaptation of a stage play written by Robert Shaw. Schell played the role of a man trying to deal with questions of self-identity and guilt as a survivor of the Holocaust during World War II. For his highly emotional role, Schell was nominated for the Academy Award for Best Actor and the Golden Globe Award. 
Returning to comedy, Hiller directed Silver Streak (1976), starring Gene Wilder, Jill Clayburgh and Richard Pryor. The film was well received by critics and is rated No. 95 on the AFI's best comedy films. He directed another comedy, The In-Laws (1979), with Peter Falk and Alan Arkin, which was also a critical and commercial success. 
He was good director who wanted to know all about the subject. I took Arthur on a tour of the bars one night. Arthur is a real straight Jewish guy, married to the same woman for a hundred years, kids, and everything so far removed from the scene that it was like he was doing a movie about aliens. 
Hiller directed the film Making Love, which was released in February 1982, a story of a married man coming to terms with his homosexuality. Author! Author! (also 1982), starred Al Pacino. The following year Hiller directed Romantic Comedy (1983), starring Dudley Moore and Mary Steenburgen. His next comedy, The Lonely Guy (1984), starred Steve Martin as a greeting card writer and was followed by Teachers (1984), a comedy-drama film starring Nick Nolte. 
Outrageous Fortune (1987) stars Shelley Long and Bette Midler. The film was successful at the box office, with Midler being nominated or winning various awards. The film was followed by See No Evil, Hear No Evil (1989), another comedy again starring Gene Wilder and Richard Pryor. Pryor plays a blind man and Wilder a deaf man who work together to thwart a trio of murderous thieves. 
Hiller preferred his scripts to contain "good moral values," a preference which he says came from his upbringing.[c] He wanted high quality screenplays whenever possible, which partly explains why he collaborated on multiple films with both Paddy Chayefsky and Neil Simon. Hiller explains his rationale: 
Storytelling is innate to the human condition. Its underpinnings are cerebral, emotional, communal, psychological. One of the storyteller's main responsibilities is to resonate in the audience's psyche a certain something at the end of it all, to emotionally move the audience, to compel the audience to "get it" on a visceral level.
He received the Jean Hersholt Humanitarian Award at the 2002 Academy Awards ceremony in recognition of his humanitarian, charitable and philanthropic efforts. In 2002, he was honoured with a star on Canada's Walk of Fame in Toronto. In 2006, he was made an Officer of the Order of Canada.  Writer and producer William Froug said that "Hiller is that rare and hugely successful gentleman who has remained humble all his life." 
He received the Honorary Degree of Doctor of Fine Arts (DFA) from the University of Victoria in June 1995. He received the Honorary Degree of Doctor of Laws (LL.D) from the University of Toronto in November 1995. 
In 1948, he married Gwen Pechet, who was also Jewish; they had two children and two grandchildren. His wife died on June 24, 2016. They were married for 68 years. Hiller died almost two months later in Los Angeles on August 17, 2016 at the age of 92 from natural causes. 
Most of the land in the area, as was typical in the Tualatin Valley, was settled in accord with the Donation Land Claim Act of 1850. Pioneer Samuel Walters was the first white settler to arrive in the area, doing so in 1847. William Cornell, namesake of Cornell Road, settled near  what is now the easternmost part of Cedar Mill with his wife Emily in 1852. The area became a school district in 1856. 
A Cedar Mill Heritage Quilt was created in the summer of 1976 by 15 local women. It detailed various aspects of Cedar Mill history. Former U.S. Senator Maurine Neuberger declared the winner of the quilting competition in September 1976. 
There were 4,723 households, out of which 39.4% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 60.8% were married couples living together, 8.3% had a female householder with no husband present, and 27.4% were non-families. 21.0% of all households were made up of individuals, and 4.3% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.67 and the average family size was 3.12. 
In the CDP, the population was spread out, with 28.4% under the age of 18, 6.9% from 18 to 24, 31.1% from 25 to 44, 25.5% from 45 to 64, and 8.1% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 36 years. For every 100 females, there were 99.7 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 97.0 males. 
The median income for a household in the CDP was $65,730, and the median income for a family was $79,529. Males had a median income of $62,901 versus $36,369 for females. The per capita income for the CDP was $33,555. About 4.7% of families and 6.7% of the population were below the poverty line, including 7.4% of those under age 18 and 5.0% of those age 65 or over. 
Fire protection and EMS services are provided through Tualatin Valley Fire and Rescue.  Cedar Mill is served by the Tualatin Hills Park & Recreation District (THPRD), which maintains several parks and a few nature trails in the area, as well as the Sunset Swim Center (public swimming pool adjacent to and used by Sunset High School). 
Like all areas in the Portland metro area, Cedar Mill residents receive The Oregonian. Virginia Bruce operates the Cedar Mill News, a monthly newsletter running since January 2003. The Cedar Mill News was known as The Milltowner in its first edition, but by February 2003 had been changed to its present form, the Cedar Mill News. A local business association known as the Cedar Mill Business Association is involved in the area. 
The so-called "downtown" of the CDP is located along Cornell Road from approximately Sunset High School to just past the intersection with Saltzman Road. 
Public schools in and around the Cedar Mill area include Terra Linda, Cedar Mill, Bonny Slope, and West Tualatin View elementary schools; Cedar Park and Stoller middle schools; and Sunset High School, all a part of the Beaverton School District. Private schools include Catlin Gabel School, Prince of Peace Lutheran School, and St. Pius X Catholic School. 
Another former school in the area was Sunset Valley Elementary School, which was built in 1948 to replace Union School and was located on Murray Road immediately north of Sunset Highway. In 1979, shortly before the school's closure in spring 1980, the building was acquired by Electro Scientific Industries (whose main campus was located nearby) and used as ESI's administrative headquarters until the mid-1990s, when it was razed and replaced by a Home Depot store. 
Leukaemia, lymphoma and myeloma are all types of blood cancer and they can develop in anyone, of any age, at any time. Around 41 Australians are diagnosed each and every day. Although improved treatments and care are helping more people survive, someone loses their life to blood cancer every two hours. In fact, blood cancer is the third most common cause of cancer death in Australia, claiming more lives than breast cancer or melanoma.[citation needed] 
It supports patients and family members by providing free counseling, educational services and accommodation for families who need to relocate while patients receive care. 
One of the Leukaemia Foundation's biggest fundraising events is "World's Greatest Shave", in which participants have their heads shaved in support of leukemia patients. 
The junction of the Minnesund and the Vorma, Eidsvoll, served as an ancient 'ting' place  - or meeting place for the local council or parliament - for Romerike during the period when travel by boat was much easier than by land. The "Eidsivating" was, according to tradition, founded by Halvdan Svarte, and served as the 'ting' place for all of the Opplands and Viken. Saint Olav also held a ting there and built a church at this site in 1017. 
In 1795 a landslide totally blocked the Vorma at Disen for 111 days, completely drying the riverbed. A channel was cut around it to prevent a major overflow, with accompanying downstream damage. 
The Georgian Bay Littoral (also called the Georgian Bay Biosphere Reserve) is a UNESCO Biosphere Reserve located in Ontario, Canada.  The biosphere was the thirteenth in Canada, and covers the Thirty Thousand Islands area of eastern Georgian Bay, one of the world's largest fresh water archipelagos. 
This article about a Dutch or Flemish painter mainly active before c. 1581 (the division of the Low Countries into the Dutch Republic and the Southern Netherlands) is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Hamit Karakus (born 22 February 1965) is a Turkish-Dutch politician, who has a seat in the Senate and previously served as an alderman in Rotterdam. He is a member of the Labour Party (PvdA). 
Born in Turkey, Karakus grew up in Steenwijk and later moved to Rotterdam to work as a police officer. After ten years of service and reaching the rank of police sergeant, he became deputy director of a real estate brokerage firm in 1998. He continued working there until he was appointed Rotterdam's alderman of housing and spatial planning in 2006. He resigned from that position eight years later, after his party had suffered losses in the 2014 municipal election with Karakus as lijsttrekker. 
He subsequently became CEO of the organizations Platform31 and IVO and started serving as a senator in March 2021. 
He attended an lts high school in Steenwijk, where he was trained in metalworking, between 1979 and 1983. His teacher had recommended a havo level education, but Karakus's father preferred a vocational education for his son. Karakus subsequently worked at a warehouse of Heuga, the carpet factory that also employed his father. 
Karakus left the police in 1998 to work for the real estate brokerage firm Atta Makelaars as deputy director. He continued working there until he became an alderman in 2006. 
Interior minister Kajsa Ollongren hired him in February 2019 in order to help governments and housing corporations make agreements about public housing in areas in which Vestia was active. Due to its financial problems, Vestia was unable to adequately invest in public housing. It was announced in 2020 that fifteen other housing corporations would take over about 10,000 Vestia properties with financial support from the government. 
Karakus lives in Rotterdam. He is married to Emine Deniz, and they have two daughters and one son. He has renounced his Turkish citizenship to avoid conscription. 
"but Mr Birchall, the first lieutenant, with a Degree of Zeal and intrepidity, volunteered to attack her [Potomac] in a boat" 
Birchall and Harpy were ordered to remain off Copenhagen to ensure that terms of the armistice were honoured and to let other British ships know that Nelson had taken the fleet to Bornholm. He was promoted to post-captain for his actions. 
Birchall married three times during his life but left no children. He was very young and still a midshipman, when he met and married his first bride in Lyme Regis in 1786. Esther Delaney was his senior by some years and died in 1806 at Bathampton. Birchall took another wife almost immediately, marrying Jane Cross from Bath, in Marylebone. She died in 1811 in Ilfracombe. He eventually remarried again in 1815. His last wife was Leonora, one of the Binghams from Bingham's Melcombe in Dorset. 
In 1803, Birchall was given command of the Chester region Sea Fencibles and, according to the Bath Chronicle, caused a riot on 26 December when he impressed one of the local militia. Following their Christmas parade, the militia responded angrily, attacking the gaol and meeting house, where they tore down Birchall's flag. Birchall was asked to leave town while the army restored order. 
Birchall died in Exeter in 1817, then was buried at its St. Sidwell's church (now chapel) which the Luftwaffe destroyed in the Exeter Blitz of 1942. 
Underneath reinforced concrete road, the BMC will construct lines for electricity, gas, water and telephone. A reinforced concrete wall will be constructed at culverts and bridges after encroachments are removed, so that the embankment of the road and the new reinforced concrete box cell of utility services are protected.    There will also be 2 pedestrian bridges at Bainganwadi Junction and Shivaji Nagar Junction. 
Following the opening of the Eastern Freeway in 2013, traffic from Dr Babasaheb Ambedkar Road is shared with the former, and merges with the GMLR near RBK School. GMLR also helps ease traffic on the Sion Panvel Highway. 
This Indian road or road transport-related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Sister Chapel features eleven panels that represent contemporary and historically significant women, deities and mythological figures, and conceptual heroic women. Each "role model" was selected and painted by a different artist, which allowed the participants to retain their individual styles: 
Each of the monumental figures occupies a nine-by-five-foot canvas, arranged in a circle, into which viewers are invited to enter. Above the eleven panels hangs the circular abstract painted ceiling by Ilise Greenstein (1976). Its mirrored center invites viewers to see themselves in the company of the heroic figures of this "sisters universe," and to develop a new way of looking at history, culture, and themselves. 
A tent-like fabric enclosure, designed by Maureen Connor in 1976, was meant to create an intimate space approximately 25 feet in diameter. For financial reasons, the structure was not executed in the 1970s but a model was constructed and shown at the premiere exhibition. 
The installation premiered in January 1978 at P.S.1 in Long Island City, New York. It was positively reviewed in The New York Times and Newsday 
In March 2019, the installation went on permanent display in the Center for Art and Social Engagement at Rowan University. 
When The Sister Chapel was reunited in 2016, its historical importance was recognized by The Huffington Post, The Philadelphia Inquirer, and Artnet. The Sister Chapel was also featured in a segment of State of the Arts, a locally produced program on NJTV (now NJ PBS). 
In March 2018, Travel + Leisure grouped The Sister Chapel with the Rothko Chapel, Matisse Chapel, Le Corbusier's Notre Dame du Haut, and other chapels that "combine artistry with worship." 
The Sister Chapel was featured in a fashion photography spread in the August 2019 issue of Harper's Bazaar, serving as an environment for two pairs of sisters who wear Christian Dior clothing designed by Maria Grazia Chiuri; an interview with Chiuri by Robin Morgan accompanies the photographs. 
Other sports also use the term "victory formation" for a play designed only to run down the clock with little chance of injury, such as a Jammer in roller derby skating behind or only lightly challenging the pack while the final seconds of the bout tick down. 
The "victory formation" spread rapidly throughout football at nearly all levels, as coaches sought to adopt a procedure for downing the ball in the final seconds which would reduce the risk of turnovers to the absolute minimum possible. Within a season or so, it had become nearly universal. In 1987 the NFL rule allowing quarterbacks to simply kneel and not have to fall down and risk a hit from the defense took effect.[citation needed] 
Although in most instances a losing team will concede defeat when the other team is in the victory formation and taking the quarterback kneel, there are instances where the trailing team will try to make a defensive play in an attempt to regain possession of the ball, particularly when the losing team is behind by a touchdown or less and there is enough time to make more than one play.[citation needed] 
Mars, Rahu and Saturn, all three occupying the kendrasthanas indicate imprisonment. B V Raman states that Bandhana yoga is caused when the lords of the lagna and the 6th are in a trine or a quadrant in conjunction with Saturn, Rahu or Ketu. Mercury and/or Saturn situated in the 8th house from the lagna indicate death in a prison at the gallows. 
Eastern Front (1941) is a computer wargame for the Atari 8-bit family created by Chris Crawford and published through the Atari Program Exchange (APX) in 1981. A scenario editor and assembly language source code for the game were also sold by APX. 
A killer app for Atari computers, Eastern Front was among APX's best selling games, selling over 60,000 copies. It was widely lauded in the press and was Creative Computing's Game of the Year in 1981. In 1982, it was licensed by Atari for distribution on game cartridge, then rereleased in 1988 in XEGS styled packaging. 
Eastern Front is a corps-level simulation of Operation Barbarossa, the German invasion of the Soviet Union in 1941. The player controls the Germans, in white, while the computer plays the Russians, in red. Units are represented as boxes for armored corps or cavalry, and crosses for infantry, an attempt to replicate conventional military symbols given the low resolution. 
The game is modal, switching between an order entry mode and a combat mode. During order entry the joystick is used to select units and enter movement in the four cardinal directions. Up to eight orders can be entered for any unit. Orders are remembered from turn to turn, and new orders can be added in future turns after watching an animation of any remaining ones. The orders for any given unit can be cancelled by pressing the space bar. 
The game simulates the changing of the seasons: 14 turns of summer that begin in June 1941, four turns of autumn, and 22 turns of winter. When autumn begins on 5 October 1941 and the green land changes to purple-brown mud, the player is likely losing if they have not captured most objectives, destroyed most early Russian forces, and established a defensive position. 
The AI is based on three basic measures of the game state: The strategic situation which attempts to take and hold cities, the tactical situation which attempts to block player movements, and the overall arrangement of the front line. The AI first attempts to build a continuous front line in an attempt to prevent encirclements, it then sends additional units on intercept courses to block player movements, and finally any remaining units are sent to undefended cities. 
Players exploited another bug in the first version's game engine. Since the AI calculates its moves while the user enters orders, reducing the amount of time the user takes to plan their own moves reduces the quality of the computer response. Repeatedly pressing Start prevents the computer from pondering and neither the player nor computer does anything, avoiding combat during the winter and allowing the player to break out during spring with full-strength units. 
Crawford approached Atari about selling the game, but the company believed that wargames for Atari computers would not be popular. 
Creative Computing named Eastern Front Game of the Year in 1981. The Academy of Adventure Gaming Arts and Design named it Best Adventure Game for Home Computer, 1981. In 1987 Crawford stated that it was one of the three games he was proud of, with Legionnaire and Balance of Power. In 2002 GameSpy wrote that Eastern Front was considered to be one of the first computer wargames that paper-and-pencil wargamers approved of. 
While the game was still being sold, Crawford released its source code through APX as a separate, commercial product targeted at developers. He was surprised that while it sold well, no other game used it. He also released a scenario editor, but only one pre-packaged set of user-created scenarios is known. 
Crawford used many of the ideas from Eastern Front in Legionnaire for Avalon Hill in 1982. Legionnaire uses the same map engine to simulate the Roman legions fighting the barbarians, but modifies it to move units in real time. 
In 2013 Crawford publicly released the source code of several of his games, including Eastern Front. 
Joseph II Johann 6th Prince of Schwarzenberg (Vienna, June 27, 1769 - Frauenberg, December 19, 1833) was a German-Bohemian nobleman from the Schwarzenberg family. 
In 1806, after the occupation by the French, he lost sovereignty over the Franconian and Swabian possessions of his House. In 1808 Joseph was accepted into the Order of the Golden Fleece. His wife Pauline died in 1810 in a fire during a ball in the garden of the Austrian embassy in Paris in honor of Napoleon's marriage to Marie-Louise of Austria. 
Joseph married in May 1794 Pauline Karolina Iris Princess von Arenberg-Aarschot (September 2, 1774 - July 2, 1810), daughter of Louis Engelbert, 6th Duke of Arenberg, and had six daughters and three sons: 
Threemilehouse has a Gaelic Athletic Association (GAA) football club, Sean Mac Diarmada, who wear yellow and white. 
The primary period of activity of Operation Relex was between October and December 2001 when ten SIEV were intercepted by HMA Ships Warramunga, Arunta, and Leeuwin, assisted by several Fremantle-class patrol boats. 
Operation Relex was folded into the broader border protection activity named Operation Resolute which commenced in July 2006. In 2013, the Abbott Government implemented Operation Sovereign Borders. 
To qualify, ADF members must have been deployed or force assigned for duty as a member of a declared operation: 
The team had no coach, and its captain was William C. Malley. George P. Codd, who later served as the Mayor of Detroit and in the United States Congress, was the team's manager.  George Jewett, who played at the fullback and halfback positions, was the team's leading scorer with 50 points on 11 touchdowns (four points each) and three kicks for goal from touchdown (two points each).  Jewett was also the first African American to play football at Michigan. 
Horace Greely Prettyman provided a training table at which football candidates could eat supper, and a bath and dressing room for use by the football players was established in the basement of the medical building. 
Two new players stood out in the pre-season practice sessions: halfback George Jewett, who had "played a rattling game" for Ann Arbor High School in 1889; and center Thomas L. Chadbourne, who had played center for Phillips Exeter Academy in 1889.  Although Jewett in 1890 became the first African American to play football for Michigan, no mention of his race is found in the pre-season coverage. 
By mid-October 1890, as the football season began, the University of Michigan had an enrollment of 2,246 students. The U. of M. Daily expressed concern when "only about a dozen men were out for foot-ball practice" on October 6, five days before the opening game. 
Michigan's lineup against Albion was Roger Sherman (left end), S. Sherman (left tackle), Trainer (left guard), Chadbourne (center), Sutherland (right guard), Malley (right tackle), James Van Inwagen (right end), Abbott (quarterback), George Jewett and Lawrence Grosh (halfbacks), and George Dygert (fullback). 
Michigan's starting lineup against D.A.C. was Roger Sherman (left end), S. Sherman (left tackle), Clark J. Sutherland (left guard), Thomas L. Chadbourne (center), David Trainer Jr. (right guard), William C. Malley (right tackle), Thomas L. McKean (right end), George S. Holden (quarterback), George Jewett (left halback), Lawrence C. Grosh (right halfback), and George Dygert (fullback).  William Pearson appeared after Trainer was ejected from the game. 
The game was the first between two football programs that would later become members of the Big Ten Conference.  It received a total of six lines of coverage in the Detroit Free Press.  The newspaper noted: "The game was hotly contested.  James E. Duffy, the famous halfback of the team of '88 and '89, played in the game, relieving Jewett, who was injured." 
Michigan's lineup against Purdue was Roger Sherman (left end), Pearson (left tackle), Trainer (left guard), Chadbourne (center), S. Sherman (right guard), Malley (right tackle), McKeon (right end), Holden (quarterback), Jewett, Grosh, and Duffy (halfbacks), and George Dygert (fullback). 
Michigan's lineup against Cornell was Roger Sherman (left end), Horace Greely Prettyman (left tackle), David Trainer Jr. (left guard), Chadbourne (center), Clark J. Sutherland (right guard), Malley, William W. Harless, and William W. Pearson (right tackle), Thomas L. McKean (right end), George S. Holden (quarterback), Duffy and Malley (halfback), Lawrence C. Grosh (halfback), and Jewett and Duffy (fullback). 
After losing to Cornell, Michigan cancelled a game that had been scheduled with DePauw for November 22. The team's management that the benefit of a game with "a somewhat weak team" was outweighed by the expense to be incurred in bringing the DePauw team to Ann Arbor. 
The following 13 players received varsity letters for their participation on the 1890 Michigan football team. 
Forensic Heroes IV is a 2020 police procedural television drama and the fourth installment of the Forensic Heroes series. Produced by Television Broadcasts Limited (TVB), Mui Siu-ching serves as the drama's executive producer. The drama closely follows a team of professionals of the Forensic Science and Forensic Pathology departments who work closely with the Kowloon West Regional Crime Unit to crack cases. 
In episode 14, he learnt about how Ko Sin was abducted twenty three years ago from Chris, who was forced to take part in the abduction, and decided to forgive her, considering her to be a victim as well. 
Ko On originally had a steady relationship with his girlfriend, Monique, though they break up in episode 20 as Monique chose to accompany her first love to the end of his life. 
Queen became close with King Sir due to their consistent cooperation at work. In episode 16, she found out that her boyfriend, Louis, and her best friend, Elaine, had a one night stand so she broke up with him. In episode 21, Louis was killed and Queen was accused as the murder suspect.  
When King Sir was young, he watched waves with his brother-in-law at the seaside during a typhoon and accidentally fell into the sea. Although he managed to survive, his brother-in-law lost his life for trying to save him. Therefore, his elder sister had a distant relationship with him and he had been feeling guilty for his sister and niece. He rents out his flat to earn school fees for his niece to study abroad. The siblings eventually reconcile in episode 27. 
In episode 25, her friend Paul managed to trace Ko Sin's whereabouts to an orphanage in San Francisco. Chris told Ko On about the news and Ko Sin contacted him to meet up. She had a crush on Ko On and became his girlfriend in the final episode. 
The Prospector's Vengeance is a 1920 American short silent Western film directed by B. Reeves Eason. 
Sadia S.A. is a major Brazilian food producer that has been a subsidiary of BRF S.A. since 2009. It is among the world's leading producers of frozen foods, and is Brazil's main exporter of meat-based products. 
As of 2008, Sadia had about 20 industrial plants that together produced over 2.3 million tons of food including chicken, turkey, pork and beef, pasta, margarine, desserts, and other products. The company supplies over 70 thousand direct points of sale in Brazil and exports to over 100 countries. 
In March 2017, BRF was revealed to have sold processed rotten meat, resulting in food scares and worldwide recalls. 
This food and/or confectionery corporation or company-related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This fifth entry was produced at the same period of time as the fourth entry. The film started shooting on November 4, 2018 and finished on June 28, 2019. Large-scale shooting for more than 7 months was carried out at 43 locations nationwide, including Kyoto, Nara, Shiga, Mie, Hyogo, Kumamoto, Hiroshima, Tochigi, Saitama, Shizuoka, Osaka, and Nagano. It utilized a total of 6,000 extras. 
Rurouni Kenshin: The Beginning opened in the first place at the Japanese box office, selling 350,000 tickets for over 508 million yen (about US$4.7 million) in its opening weekend. Rurouni Kenshin: The Final ranked at #2 that weekend, making Rurouni Kenshin the first franchise to take the top two spots at the Japanese box office in the same weekend. In total, the film has grossed $21,318,560 at the Japanese box office. 
Rurouni Kenshin: The Beginning was released in Japanese theatres on June 4, 2021. It was released on Netflix globally on July 30, 2021. 
In 1951 he returned to Germany and was successful once again singing the role of Leopold the waiter (The White Horse Inn) in Hamburg and at Berlin's Theater am Nollendorfplatz. In 1953 Hansen moved back to Copenhagen, where he died in 1961. 
In 2004 the German director Douglas Wolfsperger portrayed Hansen in his documentary "War'n Sie schon mal in mich verliebt?" 
As of May 2011, 14 of the journals that make up the Proceedings were included in the Journal Citation Reports. 
Stanley and Alder Carrs, Aldeby is a 42.7-hectare (106-acre) biological Site of Special Scientific Interest east of Gillingham in Norfolk. It is part of the Broadland Ramsar site and Special Protection Area, and The Broads Special Area of Conservation. 
Most of this site is alder carr woodland next to the River Waveney, which is often flooded. It has a diverse insect fauna. There are also areas of open fen with plants including common reed, reed canary grass and hemp-agrimony. 
Commando is the autobiography of guitarist and songwriter Johnny Ramone of the punk rock band The Ramones. The book was released in 2012 by Linda Ramone, surviving spouse of Johnny Ramone, following the death of Johnny in 2004 from prostate cancer. 
Commando is an autobiography on the life of Johnny Ramone. He began writing the book in 1999 when he was diagnosed with prostate cancer. In an interview with Billboard Magazine, Linda Ramone stated: 
It is a really powerful book because his whole life has gone before him and he knows it's going to come to an end, and he really needs to tell everybody what he's feeling inside, so that's what makes it so amazing. That is the biggest, most powerful thing, writing a book when you know you're dying.
The epilogue was written by Lisa Marie Presley, a close friend of Johnny and Linda Ramone. The foreword of the book was written by the only surviving original member of The Ramones at that time, Tommy Ramone. Tommy was quoted as saying: 
[the book] is a no holds barred, straight-forward book written in a no-nonsense style that is Johnny personified. His story is written in his own actual words, so the reader gets an insight into what made him the unique, charismatic and exciting individual that he was. It also gives a great view of The Ramones from Johnny's perspective.
The book was released in April 2012. Prior to and following the release, Linda Ramone promoted the book by giving numerous interviews in both print and televised national media, including Fox News, Billboard Magazine, and MTV. The book was reviewed by numerous well known publications including the Houston Chronicle, the National Post, PopMatters, and MTV which called the book a must-have for any Ramones fan. 
Tommy Ford (born March 20, 1989) is a World Cup alpine ski racer from the United States. He specializes in giant slalom and super-G; his best World Cup result to date is a first place finish at a giant slalom event in December of 2019.  He has represented the US in two Winter Olympics and four World Championships. 
Born and raised in Bend, Oregon, Ford was on skis at age two, as both his parents were racers and coaches. He skied and raced at nearby Mount Bachelor and later attended Dartmouth College in New Hampshire, and has won eight titles at the U.S. Alpine Championships. 
During the 2013 season, Ford fractured his right femur in mid-January while free skiing in La Clusaz, France. Following surgery in Annecy, he returned to the U.S. and missed over two years, including the 2013 World Championships and 2014 Winter Olympics. During the 2017 season, Ford had five top-20 finishes in giant slalom and was 25th in the season standings. 
During the 2019 season, Ford had four top-ten finishes in giant slaloms and was tenth in the GS season standings.   
The women's individual all-around was a gymnastics event contested as part of the Gymnastics at the 1964 Summer Olympics programme at the Tokyo Metropolitan Gymnasium. 
The score for the individual all-around was a simple sum of each gymnast's preliminary scores from the four apparatus events. 
Northern Championship Wrestling (Les Promotions NCW Inc.) is an independent professional wrestling promotion based in Montreal, Quebec, Canada. 
On August 13, 2005, shortly after his departure from World Wrestling Entertainment (WWE), the promotion hosted Lance Storm for a show called SummerStorm in order to promote his new Storm Wrestling Academy. Storm got involved in the main event, doing a run-in to help Manuel Vegas retain the NCW Quebec title against Chakal. 
Sylvain Grenier wrestled for the promotion from November 2002 until starting full-time with WWE at No Way Out 2003. He first wrestled former NCW Quebec Champion Manuel Vegas, then defeated NCW wrestlers Chakal, Chase Ironside and Nova Cain. 
On August 23, 2008, NCW hosted a wrestling SuperShow involving The Honky Tonk Man, Johnny Devine and Bushwhacker Luke. 
Since 1995, NCW wrestlers such as Chakal, Franky The Mobster, Nova Cain and Don Paysan have been ranked in the Pro Wrestling Illustrated's PWI 500. 
In September 2009, nCw hosted their first edition of NCW Femmes Fatales which regrouped many fighting female in North America. NCW Femmes Fatales was announced in April 2010 to be part of the Female Fight League during the 45th Edition of the Cauliflower Alley Club Reunion in Las Vegas. 
In November 2009, they gave an hommage to Maurice Vachon and Paul Vachon as part of a documentary tracing back Mad Dog's career. 
Blair resigned on October 25, 1795, and died in Williamsburg in 1800, at 68. He was buried at the Bruton Parish Episcopal Church Cemetery in Williamsburg. Blair was a Freemason.  He was named Grand Master of Freemasons in Virginia under the newly organized Grand Lodge of Virginia in 1778. Blair Street in Madison, Wisconsin is named in his honor. 
We shall take care that never again in Germany, the heart of Europe, will the Jewish-Bolshevik revolution of subhumans be able to be kindled either from within or through emissaries from without.
After Hitler and the Nazi Party came to power on 30 January 1933, the SS was considered a state organization and a branch of the government. Law enforcement gradually became the purview of the SS, and many SS organizations became de facto government agencies. 
On 10 May 1940, Hitler launched the Battle of France, a major offensive against France and the Low Countries. The SS supplied two of the 89 divisions employed. The LSSAH and elements of the SS-VT participated in the ground invasion of the Battle of the Netherlands. Simultaneously, airborne troops were dropped to capture key Dutch airfields, bridges, and railways. In the five-day campaign, the LSSAH linked up with army units and airborne troops after several clashes with Dutch defenders. 
On 22 June 1941, Hitler launched Operation Barbarossa, the invasion of the Soviet Union. The expanding war and the need to control occupied territories provided the conditions for Himmler to further consolidate the police and military organs of the SS. Rapid acquisition of vast territories in the East placed considerable strain on the SS police organizations as they struggled to adjust to the changing security challenges. 
The 1st and 2nd SS Infantry Brigades, which had been formed from surplus concentration camp guards of the SS-TV, and the SS Cavalry Brigade moved into the Soviet Union behind the advancing armies. At first, they fought Soviet partisans, but by the autumn of 1941, they left the anti-partisan role to other units and actively took part in the Holocaust. While assisting the Einsatzgruppen, they formed firing parties that participated in the liquidation of the Jewish population of the Soviet Union. 
After the start of the war, Himmler intensified the activity of the SS within Germany and in Nazi-occupied Europe. Increasing numbers of Jews and German citizens deemed politically suspect or social outsiders were arrested. As the Nazi regime became more oppressive, the concentration camp system grew in size and lethal operation, and grew in scope as the economic ambitions of the SS intensified. 
Waffen-SS units that had survived the summer campaigns were withdrawn from the front line to refit. Two of them, the 9th SS and 10th SS Panzer Divisions, did so in the Arnhem region of Holland in early September 1944. Coincidentally, on 17 September, the Allies launched in the same area Operation Market Garden, a combined airborne and land operation designed to seize control of the lower Rhine. The 9th and 10th Panzers were among the units that repulsed the attack. 
By this time, on both the Eastern and Western Front, the activities of the SS were becoming clear to the Allies, as the concentration and extermination camps were being overrun. Allied troops were filled with disbelief and repugnance at the evidence of Nazi brutality in the camps. 
Heydrich was attacked in Prague on 27 May 1942 by a British-trained team of Czech and Slovak soldiers who had been sent by the Czechoslovak government-in-exile to assassinate him in Operation Anthropoid. He died from his injuries a week later.[c] Himmler ran the RSHA personally until 30 January 1943, when Heydrich's positions were taken over by Ernst Kaltenbrunner. 
The last Einsatzgruppen were disbanded in mid-1944 (although some continued to exist on paper until 1945) due to the German retreat on both fronts and the consequent inability to continue extermination activities. Former Einsatzgruppen members were either assigned duties in the Waffen-SS or concentration camps. Twenty-four Einsatzgruppen commanders were tried for war crimes following the war. 
The SS-Mannschaften (Auxiliary-SS) were not considered regular SS members, but were conscripted from other branches of the German military, the Nazi Party, the SA, and the Volkssturm for service in concentration camps and extermination camps. 
The Indian Legion was a Wehrmacht unit formed in August 1942 chiefly from disaffected Indian soldiers of the British Indian Army captured in the North African Campaign. In August 1944 it was transferred to the auspices of the Waffen-SS as the Indische Freiwilligen-Legion der Waffen-SS. There was also a French volunteer division, SS-Charlemagne, which was formed in 1944 mainly from the remnants of the Legion of French Volunteers Against Bolshevism and French Sturmbrigade. 
After 1933 a career in the SS became increasingly attractive to Germany's social elite, who began joining the movement in great numbers, usually motivated by political opportunism. By 1938 about one-third of the SS leadership were members of the upper middle class. The trend reversed after the first Soviet counter-offensive of 1942. 
Leopold von Wiese's Ethik is divided into a "general" and a "specific part": The first part consists of eight chapters: 1) the word "ethics", 2) a "methodological foundation", 3) a "history of ideas, the foundation", and 4) a "systematic foundation", 5) a "distinct from related display modes", 6)" Principles of individual ethics with a pathetic discourse on ethics and unemotional ", 7)" Broad social ethics, and 8) "imperatives". 
Novokilmetovo is located 47 km northwest of Mishkino (the district's administrative centre) by road. Churayevo is the nearest rural locality. 
This Mishkinsky District, Bashkortostan location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
"You Can" is a 1981 single by Madleen Kane and produced by Giorgio Moroder. The song was written by Yolanda Yvette Adams, Donald Ray Atkins and Marcus Ecby.  Along with the track, "Fire in My Heart", "You Can" was Kane's most successful single on the dance charts, spending three weeks at number one.  The single was her only Hot 100 chart entry, peaking at #77. 
Great Hollands is a suburb of Bracknell in Berkshire, England. It takes its name from a medieval field-name of Easthampstead parish, which it was previously in. Building of the estate began around 1967 as the town continued to expand. 
Facilities include a shopping centre, library, community centre, the William Twigg public house and Great Hollands Primary School . There are a number of light industrial units near the shopping centre. 
The development of Great Hollands neighbourhood was originally closely linked with the growth of the Bracknell company, Sperry, which was at the time Bracknell's largest employer. The only memory now left of this company is the concrete gyroscope, which is situated on one of the roundabouts on the Wokingham Road, opposite which Sperry's main building once stood.   The site is now the Arlington Square Complex. 
Some of the first people to move to Great Hollands complained of the delay in the provision of a primary school, shops (especially a chemist) and public telephones. Temporary shops were provided (two houses in Abbotsbury were used - one a Londis store, and the other a newsagent). A community centre was improvised in converted premises (East Lodge). 
The population of Great Hollands had passed the 3000 mark before the neighbourhood centre known today began to take shape.   Sixteen shops opened during 1971, followed somewhat later by the William Twigg public house and, later still, by a primary school. 
In its fully developed form, Great Hollands has a number of features which distinguish it from some of Bracknell's original housing estates. There was a large proportion of private housing built. The neighbourhood centre was planned more comprehensively and included a small amount of light industry. The primary school, a community centre and a branch of the library were all constructed. 
In 1976 the town's first purpose-built health centre opened its doors in the Great Hollands neighbourhood centre. 
Traffic segregation, which was originally started when Wildridings was constructed, was considerably extended along the same lines in Great Hollands. 
The neighbourhood streets branched off a circular road called Ringmead and they were all named in alphabetical order:  Abbotsbury, Ambassador, Appledore and so on ending with Yardley. Many of the names were very familiar ones to the Londoners who moved here as they were the old names of the London telephone exchanges. 
KMLM-DT, virtual channel 42 (UHF digital channel 15), is a religious television station licensed to Odessa, Texas, United States, serving as the flagship station of God's Learning Channel. The station is owned by Prime Time Christian Broadcasting. KMLM's studios are located in Odessa, and its transmitter is located near Gardendale. KMLM also operates satellite station KPCB-DT (virtual and UHF digital channel 17) in Snyder, with transmitter north of the city. 
In addition to KPCB, KMLM operates two other satellite stations, relaying its signal into northwest Texas: 
Crazy Peoples Right to Speak is the third album by English new wave band Kajagoogoo, released in 1985 by Parlophone. The album was not a commercial success and failed to make the UK Top 100. The only single from the album, "Shouldn't Do That", reached No. 63 in the UK. 
For this release, the band had shortened its name to Kaja, a name the band had previously used for the U.S. release of their second album, Islands. By this time, the band was a three-piece, as drummer Jez Strode had quit in 1984. 
Adam Krzysztof Struzik (born January 1, 1957 in Kutno, Poland) is a Polish medical doctor and politician, serving as the current Marshal of Masovian Voivodeship since December 2001. Struzik previously served as Marshal of the Polish Senate between 1993 and 1997. 
This biographical article about a Polish politician is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
He finished his secondary education in 1943 and took Stavanger Commerce School in 1944. In 1950 he graduated with the cand.oecon. degree from the University of Oslo. He was hired as a secretary in Statistics Norway in 1949 and was promoted to acting assisting secretary in 1954 before moving on to become head of department in the Bank of Norway in 1955. 
This article about a Norwegian politician born in the 1920s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
A DNA polymerase is a member of a family of enzymes that catalyze the synthesis of DNA molecules from nucleoside triphosphates, the molecular precursors of DNA. These enzymes are essential for DNA replication and usually work in groups to create two identical DNA duplexes from a single original DNA duplex. During this process, DNA polymerase "reads" the existing DNA strands to create two new strands that match the existing ones. These enzymes catalyze the chemical reaction 
DNA polymerase adds nucleotides to the three prime (3')-end of a DNA strand, one nucleotide at a time. Every time a cell divides, DNA polymerases are required to duplicate the cell's DNA, so that a copy of the original DNA molecule can be passed to each daughter cell. In this way, genetic information is passed down from generation to generation. 
Before replication can take place, an enzyme called helicase unwinds the DNA molecule from its tightly woven form, in the process breaking the hydrogen bonds between the nucleotide bases. This opens up or "unzips" the double-stranded DNA to give two single strands of DNA that can be used as templates for replication in the above reaction. 
The main function of DNA polymerase is to synthesize DNA from deoxyribonucleotides, the building blocks of DNA. The DNA copies are created by the pairing of nucleotides to bases present on each strand of the original DNA molecule. This pairing always occurs in specific combinations, with cytosine along with guanine, and thymine along with adenine, forming two separate pairs, respectively. By contrast, RNA polymerases synthesize RNA from ribonucleotides from either RNA or DNA. 
Based on sequence homology, DNA polymerases can be further subdivided into seven different families: A, B, C, D, X, Y, and RT. 
Some viruses also encode special DNA polymerases, such as Hepatitis B virus DNA polymerase. These may selectively replicate viral DNA through a variety of mechanisms. Retroviruses encode an unusual DNA polymerase called reverse transcriptase, which is an RNA-dependent DNA polymerase (RdDp). It polymerizes DNA from a template of RNA. 
Prokaryotic polymerases exist in two forms: core polymerase and holoenzyme. Core polymerase synthesizes DNA from the DNA template but it cannot initiate the synthesis alone or accurately. Holoenzyme accurately initiates synthesis. 
Each HIV retrovirus particle contains two RNA genomes, but, after an infection, each virus generates only one provirus.  After infection, reverse transcription is accompanied by template switching between the two genome copies (copy choice recombination).  From 5 to 14 recombination events per genome occur at each replication cycle.  Template switching (recombination) appears to be necessary for maintaining genome integrity and as a repair mechanism for salvaging damaged genomes. 
It was proposed that a mutational alteration in the phage DNA polymerase can stimulate template strand switching (copy choice recombination) during replication. 
In 2016, Terehova met professional fighter Dave Leduc when she took a trip to Thailand. The two had never met before, but after writing a story on him on MTL Blog, Terehova decided to leave Canada and meet him in Phuket. The trip was supposed to last two weeks, but Terehova decided to stay and live with Leduc. Journal de Montreal and Huffington Post Quebec both covered her romantic exile, labeling it The Romance Story of the Year. 
In 2017, Terehova and her husband started getting involved with children at NLD AIDS center in Yangon, who are infected with HIV/AIDS virus, bringing them chocolate and treats, as well as giving undisclosed donations. 
On 13 December 2016, the two got married in a traditional Burmese wedding ceremony at the Central Hotel in Yangon, Myanmar. The ceremony was nationally televised on MRTV with an approximate audience of 2 million viewers, catapulting them to the status of celebrity in Myanmar. 
In 2015, Terehova started her personal blog where she wrote a piece Things I Hate About Dating And Relationships in Canada. It sparked various debates in worldwide media, especially in Russia and Canada. She gained widespread attention because of her writing style and subjects. The same year she got approached to join the MTL Blog team. 
While at MTL Blog as Irina Tee, Terehova wrote multiple provocative articles about relationships and dating. She received criticism for allegedly supporting misogyny. Irina became the subject of requests from readers asking for her demission, thus making her even more popular. 
In 2017, Terehova became a guest writer at Jetli.com, a special community built by Jet Li, to share the philosophies about kung Fu and other martial arts. 
In 2004, at 15 years old, Terehova secretly entered a Montreal pageant in Miss Soyuz, reserved for adults and won 1st place. She started her modeling career signing with NEXT Model Management in Montreal. Terehova executed modeling contracts for Loreal, La Senza, Escada and Rusk. She was featured in Canadian magazines such as Marie Claire and LOU LOU.[citation needed] 
 In 2009, Terehova was chosen to feature as the Race Queen in the EA and Ghost Games celebratory video created for the Need for Speed series. 
Dave and Irina led the charge out of Thunder Bay to Wolfville, Nova Scotia, but faltered at the apple sorting challenge and were eventually the last team to meet host Jon Montgomery at the mat at Luckett Vineyards. 
Virtual Eye, the sports division of Animation Research Limited (ARL), specialises in real time sports animations. Based in Dunedin, New Zealand, the company provides its services to a wide range of sports and sports organisations around the world. 
Most widely known for its real time sailing graphics package, Virtual Eye is also involved in golf, cricket, motorsport, and a variety of air sports. 
Lareine (stylized as LAREINE) was a Japanese visual kei rock band formed in 1994. The band's name is reported to have come from the French Queen Marie Antoinette. In 1999 the group signed to Sony, later in 2000 when all other members left, Kamijo created Applause Records. After a number of line-up changes and the release of several albums, EPs and singles, the group disbanded in 2007. 
Although all other member's left, Kamijo decided to continue Lareine alone and created his own record label, Applause Records. This "solo project" continued until 2001 when he ceased Lareine activity and formed New Sodmy with Mayu. But New Sodmy only lasted a year up to 2002 and so Lareine resumed activity. 
On March 26, 2003 Emiru announced he was rejoining Lareine, as was new drummer Kazumi. On May 17, at a concert, Mayu also rejoined the group. On September 5, 2004 the album Never Cage was released. 
Jeffrey Lynn Newman (born September 11, 1948) is an American former Major League Baseball catcher. Newman was drafted by the Cleveland Indians in the 26th round of the 1970 Major League Baseball Draft. He made his MLB debut in 1976. He was an All Star in 1979. He served as the interim manager of the Oakland Athletics in 1986. 
Newman was born in Forth Worth, Texas, and is Jewish. He attended Paschal High School, where he played baseball and basketball. He later lived in Danville, California. 
Newman is a convert to Judaism, having in 1970 converted in an Orthodox ceremony. His son, Ryan, was an infielder for three years in the Pittsburgh Pirates' organization before becoming a coach for the 2005 Gulf Coast League Pirates. 
Newman was a History major at Texas Christian University, where he earned a B.S. in Education and also earned All-America honors as a third baseman in 1968. In his sophomore year after batting .350 he was All-Southwest Conference First Team and All NCAA All-District First Team as well as NCAA All American Third Team, and in 1969 as a junior he batted .345, set university records in RBIs (44) and hits (57), and was All-Conference and All-District First Team. 
He didn't begin catching until 1972 with the Reno Silver Sox. He spent six seasons in the Indians' farm system, batting .259 with 73 home runs and 333 runs batted in when the Oakland A's purchased his contract in October 1975. 
He was batting .229 with 16 home runs and 52 RBIs when he was selected by AL manager Bob Lemon as Oakland's sole representative at the 1979 Major League Baseball All-Star Game. For the season, he hit 22 home runs and drove in 71 runs, both career highs. He also threw out 46.8% of attempted base-stealers, fourth-best of all catchers in the American League. 
At the start of the December 1982 Winter Meetings, the A's sent Newman and outfielder Tony Armas to the Boston Red Sox for Carney Lansford, Garry Hancock, and minor leaguer Jerry King. 
When the Red Sox originally acquired Newman in 1982, it was with the intent that he would be the back-up to Rich Gedman behind the plate. However, he soon fell to third in the depth chart behind Gary Allenson. He was released during spring training in April 1985. 
Peter Carravetta (born 10 May 1951 in Lappano) is an Italian philosopher, poet, literary theorist and translator. 
Octopussy, also known as 8Pussy, is a  free and open-source computer-software which monitors  systems, by constantly analyzing the syslog data they generate and transmit to such a central Octopussy server (thus often called a SIEM solution). Therefore, software like Octopussy plays an important role in maintaining an information security management system within ISO/IEC 27001-compliant environments. 
Although Octopussy is free and open-source software it has a variety of characteristics also found in some professional enterprise applications like Splunk, SAWMILL or Kiwi Syslog. 
The software requires RSYSLOG installed on the syslog-server and expects systems that are monitored to run one of the numerous available syslog services, like e.g. syslogd/klogd, RSYSLOG or syslog-ng. 
Octopussy receives syslog messages via syslog protocol and therefore behaves passively, not running any type of network agent on the remote machines under monitoring/surveillance. Octopussy completely conforms to RfC 3164 and RfC 3195 of the IETF, describing syslog as the logging mechanism in Unix-like/BSD operating systems. That especially includes the internal representation of the facility and severity-principle where applicable. 
The Octo-Parser and Octo-Uparser are two of Octopussy's most important core components. The Octo-Parser is the program used by the Octopussy software to parse logs in syslog format for each device registered within Octopussy. It basically uses a regex-engine and commences pattern matching on incoming syslog messages. The Octo-Uparser is restarted every time device's services are changed, to check if previously received "unknown" log messages can be associated with a service. 
In some cases Octo-Pusher is also called in advance to process non-syslog messages incoming from some devices. In that regard, the device setting "asynchronous" is helpful to process such log messages, after they were sent to an Octopussy server using e.g. FTP, rsync or SSH/SCP. 
The Octopussy interface (GUI) is the default user-interface and provides configuration management, device and service management as well as alert definition and therefore extends the Octopussy core components. Devices are displayed in tabular form on the Devices page, with the following descriptors as a minimum: hostname, IP address, log type, device model/type, FQDN and OS. 
Hence, the interface (Octo-Web) mainly provides access to other Octopussy core components like Octo-Commander, Octo-Message-Finder, Octo-Reporter and Octo-Statistic-Reporter. The Octopussy front-end/GUI is written in Perl 5, employing Apache::ASP to structure and display content. 
In addition to that, Octopussy core services can also be accessed from the operating system shell. That represents a convenient way for administrators to start/stop services or make fundamental configuration changes. 
There is a plug-in/module system in Octopussy, which is mainly geared towards the modification of Octopussy reports. Such a plug-in consists out of a description file, which defines the plug-in name and functions, and a code file with perl code to process the actual data. 
There are also extensions for software related to Octopussy, like e.g. a Nagios plug-in that checks the Octopussy core services (i.e. Octo-Dispatcher, Octo-Scheduler, etc.) as well as the Octopussy parser states and log partitions. 
Usually the logs wizard is used to search the system for unrecognized syslog messages per device to generate new service patterns. During the process the creation of patterns should be in a way that enables Octopussy to distinguish messages based on their severity and taxonomy. 
Merrick ran for election to the Alaska House to succeed Lora Reinbold, who ran for the Alaska Senate. Merrick defeated Jamie Allard and Eugene Harnett in a 3-way race of the Republican primary and nonpartisan Joe Hackenmueller in the general election. 
This article relating to the superfamily Zygaenoidea is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The libSBML library is free software released under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by the Free Software Foundation; either version 2.1 of the License, or any later version.  LibSBML was developed thanks to funding from many agencies, particularly the National Institute of General Medical Sciences (NIGMS, USA) as well as the Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency (DARPA, USA) under the Bio-SPICE program. 
LibSBML uses software objects (i.e., instances of classes) that correspond to SBML components, with member variables representing the attributes of the corresponding SBML objects.  The libSBML API is constructed to provide an intuitive way of relating SBML and the code needed to create or manipulate it with a class hierarchy that mimics the SBML structure.  More information about the libSBML objects is available in the libSBML API documentation. 
LibSBML enables reading from and writing to either files or strings. Once an SBML document is read, libSBML stores the SBML content in an SBMLDocument object.  This object can be written out again later. The following is an example written in Python: 
The libSBML API allows easy creation of objects and subobjects representing SBML elements and the subelements contained within them.  The following is an example written in C++: 
Each component in SBML has a number of attributes associated with it. These are stored as member variables of a given class, and libSBML provides functions to retrieve and query these values. The syntax of these functions is consistent throughout libSBML. The following is an example written in Python: 
The List of United Kingdom Speedway League Riders' Champions is the list of individual riders who have won the United Kingdom's League Riders' Championship that corresponded to the relevant league at the time. The list is split into three divisions, the top tier, the second tier and third tier, all three divisions have been known in various guises such as National League, Premier League, Elite League and many more. This list gives a complete listing of the winners for each season. 
Shavahn Nikole Church (born May 3, 1989 in Van Nuys, Los Angeles, California) is a American-British artistic gymnast who lives and trained in California. She formerly competed for the United States but decided in 2005 to represent Great Britain. 
Church was born and raised in the California to British parents Raymond and Mandy Church. She has two sisters, Carley and Jade, who were also born in the United Kingdom. Her grandparents live in England. 
Church was a member of the U.S. Junior National Team in 2003. In 2004, she competed at the American Classic, finishing third on floor exercise and fifth all-around. Her placements qualified her for the U.S. championships in June 2004, where she broke her hand on her first event, the uneven bars. 
Following an October 2004 ACL tear and faced with the likelihood of not making the U.S. Worlds team for 2005, Church decided to switch to competing for Great Britain while continuing to live and train in the U.S. She made her major international debut at the 2005 World Championships in Melbourne. Not fully recovered from an injury and severely out of competition practice, she placed 20th in the all-around. 
Church was also a member of the British team for the 2006 European Championships in Greece. She had hopes of more success on bars (her highest Commonwealth Games score would have qualified her to the European finals), but injury struck in the qualifying rounds and she was unable to complete the competition. Later in 2006, she underwent surgery, and the recovery kept her out of further competition that year. 
As a member of the University of California, Los Angeles women's gymnastics team, Church's competition debut was delayed after arthroscopic surgery on her right knee. In 2008, her only year of competition, she scored a season-best (9.875) at the NCAA Women's Gymnastics Championships, which was her final gymnastics meet. She was named a UCLA letterwinner for the year. 
In July 2008, Church announced her retirement from gymnastics and began a coaching career in California. 
Daniel Fulanse (born 5 February 1962) is a Zambian boxer. He competed in the men's light welterweight event at the 1992 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article related to a Zambian boxer is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
From these left-over materials, Serra and the Pei team built a crescent-shaped extension onto the water. This pier took over three years to build, with the help of the Pei team and architect Hiroshi Okamoto. During its construction, the pier needed extensive engineering and underwater reinforcements, positioned by a team of deep-sea divers, for stabilization. 
The unveiling of 7 was attended by Sheikh bin Khalifa Al-Thani, Sheikha Al-Mayassa bint Hamad bin Khalifa Al-Thani, other royals of the House of Thani, and more than 700 guests. At the ceremony, the Qatar Philharmonic Orchestra performed Hughes de Courson's "The Magic Lutes" and Serra spoke about its origins and his own research. 
John Stansfield "Sandy" Parkinson is an American biologist, currently a Distinguished Professor at University of Utah.  He was the chairman of the Department of Biology at University of Utah. 
This article about a biologist from the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Martin Luther High School was built after World War II as the second school of the Lutheran High School Association of Greater Milwaukee. It was designed to serve over 800 students. The campus has a drug- and smoke-free policy. 
The school has a college preparatory program that focuses on mathematics, literature, history, the arts and foreign language. 
The school has three bands, the Spartan, the Varsity and the Symphonic Band. Symphonic Band is an audition-only band that has toured in Colorado, Texas, Tennessee, Florida and Washington D.C.[citation needed] Small ensembles include Jazz Band, Brass Choir, Flute Choir, Clarinet Choir, Woodwind Ensemble, Sax Choir and Pep Band. 
There is a choir program comprising four choirs, including a men's and women's choir and two mixed choirs. The top choir, the Concert Choir, has toured in New York, California and Washington D.C. and has performed at choir competitions throughout the area. Students participate in the District Wisconsin State Music Association Contest in the spring. 
Music classes cover the study of humanities, advanced music and independent study music theory. The music computer laboratory allows students to write music and familiarize themselves with music technology such as ACID, Reason and Sibelius music notation software. 
Ghent Creek rises in a pond about 0.5 miles northwest of Five Forks, North Carolina, and then flows northeast to join the Hyco River about 4 miles north-northwest of Woodsdale. 
This article about a location in Person County, North Carolina is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Prisoner of Ice (also Call of Cthulhu: Prisoner of Ice) is an adventure game developed and released by Infogrames for the PC and Macintosh computers in 1995 in America and Europe. It is based on H. P. Lovecraft's Cthulhu Mythos, particularly At the Mountains of Madness, and is a follow-up to Infogrames' earlier Shadow of the Comet. In 1997, the game was ported to the Sega Saturn and PlayStation exclusively in Japan. 
Late in the game, in Argentina, Ryan meets John Parker, the central character from Shadow of the Comet, and reveals the links between the two games. Narackamous, the main antagonist of Shadow of the Comet, also returns.  
The game involves solving puzzles through a point and click user interface. The player can examine any item and, depending on the item, either pick it up, use another item on it, or operate it in some way. 
Some puzzles, if not completed within a short span of time (always less than a minute), will result in a game over. To ensure that the player does not get stuck by saving their game at a point from which they cannot possibly complete a puzzle in time, the game autosaves onto a separate save file at the beginning of each timed puzzle. 
The game was released for PC DOS, PC Windows and Macintosh computer platforms in America (where it was published by I Motion) and Europe in 1995. It was released as Call of Cthulhu: Prisoner of Ice in PAL territories. 
In Japan, the game was released in 1997 as Prisoner of Ice: Jashin Kourin, and ported to the Sega Saturn and Sony PlayStation game consoles. These ports contain no enhancements from the PC versions. The English voice acting of the PC version is retained, but the text which appears when examining or picking up objects is translated to Japanese. The Saturn version is compatible with the Netlink Mouse. 
In 2015, Prisoner of Ice and Shadow of the Comet were re-released as DRM-free on GOG.com for modern computers. 
A reviewer for Next Generation gave the PC version three out of five stars, praising the gripping storyline, beautiful animation, and eerie atmosphere, but criticized the "emotionless" voice acting. He concluded, "It's worth checking out for the great storyline and art, but not good for much else." 
The historical basis for the MM algorithm can be dated back to at least 1970, when Ortega and Rheinboldt were performing studies related to line search methods. The same concept continued to reappear in different areas in different forms. In 2000, Hunter and Lange put forth "MM" as a general framework. Recent studies[who?] have applied the method in a wide range of subject areas, such as mathematics, statistics, machine learning and engineering.[citation needed] 
The MM algorithm works by finding a surrogate function that minorizes or majorizes the objective function. Optimizing the surrogate function will either improve the value of the objective function or leave it unchanged. 
One can use any inequality to construct the desired majorized/minorized version of the objective function. Typical choices include 
The Housing Act 1996 is an Act of Parliament in the United Kingdom. Part VII of the Act concerns the duties that a local authority has to homeless people and when these duties arise. Section 189 of the Act concerns the "priority need" hurdle that a homelessness application must pass for a Council to have a duty to provide interim accommodation. 
Monica Mesalles (born (1987-10-02)2 October 1987) was a Spanish female artistic gymnast, representing her nation at international competitions.   
She participated at the 2004 Summer Olympics.  She also competed at world championships, including the 2003 World Artistic Gymnastics Championships in Anaheim. 
This biographical article related to Spanish artistic gymnastics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Aadil Assana (born 27 January 1993) is a Comorian football player who most recently played for Marignane Gignac FC. He primarily plays as a defensive midfielder. 
Bone Hard Zaggin' is a limited edition (333 copies) vinyl EP release by Girl Talk released by 333 Recordings. 
Aethalochroa affinis, commonly known as the Pakistani stick mantis, is a species of praying mantis in the genus Aethalochroa native to Pakistan. 
Darrel Damoo (born 22 September 1989) is a Seychellois football striker who plays for The Lions FC. He was a squad member for the 2019 COSAFA Cup and the 2019 Indian Ocean Island Games. 
This biographical article related to Seychellois association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
"Two Hearts Beat as One" is a song by Irish rock band U2. It is the seventh track on their 1983 album, War, and was released as its second single in the United States, United Kingdom, and Australia on 21 March 1983. 
The music video was directed by Meiert Avis and was filmed on Montmartre in Paris in March 1983 and portrays the band performing the song, intercut with scenes of an acrobat and other scenes featuring Peter Rowen (the boy who appears on the album cover). Unlike the other videos from the album, it has never been included on any of the band's video compilations. 
It was released as the album's second single in the US, UK and Australia, as opposed to "Sunday Bloody Sunday", which was released only in the mainland of Europe. Both singles were released in Japan. 
"Two Hearts Beat as One" features a bassline by Adam Clayton which is played at the beginning of the song. 
A live performance of the song at Red Rocks Amphitheatre appears on the DVD release of the concert film Live at Red Rocks: Under a Blood Red Sky. 
This is a list of the land owned or managed by the Forestry Commission on the Isle of Wight, England, United Kingdom. In Great Britain the Forestry Commission are the government department responsible for the protection and expansion of Britain's forests and woodlands. As of 2007, there are 8 areas of woodland on the Isle of Wight being managed by the Forestry Commission, 5 are owned by them and 3 are leased from other owners. 
The Yankee Bicycle Company built bicycles in West Chicago, Illinois in 1991 and 1992. The bicycles were designed by Royce Husted incorporating his patented Rim Band Brake scheme as well as a Radial Gear concept for shifting through fifteen gears. 
The Yankee Bicycle has neither rear or front derailleurs, internal hub, or chainring.  Instead, the Radial Gear scheme uses a single six-segment sprocket that expands and contracts establishing different gear diameters.  Unlike with derailleur systems, Radial Gearing will not cause inter-gear slippage. 
In 1991, within Popular Sciences' Best of What's New issue,  the Yankee Bicycle was awarded the Grand Award for Recreation. 
The entry of the Yankee Bicycle into the bicycle market highlighted the impression that the bicycle industry is reluctant to introduce new innovative technology unless it is rolled out by major industry leaders (e.g., Schwinn Bicycle Company). 
Being frustrated by bicycle manufacturers' reluctance to embrace new innovative bicycle technologies, Royce Husted, the founder,  created his company and sold Yankee Bicycles out of a  facility in West Chicago, Illinois. Husted would have preferred that others built and sold his bicycles. 
Royce Husted witnessed his family having problems when they rode their bicycles.  As a person capable of holding several patents, he designed a whole new approach to shifting and braking bicycles. 
After being in operation for only one year, starting in 1991, the company and relevant patents were sold to NordicTrak in 1992. 
Perhaps only 3,000 Yankee Bicycles were built.  The unique elements were not readily accepted by the bike industry which, arguably,  valued only industry leaders' innovations.  The name was derived as a reference to "Yankee ingenuity". 
Unlike other regular recreational bikes, Yankee Bicycles use systems invented by the founder, Royce Husted, for its shifting and braking.  Not using chainrings, Radial Gear has a single sprocket that expands and contracts in response to a single gear shift lever.  The selection of the gear is based on the length of time the shift lever is depressed.  The braking scheme uses a Kevlar-covered steel cable that completely encircles the rear wheel around an extra rim. 
Due to lack of available parts and limited production, the Yankee Bicycles have become a collectors item  (see external link section). 
Hangman Comics was the name of an American anthology comic book series published by MLJ Magazines Inc., more commonly known as MLJ Comics, for seven issues between Spring 1942 and Fall 1943. It featured MLJs costumed vigilante The Hangman, and "Boy Buddies", featuring Shield's partner 'Dusty the Boy Detective' and Wizard's side-kick 'Roy the Superboy', throughout the series. 
Hangman Comics was published by MLJ Magazines Inc., the precursor to what would become the publisher Archie Comics. The title started with issue #2 (Spring 1942), a 68-page comics following directly on from Special Comics #1, which also featured the same characters. The series was edited by Harry Shorten. 
There were also two supporting stories in each issue starring "Boy Buddies", the Shield's partner 'Dusty the Boy Detective' and the Wizard's side-kick 'Roy the Superboy' in a dual adventure - the first regular costumed hero 'sidekick' team-up in comics. Most of the "Boy Buddies" stories were written by Bill Woolfolk, with art by either Paul Reinman or Bill Vogoda. 
From issue #9 Hangman Comics was retitled Black Hood Comics. The Hangman continued to appear in Pep Comics, "Boy Buddies" continuing in the first three issues of "Black Hood Comics". 
Janet Lansbury (born Janet Louise Johnson; July 10, 1959) is an American educator who was an actress in film and television, credited as Janet Julian for much of her career. 
Lansbury got her big break when she won the role of Nancy Drew in the 1970s television series The Hardy Boys/Nancy Drew Mysteries when Pamela Sue Martin left the show in 1978. Her other well-known TV role came a year later on the Cult TV series B. J. and the Bear as Tommy. She starred on the evening soap opera Falcon Crest in 1989 as Cookie Nash. 
Lansbury made guest appearances on several TV shows, among them Battlestar Galactica, The Fall Guy, Knight Rider, Fudge, Columbo,  Swamp Thing, 240 Robert, Murder, She Wrote, and Diagnosis: Murder. Her first film role was in the 1978 movie Big Wednesday. She also appeared in the 1990 cult film King of New York. 
This article about a property in Rowan County, North Carolina on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Imamiyaebisu is an elevated station with one island platform serving the two easternmost tracks of the four-track right-of-way. Strictly speaking, it belongs to the Nankai Main Line, but only local Koya Line trains stop at this station. 
This Osaka Prefecture railroad station-related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Contributors later included Walter Korn (1953), Arthur Bisguier (1957), and Petar Trifunovic (1963). 
From its beginning in 1933, Chess Review had been the leading U.S. chess periodical. In 1961 Frank Brady redesigned Chess Life, the official USCF publication, changing it from a newspaper format to a glossy magazine. The magazines would compete until November 1969 when Horowitz retired and the USCF purchased Chess Review to merge the magazines to form Chess Life & Review. 
Soe Win was born in 1961 to Chit Sein and Kyin Htwe. In 1976, he attended a cadet course at the Defense Services Academy, alongside Ye Htut, graduating with distinctions in military science and literature. 
In 1981, Soe Win graduated from the Defense Services Academy (DSA) during its 22nd intake. In June 2008, he became the commander of the Northern Regional Command of the Myanmar Army in Kachin State. In August 2010, he became Chief of the Bureau of Special Operations-6 (BSO-6), which oversees military operations in Chin and Rakhine States and the Magwe Region. 
Soe Win had also pressured the Kachin Independence Army (KIA) to convert into a "Border Guard Force" (BGF) under the control of the military. Despite numerous meetings between Soe win and KIA leaders in July 2009 and August 2010, the KIA did not become a BGF. 
In September 2011, the Kachin Independence Army (KIA) accused Soe Win of ordering Tatmadaw soldiers to attack KIA positions in Kachin State, thus violating the terms of multiple ceasefire agreements signed prior to the alleged attacks. Soe Win denied the claims, saying that neither he nor anyone else in the Northern Regional Command had ordered an attack on the KIA. 
The U.S. Department of the Treasury has imposed sanctions on "Soe Win" since 10 December 2019, pursuant to Executive Order 13818, which builds upon and implements the Global Magnitsky Human Rights Accountability Act and targets perpetrators of serious human rights abuse and corruption. He has committed serious human rights abuse against members of ethnic minority groups across Burma. This US sanctions include a freezing of assets under the US and a ban on transactions with any US person. 
The Government of Canada has imposed sanctions on him since 18 February 2021, pursuant to Special Economic Measures Act and Special Economic Measures (Burma) Regulations, in response to the gravity of the human rights and humanitarian situation in Myanmar (formerly Burma). Canadian sanctions include a freezing of assets under Canada and a ban on transactions with any Canadian person. 
Furthermore, the Council of the European Union has imposed sanctions on him since 22 March 2021, pursuant to Council Regulation (EU) 2021/479 and Council Implementing Regulation (EU) 2021/480 which amended Council Regulation (EU) No 401/2013, for his responsibility for the military coup and the subsequent military and police repression against peaceful demonstrators. The EU sanctions include a freezing of assets under member countries of the EU and a ban on entry or transit to the countries. 
The Legend of the Condor Heroes is a Hong Kong television series adapted from Louis Cha's novel of the same title. The series was first broadcast on CTV in Hong Kong in 1976. 
Mosaics is a live album by composer/bassist Graham Collier which was originally released on the British Philips label in 1971. 
Allmusic said "Mosaics is one of Collier's most provocative works yet, and stands the test of time extremely well". On All About Jazz Nic Jones noted "As a bandleader Collier was by this time fashioning some distinctive frameworks for improvisation, and the group as a whole, with alto and tenor saxophonist Bob Sydor joining Beckett and Wakeman in the front line, seems so "bedded in" with Collier's work that the result is only stimulating listening of a rarefied order". 
Previously, at the 2005 European Youth Olympic Festival (EYOF), held in Monthey, Switzerland, he competed in the events of Slalom (38th), Giant Slalom (DNF1), and Super G (49th). 
This biographical article relating to alpine skiing in Cyprus is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Born November 23, 1914, in Washington, D.C., Atkins received a Bachelor of Laws in 1936 from the Fredric G. Levin College of Law at the University of Florida. He entered private practice in Stuart, Florida from 1936 to 1941. He practiced law in Miami, Florida from 1941 to 1966. 
Atkins was nominated by President Lyndon B. Johnson on June 28, 1966, to the United States District Court for the Southern District of Florida, to a new seat authorized by 80 Stat. 75. He was confirmed by the United States Senate on July 22, 1966, and received his commission on July 22, 1966. He served as Chief Judge from 1977 to 1982. He assumed senior status on December 31, 1982. His service terminated on March 11, 1999, due to his death in Miami. 
In 1969, Atkins worked on ensuring the desegregation of Miami schools by appointing a special panel to ensure the plan was carried out. In 1970, he ruled on a famous case involving the poet Allen Ginsberg after someone shut off Ginsberg's microphone during a public reading. Atkins ruled that Ginsberg should be given another reading, free of charge.[citation needed] 
Among the many important cases in a long and distinguished career, Atkins issued landmark rulings protecting the constitutional rights of homeless people in Pottinger v. City of Miami, as well as major rulings in other cases involving the rights of Haitian and Cuban refugees. 
The race was first run in 1997. It was downgraded from Grade 2 to Grade 3 in 2017. and returned to Grade 2 status in 2018. 
The first world record in the men's 50 metres freestyle in long course (50 metres) swimming was recognized by the International Swimming Federation (FINA) in 1976. In the short course (25 metres) swimming events the world's governing body recognizes world records since March 3, 1991. 
The drop in world record times in the 2008/2009 coincided with the introduction of polyurethane suits from Speedo (LZR, 50% polyurethane) in 2008 and by Arena (X-Glide), Adidas (Hydrofoil) and Italian swimming suit manufacturer Jaked (all 100% polyurethane) in 2009.  FINA's ban on non-textile suit came into effect in January 2010. FINA also released a list of approved suits. 
The cottage is registered on the Philadelphia Register of Historic Places and is an inventoried structure within the Fairmount Park Historic District entry on the National Register of Historic Places. 
Ed Marshall (born September 23, 1947) is a former American football wide receiver and tight end who played in the National Football League.  
Marshall played both football and basketball at Cameron University. He led the Aggies in scoring for as a sophomore, junior and senior and is the school's all-time leading receiver with 113 receptions for 2,448 yards and 29 touchdowns (Cameron discontinued football in 1992). Marshall was inducted into Cameron's Athletic Hall of Fame in 2011. 
Ochotrichobolus is a genus of fungi in the Thelebolaceae family. This is a monotypic genus, containing the single species Ochotrichobolus polysporus. 
USS Tioga (1862) was a large steamer with powerful guns, acquired by the Union Navy during the American Civil War. 
Tioga was used by the Union Navy as a gunboat in support of the Union Navy blockade of Confederate waterways. 
The double-ender sailed for Hampton Roads, Virginia, late that day, joined the North Atlantic Blockading Squadron upon her arrival there on 5 July, and promptly ascended the James River to support Union troops beleaguered in a small pocket on the north bank of the river. 
While in the James River Flotilla, Tioga escorted supply ships and frequently exchanged fire with Southern batteries and sharpshooters ashore. One of her more unusual duties during this assignment was the chore of protecting the barge which carried and launched an observation balloon to reconnoiter Confederate positions and troop deployments. Thus, it has been claimed jocularly that she was one of the first warships to screen an aircraft carrier. 
She took her first prize on 14 February 1863, when she overhauled Avon and sent that English schooner to Key West, Florida, for adjudication. On 13 March, she captured another British schooner, Florence Nightingale, laden with cotton and without papers. Nine days later, she made a prize of the English side-wheel steamer Granite City. The British sloop Justina struck her colors to the gunboat on 23 April. 
A week later, Tioga captured Julia as that English schooner attempted to slip through the Union blockade laden with cotton and rosin. On 25 September, she took Confederate steamer Herald which had escaped from the South with a cargo of cotton and naval stores. 
Three days before the gunboat made this capture, orders had left Washington to transfer Tioga to the East Gulf Blockading Squadron. After beginning her new assignment, the double-ender participated in the capture of sloop Last Trial near Key West; but thereafter she spent much of the autumn undergoing repairs at Key West. 
Late in the spring of 1864, yellow fever broke out on board Tioga; and, on 19 June, she was ordered north. She arrived at Portsmouth, New Hampshire, on the 27th and was decommissioned two days later but remained in quarantine in the lower harbor until October. 
After an overhaul had been completed and the Civil War had ended, Tioga was recommissioned at Portsmouth on 6 June 1865 and cruised off the New England coast through the summer. In October, the ship was transferred to the Gulf Squadron; and she arrived at Pensacola, Florida, on 30 November. The double-ender cruised in the Gulf of Mexico, principally off the coast of Texas, through the winter and into the spring of 1866. 
Ordered north, Tioga arrived at New York City on 8 May and was laid up in the navy yard there until she was sold on 15 October 1867. 
This article incorporates text from the public domain Dictionary of American Naval Fighting Ships. The entry can be found here. 
Stop43 is a UK-based digital rights group that lobbies on behalf of photographers for the preservation of their copyrights.   They ran a viral campaign in 2010 to oppose a change in British law that would have removed copyright protection from orphaned works.  The campaign was successful. 
This article about an organisation in the United Kingdom is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
He married Fannie Roscoe in 1886. At this time he was mostly working in the south of England, but in 1901 became District Geologist with responsibility for South Wales. He was elected Fellow of the Royal Society in 1903, became President of the Geology Section of the British Association in 1904, and was President of the Geological Society of London in 1913 and 1914. He was Director of the Survey from 1914 until his retirement in 1920. He lived in Goring-on-Thames until his death there in 1928. 
Manny Neves is a retired Portuguese-American soccer midfielder who played professionally in the North American Soccer League, United Soccer League, and Major Indoor Soccer League. 
This biographical article related to an American soccer midfielder is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Afrocalathea is a genus of plants native to Africa. It contains only one species: Afrocalathea rhizantha (K.Schum.) K.Schum, known from Nigeria, Cameroon, Gabon, Cabinda, and Congo-Brazzaville. 
This biographical article relating to Slovenian association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Polypure is a Norwegian company that manufactures and markets monodisperse PEG (polyethylene glycol) derivatives for applications in nanotechnology, biotechnology and in pharmaceutical sciences.  
Its headquarters are located in the Oslo Innovation Center, Oslo, Norway. The company has been in operation since 1999. 
Monodisperse PEG products are used as linkers or molecular tethers to join molecular entities (as in Cipriano and Dunn). They are also coupled to substances to make use of the hydrophilic property of PEG to enhance water solubility, or to facilitate penetration of a coupled substance through cell membranes  as well as to reduce immunogenicity of proteins used as therapeutic agents. 
The major shareholders in the company are Erik Agner, co-founder and CEO of the Company, and Gamma Group AS. 
This article about Egyptology or subjects relating to Ancient Egypt is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
There has been human occupation in the area that is now Cheadle since prehistoric times.[citation needed] The earliest evidence of civilisation is of burial mounds dating from the Iron Age, belonging to Celts who occupied Britain. Later, the area was occupied by Brigantes, whose activity was discovered in the form of axe fragments. 
In the first millennium, Romans occupied the area, and their coins have been discovered. During the 7th century St. Chad preached in the area, and a stone cross dedicated to him was found close to the confluence of the River Mersey and Micker Brook in 1873. 
The village is first recorded in the Domesday Book under the name "Cedde", which comes from the Celtic word for "wood". It was held by Gamel, a free Saxon under Hugh d'Avranches, 1st Earl of Chester; it was about three miles long and half as wide, containing both wooded and open land, with areas enclosed for hunting purposes. This early manor occupied the approximate areas of both modern day Cheadle and Cheadle Hulme. 
William de Bulkeley succeeded his mother, and was a participant in several wars in France for Edward, the Black Prince. His son, Richard, was sent to live at the court Richard II, and later to a baron whose daughter Margery married Richard. Richard died at the age of 21, but Margery lived until she was around 90 years old. She was succeeded by her grandson and great-grandson, both named William. Shortly after the Battle of Bosworth, the latter William was succeeded by his brother Richard. 
During the reign of Henry VIII, the current St Mary's Church on High Street was built. There has been a church on the site since the 12th century, the original being constructed of wood, but it was rebuilt in stone between 1520 and 1550. The church contains an effigy of John Stanley who, along with many other men from the area, fought in the Battle of Flodden. Later he claimed the manor for himself, but was imprisoned by Thomas Wolsey who ensured the land went to its rightful owner. 
The Bulkeleys continued to hold the lands as lords of the manor until the 18th century, when the manor was purchased by Thomas Egerton. 
Moseley Old Hall, an early Stuart mansion dating from 1666 is still standing and is owned privately. 
Abney Hall is a late Victorian hall from 1847 and was used as the Cheadle town hall from 1959 until 1974: it is now used for offices. It is surrounded by parkland which is open to the public all year round and features some of the only wetlands left in Stockport. 
Cheadle grew rapidly during the Industrial Revolution when it was used as a stopping point for travellers and merchants on their way to central Manchester. 
Lying within the historic county boundaries of Cheshire, Cheadle was an ancient parish in the Hundred of Stockport. The parish included the townships of Cheadle Bulkeley and Cheadle Moseley (which included Cheadle Hulme).  Following the Municipal Corporations Act 1835, part of Cheadle Bulkeley was amalgamated into the Municipal Borough of Stockport. Cheadle Bulkeley and Cheadle Moseley became separate civil parishes in 1866, but in 1879 they were united to form the civil parish of Cheadle. 
Since 1950, Cheadle has been part of the Cheadle parliamentary constituency. As of 2015, it is represented by Conservative MP Mary Robinson. The area (listed as Cheadle and Gatley) has three councillors who serve on the borough council, who are all Liberal Democrats. 
Cheadle's public transport is now confined to buses operated by several firms. Bus 11 runs between Altrincham and Stockport, via Baguley, Wythenshawe Hospital, Wythenshawe and Cheadle. Bus 11A runs between Altrincham and Stockport, via Timperley, Baguley, Gatley and Cheadle. Bus 42C runs between Handforth and Manchester city centre, via Cheadle and East Didsbury. 
Cheadle no longer has its own railway station, though there are stations in several neighbouring vicinities. Gatley railway station is approximately one mile west of Cheadle village and the neighbouring areas of East Didsbury (within the City of Manchester's boundaries), Cheadle Hulme and Heald Green all have stations themselves. 
Cheadle is accessed by junctions 2 and 3 of the M60 Manchester orbital motorway. It is approximately 4 miles from Manchester Airport. 
A number of houses in Cheadle that were built in the 1800s still stand today, in a conservation area in the centre of the village. 
There is also a Manchester overspill council estate that was constructed shortly after the Second World War to rehouse families from the Victorian slums of inner-city Manchester. In April 2008, these homes were transferred to a housing association, Mossbank Homes. 
It formerly had the head office of Nord Anglia Education. At a later time the Nord Anglia Cheadle housed the International Schools and Learning Services divisions. 
The village's football club is Cheadle Town F.C. that play in the North West Counties Football League. 
Keith Scott "Bang Bang" McCurdy (born November 28, 1985) is an American celebrity tattoo artist based in New York. He is known for his work with Rihanna, Cara Delevingne, Katy Perry, Justin Bieber, LeBron James, Adele, Miley Cyrus, Selena Gomez and Kylie Jenner. 
McCurdy married Etsuko Tsujimoto, with whom he has two daughters, Kumiko and Yukari. He is a relative of Nickelodeon actress Jennette McCurdy and Bob Saget[citation needed]. 
Basic and Applied Social Psychology (BASP) is a bi-monthly psychology journal published by Taylor & Francis. The journal emphasizes the publication of empirical research articles but also publishes literature reviews, criticism, and methodological or theoretical statements spanning the entire range of social psychological issues. 
In 2015, the journal banned p-values (and related inferential statistics such as confidence intervals) as evidence in papers accepted by the journal, replacing hypothesis testing with "strong descriptive statistics, including effect sizes" on the grounds that "the state of the art [for hypothesis testing] remains uncertain". 
This article about an academic journal on social psychology is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
See tips for writing articles about academic journals. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
Melaleuca pearsonii, commonly known as Blackdown bottlebrush, is a plant in the myrtle family, Myrtaceae and is endemic to Queensland in Australia. (Some Australian state herbaria continue to use the name Callistemon pearsonii.) It is a small, spreading but compact shrub with hard bark, soft foliage and profuse spikes of bottlebrush flowers in spring and summer. 
Melaleuca pearsonii was first named in 2006 by Lyndley Craven in Novon when Callistemon pearsonii was moved to the present genus. It had previously been known as Callistemon pearsonii, formally described by Roger Spencer and Peter Lumley in 1986 in Muelleria, based on plant material collected from the Blackdown Tabeland. The specific epithet (pearsonii) honours Steven Pearson, a park ranger in the Blackdown Tableland National Park. 
Callistemon pearsonii is regarded as a synonym of Melaleuca pearsonii by the Royal Botanic Gardens, Kew. 
Melaleuca pearsonii occurs on the Blackdown Tableland in Queensland. It grows near rivers, in rocky gullies and in wallum vegetation in creek beds. 
Melaleuca pearsonii is sometimes cultivated as Callistemon pearsonii including the cultivar "Rocky Rambler". 
The Otay Mesa Port of Entry is accessed by California State Route 905 on the northern side. Since commercial traffic cannot use the San Ysidro Port of Entry, for commercial traffic Otay Mesa is the southern terminus of the Interstate 5 corridor. 
The records for genealogical research are available at the state archive "Statny Archiv in Banska Bystrica, Kosice, Slovakia" 
Sir Edmund Vestey, 1st Baronet, co-founder of the Blue Star Line, was the younger brother of the first Baron Vestey. 
In 2014 Huckaby received the Visiting Artist Residency and Fellowship through the Brandywine Workshop as well as the Davidson Family Fellowship sponsored by Amon Carter Museum of American Art. In 2016, he was one of the winners of the Outwin Boochever Portrait Competition, which is hosted by The Smithsonian's National Portrait Gallery. 
In 2017 he received the 2016 Moss/Chumley North Texas Artist Award, which is given annually by the Meadows Museum at Southern Methodist University in Dallas. 
In 2018, Huckaby won the arts and letters award in art from the American Academy of Arts and Letters. 
The Kolkata Knight Riders (KKR) is a franchise cricket team based in Kolkata, India, which plays in the Indian Premier League (IPL). They were one of the eight teams that competed in the 2014 Indian Premier League. They were captained by Gautam Gambhir. Kolkata Knight Riders finished winners in the IPL and qualified for the Champions League T20. 
Don't Ask! is an adventure published by Mayfair Games in 1986 for the superhero role-playing game DC Heroes that features Ambush Bug from DC Comics. 
Lex Luthor announces that he is taking control of Time, but Ambush Bug intervenes, and takes control of Time himself. The heroes must battle Luthor, Ambush Bug and perfect copies of themselves in order to save the universe. 
Mayfair Games published the superhero role-playing game DC Heroes in 1985. Don't Ask! was published the following year, a 32-page softcover book by Scott Jenkins with Robert Loren Fleming, with interior art by Rob Davis, cartography by James Clouse, and cover art by Ed Hannigan (sketch), Keith Giffen (pencil), Bob Smith (ink), and Bob LeRose (color). 
Pete Tamlyn reviewed Don't Ask! for White Dwarf #88, and thought the whole thing was an in joke, stating "you need to be a comic fan (and a DC afficionado in particular) in order to understand many of the jokes. That gives the adventure a much more limited audience." 
Crinifer is a genus of birds in the turaco family. They are restricted to Africa. Formerly, the genus only contained the plaintain-eaters, but in 2021 go-away-birds were merged into the genus.  
They are large noisy and conspicuous birds, but lack the brilliant colours of their relatives. They are mainly grey, with a long tail and an erectile head crest. They feed on fruit, especially figs, seeds and other vegetable matter. 
Rizon Jet was an Arab charter airline founded in 2006, and headquartered in Doha, Qatar. Its business mainly focused on the chartering of private jets and luxury travel. It also provided lease of office space and conferencing facilities. 
In addition to its Qatari operations, it also had operations in Bahrain, the United Arab Emirates, and the United Kingdom. 
"In his landscapes, Weidner takes a greater liberty in changing and rearranging the colors and shapes he sees than in his figure paintings. The dominant element in his work continues to be the intensity and vibrancy of his colors - strong violets, blues and greens. While his earlier work was "fluid"-looking, his paintings now have the dry surface and brilliant color of pastel."
The Philadelphia Inquirer Art Critic from 1962 to 2012 was Victoria Donohoe, who wrote the following about Weidner's 1981 show at the Marian Locks Gallery in Philadelphia: 
The Country Fair by Roswell Weidner, c. 1938, oil on canvas. Collection of the Pennsylvania Academy of the Fine Arts 
Industrial Town 2 by Roswell Weidner, c. 1938 (see carborundum printmaking). Shown at the 1939 New York World's Fair 
Winter on Spring Street by Roswell Weidner, c. 1938, lithograph. Collection of the Library of Congress 
Merry-Go-Round by Roswell Theordore Weidner, c. 1948, oil on canvas. Courtesy of the Reading Public Museum, Reading, Pennsylvania. 
Dorcas Combing her hair by Roswell Weidner, c. 1942, oil on canvas. Collection of the Pennsylvania Academy of the Fine Arts 
Burlesque Queen by Roswell Weidner, c. 1955, oil/tempera on burlap. Collection of the Pennsylvania Academy of the Fine Arts. (Interior of the Trocadero Theatre in Philadelphia, PA) 
Concrete, Steel, and Sky by Roswell Weidner, 1958, casein on canvas. Collection of the Pennsylvania Academy of the Fine Arts 
The Willow Tree by Roswell Weidner, 1964, charcoal on paper. Collection of the Pennsylvania Academy of the Fine Arts 
Upstream by Roswell Weidner, 1979, pastel on paper. Collection of the Pennsylvania Academy of the Fine Arts 
Weidner died in his home in Philadelphia with his wife Marilyn and his daughters by his side. His ashes were scattered in the Pine Barrens (New Jersey). 
Inactivated on October 16, 1944 with the drawdown of AAFTC's pilot training program. Declared surplus and turned over to the Army Corps of Engineers on 30 September 1945. Eventually discharged to the War Assets Administration (WAA) and returned to being a civil airport. 
Since becoming a civil airport, it has become a very popular destination for Army helicopter crews from the 101st Airborne Division at Fort Campbell, Kentucky. 
Sikeston Memorial Municipal Airport covers an area of 732 acres (296 ha) at an elevation of 315 feet (96 m) above mean sea level. It has one runway designated 2/20 with an asphalt surface measuring 5,502 by 100 feet (1,677 x 30 m). 
For the 12-month period ending November 30, 2009, the airport had 6,300 aircraft operations, an average of 17 per day: 79% general aviation, 14% military, and 6% air taxi. At that time there were 20 aircraft based at this airport: 75% single-engine, 10% multi-engine, and 15% ultralight. 
Baspa Valley is a river valley that is said to be named after the Baspa River. It lies in the Kinnaur District of Himachal Pradesh, India. Sangla is a major town in the Baspa Valley, and the valley is also known as the Sangla Valley or Tukpa Valley. The villages inside the valley is Chitkul, Rakchham, Batseri, Sangla, Kamru; the old capital of Bushahr State and Chansu.  
The Baspa river is a tributary to the Sutlej river, and one may approach the Baspa Valley by taking a diversion at Karcham, which is in the entrance of valley at NH-05.   
Baspa valley offers numerous trekking trails to neighbouring valleys like Jalandrigad valley via Lamkhaga pass, Har ki dun valley via Borasu pass, Sangla to Netwar via Rupin pass and Pabbar valley via Buran pass. Yamrang la pass & Gugairang La are the two passes situated on Indo-China border. 
Baspa River has a 300MW hydroelectric power project at Karcham. The barrage for the project is at Kuppa (Kamru). The project has been operational since May 2003. Jaypee Group, a private sector conglomerate, built the project and later sold it to Jindal Power.  Most of the annual run off the Baspa River is derived from glacier and snowmelt. 
LGA 4094 may refer to three physically identical but electrically incompatible CPU sockets for AMD processors: 
On 23 September 1911, the PLM Organizing Board in Los Angeles published, in Regeneration, a libertarian manifesto that called on Mexicans to fight against the State, the Clergy and Capital, under the slogan "Land and Freedom", an ideal that a month later was taken up by Emiliano Zapata. 
The military campaigns of the PLM, failed again and again due to the lack of resources, police infiltration and confusion caused by counterproductive tactics. Although for some, Maderism represented the most viable political alternative; for others, supporting Madero was simply the only way to escape alive from Mexican prisons. However, there were others who preferred jail or death to betraying their ideals. 
In 1915, after the death of Anselmo L. Figueroa and the lack of resources to continue Regeneration, a small group of the PLM moved to a farm located in Edendale, Los Angeles. There they lived and worked communally, raised chickens and grew vegetables that they sold for support, while carrying out the political work of the PLM, now renamed the Revolutionary Workers Union (UOR). 
The island castle, or insular castle, is a variation of the water castle. It is distinguished by its location on an artificial or natural island. It is a typical lowland castle. 
Because the island on which the castle was erected is separated from the shore by at least two bodies of water, artificial defences such as moats or shield walls were usually unnecessary if the castle was surrounded by flowing water. Such castles could therefore be very easily and cheaply built. Many island castles in lakes were, however, relatively easily captured in winter if there was an ice sheet thick enough to support attacking troops, because they were often rather poorly fortified.  
The best-known island castle in Germany is Pfalzgrafenstein Castle near Kaub. The only Gothic water castle in Europe is Trakai Castle in Lithuania. 
Creaghe was born in Limerick, Ireland in 1841, and in 1865 he graduated from the Royal College of Surgeons in Dublin, becoming a doctor. He opened up a practice in Mitchelstown in County Cork. In 1874, he emigrated to the capital of Argentina, Buenos Aires. 
It is not known how Creaghe came in contact with anarchist ideas, since the country's anarchist movement was small at the time. It's speculated he may have come into contact with the Italian Anarchist Errico Malatesta, who was in Argentina between 1885 and 1889. 
In 1891 Creaghe wrote "give me Anarchists willing to die NOW if necessary for Anarchy, and if you can find me 15 or 20 to join me I promise you we will make an oppression of the enemy"  
In the 2008 Superleague Formula season Flamengo finished overall in the 15th position. The car was drove in all rounds by Tuka Rocha. 
Flamengo will compete in the 2009 Superleague Formula season with the car being driven by ex-F1 and IndyCar racer Enrique Bernoldi. 
Brady Leman (born October 16, 1986) is a Canadian freestyle skier specializing in ski cross, and the reigning Olympic champion in that discipline following his victory in the ski cross event at the 2018 Winter Olympics in Pyeongchang, South Korea. 
A medal favourite at the 2010 Vancouver Olympics, Leman was unable to compete after a crash in a training run left him with a broken leg. 
Brady previously finished fourth in the 2014 Winter Olympics in Sochi, Russia after crashing in the final bank. 
After dropping a ski pole in his seeding run, Leman still managed to qualify in the 8th position. Leman was dominant through the heats on race day and won one of Canada's 11 gold medals at the Pyeongchang 2018 Winter Olympic Games. Canadian teammate Kevin Drury also raced in the Men's Big Final, but crashed after making contact with Sergey Ridzik of Russia and finished fourth. 
Garden City is an unincorporated community in Columbus Township, Bartholomew County, in the U.S. state of Indiana. 
This was the second appearance of the event. It was first held in 1900 and not again until 1984; after that, it was held every Summer Games until 2008 when it was removed from the programme. The women's version was held from 1996 through 2008. 
The reigning World Champion (1983) was Michael Markussen of Denmark. The other two men from the world championship podium, Hans-Joachim Pohl of East Germany and Ivan Romanov of the Soviet Union, Soviet Union, were not able to compete due to the Soviet-led boycott. 
23 nations made their debut in the event. France and Italy competed for the second time, the only nations to have competed in 1900 as well as 1984. 
Solapur - Hubballi Intercity Express is an intercity train of the Indian Railways connecting Solapur in Maharashtra and Hubballi of Karnataka. It is currently being operated with 11423/11424 train numbers on a daily basis. 
Both trains are hauled by a Pune Loco Shed based WDM-3A electric locomotive from Solapur to Hubali and vice versa. 
Nationality words link to articles with information on the nation's poetry or literature (for instance, Irish or France). 
Brian Gerald Snitker (born October 17, 1955) is an American professional baseball coach and former player who is the manager of the Atlanta Braves of Major League Baseball (MLB). Snitker has been in the Braves organization in different roles since playing in their minor league organization from 1977 to 1980. He became their manager in 2016. 
Snitker was born in Decatur, Illinois to Richard F. Snitker and Catherine (Collins) Snitker. He grew up in Macon, Illinois where he attended Macon High School, and played as a right fielder for the 1971 baseball team. The team's surprising run to the state championship tournament was documented in Chris Ballard's 2012 book One Shot at Forever: A Small Town, an Unlikely Coach, and a Magical Baseball Season. 
As a youth, Snitker also played American Legion Baseball, an experience that he said in a 2018 interview, "Gave me the platform to be seen because there are always scouts at American Legion games. It had a big part on my development as a player and helping me get a jump on a professional career." 
Snitker played two seasons of junior college ball for Lincoln College in 1975. He served as catcher for the Lynx baseball team where he was second team All-State. He finished his college career with two seasons at the University of New Orleans. 
Following his injury-shortened junior season at the University of New Orleans, Snitker was drafted in the 25th round of the MLB draft by the Chicago Cubs. He opted to return to UNO for his senior season, and then signed a free-agent contract with the Braves organization in 1977. Snitker bounced around the minors, playing mostly catcher and some first base in the minor leagues, registering a slash line of .254/.316/.390 with 23 home runs in 780 at bats. 
On October 14, 2013, Snitker was named the manager of the Braves Triple-A club, the Gwinnett Braves. 
Snitker and his wife, Veronica (Ronnie), have two children.  Snitker's mother Catherine died in March 2019. 
In the 2011 MLB Amateur Draft, Snitker's son Troy was drafted by the Braves in the 19th round and traded to the Pittsburgh Pirates in March 2013. After retiring as a player, Troy joined the Houston Astros organization as a coach. The Atlanta Braves faced the Houston Astros in the 2021 World Series, making the series a family affair for the Snitkers. Snitker and Troy, for the Braves and Astros, respectively, presented the lineup cards before Game Three of the World Series. 
The Detroit Hydrofest (branded as the Metro Detroit Chevy Dealers Detroit Hydrofest for sponsorship reasons) is a H1 Unlimited hydroplane boat race held in August on the Detroit River in Detroit, Michigan.  
The first race held on the Detroit River was the Gold Cup, in 1916. The community-owned Miss Detroit won the Gold Cup in 1915 on Manhasset Bay, outside of New York City, and earned the right to defend it the following year on home waters. Miss Detroit was a single-step hydroplane, equipped with a 250-horsepower Sterling engine. The designer was the distinguished Christopher Columbus Smith of Chriscraft fame. 
The race was run annually after being part of the Gold Cup, and later became known as the APBA Challenge Cup then APBA Gold Cup. 
After his release from AEK Athens, he signed a two-year contract with Peristeri. With Peristeri, he also won a league promotion with the club to move back to the Greek Basket League. After he had originally renewed his contract with Peristeri through 2019, the two sides mutually agreed to part ways on September 30, 2018. Two days later, he joined Iraklis Thessaloniki, of the Greek 2nd Division. 
While bishop, he was the principal consecrator of Oronzio Filomarini, Bishop of Gallipoli (1700) and Benito Noriega, Bishop of Acerra (1700); and the principal co-consecrator of Giulio Vincenzo Gentile, Archbishop of Genoa (1681). 
Domdaniel is a fictional cavernous hall at the bottom of the ocean where evil magicians, spirits, and gnomes meet.  
Domdaniel was first mentioned in the continued story of the Arabian Nights by Dom Chaves and Cazotte (1788-1793). It was described as being located in the sea near Tunis. In this hall, the ruler Zatanai held his court, which included the magician Maugraby and his students. 
Robert Southey later used Domdaniel in his multi-volume oriental poem Thalaba the Destroyer (1797). The hero of Southey's story, Thalaba, is the son of Hodeirah and the last surviving member of his family. It had been prophesied that the spirits of the Domdaniel were destined to be destroyed by a member of that family, so they sought to put an end to it. 
One of the magicians named by Southey as dwelling in Domdaniel was Abdaldar. He was selected by lot to hunt down Thalaba and slay him. But the youth Thalaba accomplishes the destruction of the magicians in the final volume of the poem despite their efforts to kill him and his surviving family. 
Nathaniel Hawthorne used Domdaniel in his romance The House of the Seven Gables: "Hepzibah put her hand into her pocket, and presented the urchin, her earliest and staunchest customer, with silver enough to people the Domdaniel cavern of his interior with as various a procession of quadrupeds as passed into the ark". 
In T.H White's book The Sword in the Stone Merlin, before his famous duel of magic with the witch Madam Mim, says: "Now we shall see how a double first at Dom-Daniel avails against the private tuition of my master Bleise". 
H. P. Lovecraft used Domdaniel in the short story He (1925), as follows: ...heard as with the mind's ear the blasphemous domdaniel of cacophony... 
British author Angie Sage used the name DomDaniel (styled this way) to name the main foe of her fantasy novel series Septimus Heap. 
Macrobathra niphadobola is a moth in the family Cosmopterigidae. It was described by Edward Meyrick in 1886. It is found in India and Sri Lanka. 
Model United Nations of the University of Chicago (MUNUC) is a high school Model UN conference hosted by the University of Chicago in downtown Chicago, Illinois. 
Due to the COVID-19 Pandemic, the 33rd annual session will include two virtual conferences from February 4-7, 2021 and from April 23-25, 2021. 
The Model United Nations of the University of Chicago is a collegiate Model UN organization of undergraduates at the University of Chicago, founded in 1988. For thirty-two years, the organization has hosted an annual conference (MUNUC) for high school students across the United States and the world. 
At MUNUC, high school students assume the roles of member states of the United Nations or government officials of various international and national bodies, crafting and debating policies to solve a variety of political, social, and economic global issues. The 33rd session will feature six categories of thirty-three total committees. 
In General Assemblies, delegates act as representatives of member states of the United Nations to draft resolutions solving a variety of broad and universal global issues. General Assemblies include all member states, and are often double-delegation, where two individuals represent one member state in committee. The General Assemblies scheduled to convene for the 33rd annual session are- 
The Economic and Social Councils include various specialized United Nations agencies. In contrast to General Assemblies, the Economic and Social Councils feature select member states and generally discuss more specific, in-depth aspects of international humanitarian issues. The Economic and Social Councils scheduled to convene for the 33rd annual session are- 
The Regional Bodies encompass both past and present international supranational or sub-national organizations separate from the United Nations, discussing issues prevalent in their respective geographical or geopolitical regions. The Regional Bodies scheduled to convene for the 33rd annual session are: 
The Specialized Agencies are often legally binding organizations, discussing or reporting in-depth international and domestic political topics. In some committees, delegates represent individual characters or representatives of private organizations rather than countries. The Specialized Agencies scheduled to convene for the 31st annual session are- 
The Warwick Police Department is the primary law enforcement agency in Warwick, Kent County, Rhode Island, United States. It is responsible for most law enforcement within the geographical boundary of City of Warwick, with the exception of: 
Warwick Police Department was one of the eight departments around the country being featured on the A&E TB show Live PD. It follows  police officers in the course of their nighttime patrols live, broadcasting select encounters with the public. The officers that have been featured from June 1st 2018 to May of 2019: 
The majority of reported crime in Warwick involves property crime, with an occasional pursuit, assault, as well as domestic violence. 
The average police patrol officer salary in Warwick is $57,343 as of October 31, 2018, but the range typically falls between $53,550 and $62,479. 
West discards a heart, dummy a club, but East now has a problem, as he must discard one of red suits: 
Mohd Hayati bin Othman (born 12 June 1957) is a Malaysian politician and is the member of the Kedah State Legislative Assembly for Tokai. He was a member of the Parliament of Malaysia for the Pendang constituency in Kedah from 2004 to 2013, as a member of the opposition Pan-Malaysian Islamic Party (PAS). 
In January 2010, Mohd Hayati was conferred the honorific title of Datuk by Sultan Abdul Halim of Kedah. 
Cercyon is a genus of water scavenger beetles in the family Hydrophilidae. There are at least 50 described species in Cercyon. 
A maceral is a component, organic in origin, of coal or oil shale. The term 'maceral' in reference to coal is analogous to the use of the term 'mineral' in reference to igneous or metamorphic rocks. Examples of macerals are inertinite, vitrinite, and liptinite. 
Inertinite is considered to be the equivalent of charcoal and degraded plant material. It is highly oxidised in nature and may be said to be burnt. A large portion of South Africa's coal reserves consist of inertinite. 
Liptinite macerals are considered to be produced from decayed leaf matter, spores, pollen and algal matter. Resins and plant waxes can also be part of liptinite macerals. Liptinite macerals tend to retain their original plant form, i.e., they resemble plant fossils. These are hydrogen rich and have the highest calorific values of all coal macerals. 
Macerals of liptinite are sporinite, cutinite, resinite, alginite (telalginite and lamalginite), liptodetrinite, fluorinite, and bituminite. 
Macerals are considered to be dehydrogenated plant fragments. Evidence for this includes remnant pollen spores, fossilised leaves, remnant cellular structure and similar. In rare cases, maceral and fossilised pollen can be found in terrestrial sedimentary rocks. 
Maceral maturity can be estimated by vitrinite reflectance. This gives information on the carbon, hydrogen and nitrogen composition of the coal, and determines the type of coal: lignite, brown coal, bituminous coal, anthracite or graphite. 
Macerals found in kerogen source rocks are often observed under the microscope to determine the kerogen maturity of the sedimentary formations. This is a vital component of oil and gas exploration. 
Macerals are observed under the petrographic microscope under reflected light. Coal fragments must be extremely highly polished down to less than half a micrometre before they can be observed under the microscope. 
This article about a specific mineral or mineraloid is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Rafter made his England debut in 1977 in the 26-6 victory over Scotland at Twickenham. He was a member of the Grand Slam-winning side of 1980, and competed in his last England international in 1981, against Argentina in Buenos Aires, to finish his international career with 17 caps. 
Hyde High School is a co-educational secondary school located in the Flowery Field area of Hyde in the English county of Greater Manchester. 
It is a community school administered by Tameside Metropolitan Borough Council, and offers GCSEs and BTECs as programmes of study for pupils. 
The school was previously awarded Technology College status, and was named Hyde Technology School for a time before the new school building opened in 2012 as Hyde Community College. In 2020 the school closed its sixth form provision and was renamed Hyde High School. 
This Greater Manchester school or sixth form college related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
According to the 2011 census of India, Khelma has 100 households. The effective literacy rate (i.e. the literacy rate of population excluding children aged 6 and below) is 62.42%. 
Brookwood is a town in Tuscaloosa County, Alabama, United States. It incorporated in September 1977. As of the 2010 census, the population of the town is 1,828.  It is part of the Tuscaloosa, Alabama Metropolitan Statistical Area. 
The age distribution was 28.9% under the age of 18, 8.7% from 18 to 24, 33.1% from 25 to 44, 21.8% from 45 to 64, and 7.5% 65 or older.  The median age was 34 years. For every 100 females, there were 99.1 males.  For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 96.5 males. 
The median household income was $40,104 and the median family income  was $46,071. Males had a median income of $38,929 versus $23,571 for females. The per capita income for the town was $18,670.  About 6.2% of families and 8.2% of the population were below the poverty line, including 10.1% of those under age 18 and 5.4% of those age 65 or over. 
The age distribution was 27.3% under the age of 18, 9.9% from 18 to 24, 33.1% from 25 to 44, 22.6% from 45 to 64, and 7.1% 65 or older. The median age was 32 years. For every 100 females, there were 93.2 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 93.1 males. 
The median household income was $55,357 and the median family income  was $66,944. Males had a median income of $44,837 versus $31,118 for females. The per capita income for the town was $19,352. About 7.2% of families and 10.6% of the population were below the poverty line, including 12.1% of those under age 18 and 5.2% of those age 65 or over. 
Matt Robert Lashoff (born September 29, 1986) is an American professional ice hockey defenseman who is currently playing with the SCL Tigers in the National League A (NLA). 
Lashoff was selected by the Boston Bruins in the 1st round (22nd overall) of the 2005 NHL Entry Draft. He is the older brother of Detroit Red Wings defenseman, Brian Lashoff. 
As a youth, Lashoff played in the 2000 Quebec International Pee-Wee Hockey Tournament with the New York Rangers minor ice hockey team. 
On August 27, 2010, Lashoff was traded by the Lightning to the Toronto Maple Leafs in exchange for Alex Berry and Stefano Giliati. 
On August 3, 2012, as a free agent, Lashoff signed a try-out contract with European team, ZSC Lions of the Swiss NLA. 
"A lot of people ask me how do you separate the two, but they've always been a part of my lifestyle. When we were kids we would play hockey before school and then after school till it got too dark and our mom told us to come in, then we would eat, play around on the guitar and write songs," says Lashoff. He is now planning a second album with a different sound, that will be "more groove based and not so poppy." 
"Carpe Museum" is the 22nd episode of the third season of the animated comedy series Bob's Burgers and the overall 44th episode, and is written by Jon Schroeder and directed by Tyree Dillihay. It aired on Fox in the United States on May 5, 2013. 
Pilot Viruet of The A.V. Club gave the episode a B+, reviewing it as a humorous continuation of the show's expansion into non-restaurant locations, but considered it inferior to the previous episode Boyz 4 Now with "many fewer laughs" comparatively. 
The episode received a 1.7 rating and was watched by a total of 3.96 million people. This made it the fourth most watched show on Animation Domination that night, losing to American Dad! with 5.00 million. 
El Salvador recognizes neither same-sex marriage, civil unions or any other legally recognized union for same-sex couples. A proposal to constitutionally ban same-sex marriage and same-sex adoption was rejected twice in 2006, and once again in April 2009 after the FMLN refused to grant the measure the four votes it needed to be ratified. 
In August 2016, a student of law in El Salvador filed a lawsuit before the Supreme Court asking for the nullification of Article 11 of the Family Code which defines marriage as a heterosexual union. Labeling the law as discriminatory and explaining the lack of gendered terms used in Article 34 of the Constitution's summary of marriage, the lawsuit sought to allow same-sex couples the right to wed. On 20 December 2016, the Salvadoran Supreme Court rejected the lawsuit on a legal technicality. 
A second lawsuit against the same-sex marriage ban was filed on 11 November 2016. On 17 January 2019, the Supreme Court dismissed the case on procedural grounds. 
On 9 August 2019, a same-sex marriage case was admitted to the Constitutional Court. Originally filed in 2016 by activist Gabriel Gasteazoro, the case alleges that the provisions outlawing same-sex marriages in the Family Code are unconstitutional. A ruling is expected in the first three months of 2020, but has been postponed since then.[citation needed] 
The Constitution of El Salvador does not explicitly ban the recognition of same-sex marriages. Article 32 reads: "The legal foundation of the family is marriage and rests on the juridical equality of the spouses."[a] 
In 2006, a constitutional amendment to ban the legal recognition of same-sex marriage was proposed. The measure was backed by the conservative Christian Democratic Party, then President Antonio Saca and several other parties; i.e. Democratic Change, the Front for Democratic Revolution and the National Conciliation Party. But was opposed, and thus defeated, by the FMLN. It failed to win enough votes to be formally ratified due to the FMLN legislators.   
On 30 April 2009, the Legislative Assembly of El Salvador approved a last-minute constitutional amendment that would have banned same-sex couples from marrying by defining marriage as being between only "a man and a woman" and barring them from adopting children. Civil rights groups vowed to fight the measure, which still needed to be voted on by other government branches before becoming law. The amendment eventually failed the same month. 
On 25 April 2012, a same-sex marriage and adoption ban was introduced to the Legislative Assembly. The measure eventually failed on 8 February 2014, after only receiving 19 votes in favor of its ratification. 
In January 2018, the Salvadoran Constitutional Court declared the proposed constitutional amendment banning same-sex marriage unlawful, because it was "fast-trecked through the Assembly and voted on urgently just days left in the session." 
On 8 January 2018, the Inter-American Court of Human Rights (IACHR) ruled that the American Convention on Human Rights mandates and requires the recognition of same-sex marriage. The ruling was fully binding on Costa Rica and set binding precedent in other Latin American and Caribbean countries including El Salvador. 
In the wake of this ruling, LGBT advocacy groups have urged the Government of El Salvador to abide by the ruling, and legalise same-sex marriage. 
According to a 2008 poll, 14% of Salvadorans supported same-sex marriage, while 80% were opposed and 6% were undecided. 
A 2010 poll revealed that El Salvador had some of the lowest support for legalizing same-sex marriage in Latin America at 10%. 
According to a Pew Research Center survey, conducted between November 9 and December 17, 2013, 11% of Salvadorans supported same-sex marriage, 81% were opposed. 
The 1844 United States presidential election in Indiana took place between November 1 and December 4, 1844, as part of the 1844 United States presidential election. Voters chose 12 representatives, or electors to the Electoral College, who voted for President and Vice President. 
Indiana voted for the Democratic candidate, James K. Polk, over Whig candidate Henry Clay. Polk won Indiana by a narrow margin of 1.65%. 
Julia Konrad Viezzer (born 6 August 1990) is a Brazilian actress, singer and women's rights activist. She is known for her leading role as Gabriela, in Carlos Saldanha's fantasy Netflix series Invisible City, and her role as Pepita in International Emmy Award nominated series One Against All. 
In 2020 Julia returns as Pepita for the fourth and final season of One Against All, and releases her first single, "Vuelve", as part of the soundtrack of the series. In August, she releases her second single, "Colores", a collaboration with Pernambuco musician Barro. 
In 2021, she stars in the first season of Netflix's Brazilian series, Invisible City, as anthropologist Gabriela Alves, and is cast as Paloma, an Interpol agent working undercover in Amazon Prime Video Brazilian original series Dom. 
Robert W. "Rob" Kauffman is a Republican member of the Pennsylvania House of Representatives for the 89th District and was elected in 2004.  He currently sits on the House Consumer Affairs, Gaming Oversight, and Tourism and Recreational Development Committees. 
Rob and his wife, Niki, live in Scotland, Pennsylvania (Unincorporated) with their children Abby, Will, Andrew and Caleb. 
This article about a member of the Pennsylvania House of Representatives is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Tiny Lake is an alpine lake in Custer County, Idaho, United States, located in the White Cloud Mountains in the Sawtooth National Recreation Area.  The lake is accessed from Sawtooth National Forest trail 683. 
Tiny Lake is northwest of Merriam Peak and located in the lower section of the Boulder Chain Lakes Basin. 
This Geographical stub article in Custer County, Idaho is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Saulsbury was born in Mispillion Hundred, Kent County, Delaware, son of William & Margaret Ann Smith Saulsbury. He was the middle brother of Governor Gove Saulsbury and U.S. Senator Willard Saulsbury Sr.  Saulsbury was educated at Dickinson College, studied law, was admitted to the Delaware Bar in 1857, and began his practice in Dover, Delaware, where he lived. 
Elections are held the first week of November. Members of the Delaware General Assembly take office the first week of January. The State House has a term of two years. The General Assembly chose the U.S. Senators, who took office March 4 for a six-year term. 
The once tabloid-sized weekly newspaper is now a monthly magazine that publishes online daily and is owned by American Lawyer Media, ALM. 
This article relating to law in the United States or its constituent jurisdictions is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to fencing in the United Kingdom is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article incorporates material from axiom of countable choice on PlanetMath, which is licensed under the Creative Commons Attribution/Share-Alike License. 
In 2005 she starred alongside Louis Garrel in Philippe Garrel's Regular Lovers, it was her first main role at the cinema. After the film she starred the short film Comment on freine dans une descente? in 2006. 
Also in 2012 she starred in Les Revenants, a TV series that is considered an international success by critics and audiences. 
Canis Heights is a mainly snow-covered ridge located between the two upper tributaries of Millett Glacier on the western edge of the Dyer Plateau of Palmer Land. The feature was named by the UK Antarctic Place-Names Committee after the constellations of Canis Major and Canis Minor. 
The company then brought in former IBM and other computer industry executives in an attempt to remake the company as a leading producer of personal computers. By 1989, nearly all (90 percent) of its personal computer sales were in Europe, and its stock price had fallen from a 1983 peak of $34.25 to $0.50. 
This biographical article related to association football in England, about a midfielder born in the 1920s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The 1st Dakota Cavalry was a Union battalion of two companies raised in the Dakota Territory during the American Civil War. They were deployed along the frontier, primarily to protect the settlers during the Sioux Uprising of 1862. 
During the August 1862 Sioux uprising, Company A escorted settlers as they moved to protective stockades. Governor William Jayne also called for "every able-bodied man to arms in defense of the homes of Dakota", with 399 men responding. 
At this time Captain Alpheus G. Fuller, an early settler in the territory, began raising a cavalry militia in Bon Homme and Charles Mix counties, the "Militia Brigade of Dakota". After failing to form a company for U.S. service, the men were merged with volunteers organizing at Elk Point. On March 31, 1863, these men were mustered in to form Company B at Sioux City, Iowa, with Captain William Tripp commanding. This company was known by settlers as the "Dakota Rangers". 
Both companies were engaged in the protection of the Dakota frontier towns while Generals Henry H. Sibley and Alfred Sully, with regiments of infantry and cavalry from Minnesota, Iowa and Nebraska, sought out the hostile Indians throughout the territory. The two companies were split into detachments for use in the several settlements. 
As the Civil War and Indian conflicts were drawing to a close, Companies A and B were mustered out on May 9, 1865, and November 15, 1865 respectively. The battalion had a total of 194 soldiers. 
In June 1864, the 1st Dakota Cavalry Battalion served as guard for Brig. Gen. Alfred Sully as he traveled to Fort Sully, Dakota Territory to rendezvous with various companies there. Upon the completion of the brigade, the expedition left Fort Sully on June 24, 1864. On July 28, 1864, Sully's force of 2,200 soldiers encountered a camp of over 5,000 Sioux warriors. During the subsequent Battle of Killdeer Mountain, United States forces lost 5 men killed and 10 men wounded.  
This article about a property in South Dakota on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
William Weer (a.k.a. William A. Weer and William Weir) was a lawyer, attorney general for Kansas and an officer in the Union Army during the American Civil War.  He is notable for his service in the Trans-Mississippi Theater early in the war and later for being dismissed from the army following a court-martial. 
During the time Weer worked as a lawyer he served as legal council for the Wyandott Reservation in Kansas.  In 1857 Weer became the second person to hold to position of attorney general in the territory of Kansas.  He held that post from 1857-1858.  He was also active in the Kansas State Militia and became a brigadier general of militia in 1861. 
While serving in Lane's Kansas Brigade, Weer was present during the Sacking of Osceola, and was one of the few Jayhawker officers present to favor sparing the town over burning it. His desire was overruled by Lane. 
Much of the bay's foreshore on the western and eastern sides are limestone cliffs. The head of the bay is the location of the Claremont foreshore. Other important features to the south are the sand spit at Point Walter and Point Resolution at the eastern end. 
Parts of Freshwater Bay are designated ski areas. Due to Point Walter's spit and the high surrounding limestone cliffs, the bay has relatively calm waters and is protected from winds, making the area suited for jet skiing, rowing, sailing and other water recreations. 
Royal Freshwater Bay Yacht Club  and Claremont Yacht Club are situated in the bay, both of which provide recreational boat mooring space and other club facilities as well as conducting races. 
Christ Church Grammar School and Methodist Ladies' College are also situated atop the limestone cliffs along the northern section of the bay, often using it for rowing training and also kayaking for physical education classes. 
Extensive and long standing environmental impacts of suburban development around the bay have been reviewed following stricter environmental regulation. 
Origo has holdings in numerous subsidiaries: Applicon in Sweden, Denmark, UK and Iceland, ParX Business Consulting ehf., Dansupport in Denmark, Klak ehf., SimDex ehf. and Linkur ehf. It currently has approximately 750 employees.[citation needed] 
This biographical article related to a Polish association football forward is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The company was founded in 1996 by Phillip Merrick and Caren Merrick to use Web standards such as HTTP and (later) XML to allow software applications to communicate with one another in real time. This type of technology would later be referred to as "web services". The company's first product, called the "Web Automation Server" was released in August 1996; this was later superseded by the "WebMethods Integration Server", which was the company's first product to see significant commercial use. 
The company was an early developer and promoter of standards for web service technologies, having worked on XML-RPC, a precursor to SOAP, and developed WIDL (Web Interface Definition Language), a precursor to the WSDL standard. 
Software AG acquired webMethods in 2007 for $546 million and announced that the brand webMethods will be retained, effectively making webMethods its flagship product line. WebMethods version 8.0 was released in 2009, supplemented with other Software AG products such as Centrasite, Tamino and EntireX. In 2010, the webMethods ("BPE") division of Software AG recorded $668 million (499M Euros) in revenues and was a major contributor to overall company net income of $292 million (218M Euros). 
Alexx Calise (born June 28, 1985), is an American singer, songwriter, and musician. She is best known for her solo work and her other musical project (with songwriting partner Dennis Morehouse), Batfarm. 
Alexx Calise was born on June 28, 1985 in Staten Island, New York, but grew up in Fort Lauderdale, Florida. An avid writer, she began playing the guitar at age 11 to emulate her father, who is also a musician. Calise began pursuing her professional music career at the age of 14. 
Calise is probably best known for her song, "Cry", which enjoyed heavy rotation on Lifetime's Dance Moms and has gone on to sell hundreds of thousands of units independently. "Cry" peaked at No. 64 on the iTunes rock charts in August 2011, and its official music video also features Dance Moms star, Maddie Ziegler, who danced to the song in several episodes of the show. 
Calise is also an actress, and has appeared in several national TV commercials and shows including the Discovery Channel documentary, The Science of Sex Appeal, Disney's Science of Imagineering DVD series, and most recently, a series of national Guitar Center commercials. 
Calise and her band recently performed her song "Cry" on season 7 of Dance Moms with Nia Sioux and Kendall Vertes. Calise also released her single, "Breathe," which featured Nia Sioux on vocals on the same day as the episode's airing. 
Calise is currently working on new music for her solo project and her band Batfarm, as well as hosting for Guitar World magazine and writing for a variety of music publications. 
Calise is involved with the Wear Your Music Foundation, an organization that produces jewelry from high-profile artists' guitar strings. All sales from Calise's bracelets are donated to the Brain Trauma Foundation. 
In 1712, he set up an observatory at the Luxembourg Palace and after three years moved to the Hotel de Taranne. From 1719 to 1722 he was employed at the Royal observatory, before returning to his observatory at the Luxembourg Palace. In 1724 he met Edmond Halley in London and, among other things, discussed transits of Venus. 
Delisle is mostly known for the Delisle scale, a temperature scale he invented in 1732. The crater Delisle on the Moon, and the asteroid 12742 Delisle are named after him. 
Skip Drinkwater is an American record producer. He is best known for working with jazz artists, Norman Connors, Alphonse Mouzon and Eddie Henderson, as well as discovering the Catalyst and working with the all black heavy metal band Sound Barrier. 
The Revised Version of the Bible at the first use of the name Pi-HaHiroth has a link to a footnote that says "Or, where the desert tracks begin". 
William Smith, in his Dictionary of Greek and Roman Geography, tentatively identifies Pi-HaHiroth with Arsinoe, Egypt at the northern end of the Gulf of Suez. Strong's Concordance simply locates Pi-HaHiroth as 'a place on the eastern border of Egypt'. 
Stoke Mandeville railway station serves the village of Stoke Mandeville, south of Aylesbury in Buckinghamshire, England. The station is on the London - Aylesbury line and is served by Chiltern Railways trains. It is between Wendover and Aylesbury stations. 
The station was opened on 1 September 1892, by the Metropolitan Railway (Met), when its main line was extended from Chalfont Road to Aylesbury Town. The Great Central Railway served the station from 1899, connecting the station to Leicester, Nottingham, and Sheffield. 
In 1966 as a result of the Reshaping of British Railways report, the line north of Aylesbury was closed and the station is now only served by local commuter services. Services were run by British Rail until privatisation in 1996, when Chiltern Railways took over the franchise. 
During the modernisation of the Met in the 1950s, the down (Aylesbury) platform buildings were demolished. In 1989-90 BR's Network SouthEast refurbished the station and the "up" (London) platform canopy was shortened slightly. 
At peak times there are up to 4 trains per hour to London in the morning, and from London (to Aylesbury) in the evening. Some are express services, which omit the stops shared with the Metropolitan line nearer to London. 
Journeys to Marylebone take about 55 minutes or 45 minutes for express trains, of which there is one per day. Journeys to Aylesbury take about 5 minutes. 
For Stoke Mandeville Hospital, rail passengers should alight at Aylesbury and take the Red Route 9 or No 300 (Aylesbury to High Wycombe) bus from Aylesbury Bus Station which is located 300yds from the railway station at Aylesbury. 
Buses run by Arriva Shires & Essex link Stoke Mandeville station with Aylesbury and Leighton Buzzard. 
Helen Mary Haines (born 21 September 1961) is an Australian politician who has served as the independent MP for the Victorian seat of Indi since the 2019 federal election. 
In the federal election, Haines won Indi, winning 32.4% of the primary vote and 51.4% of the two-party preferred vote. She defeated Liberal Steve Martin on the sixth count on Labor preferences. She became the first independent in Australian history to succeed another independent in a federal seat. 
This biographical article relating to Belgian football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Wild trout naturally reproduce in the watershed of Smith Cabin Run from its headwaters downstream to its mouth. The stream is classified as a Coldwater Fishery. 
Smith Cabin Run was entered into the Geographic Names Information System on August 2, 1979. Its identifier in the Geographic Names Information System is 1187856. 
Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission biologists visited Smith Cabin Run in August 2001 and found that there were no fish habitats there. However, in May 2014, the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission held a meeting to determine whether to add Smith Cabin Run, among other streams, to their list of wild trout streams. 
There are over 9,000 Grade I listed buildings in England.  This page is a list of these buildings in the county of Herefordshire. 
Richardson lives and writes in Broad Bay, a beach settlement on the Otago Peninsula. She wrote part of her second novel A Year to Learn A Woman while living on the Kapiti Coast after being awarded the $6000 Foxton Fellowship, which included a month's residency in a cottage at Foxton Beach. 
Dinah opens the story by recounting for readers the union of her mother Leah and father Jacob, as well as the expansion of the family to include Leah's sister Rachel, and the handmaids Zilpah and Bilhah. Leah is depicted as capable but testy, Rachel as something of a belle, but kind and creative, Zilpah as eccentric and spiritual, and Bilhah as the gentle and quiet one of the quartet. 
Dinah remembers sitting in the red tent with her mother and aunts, gossiping about local events and taking care of domestic duties between visits to Jacob, the family's patriarch. A number of other characters not seen in the biblical account appear here, including Laban's second wife Ruti and her feckless sons. 
Diamant acknowledges that there is no evidence that ancient Israel used a menstrual tent for retreat, although she describes it as a common feature in other pre-modern cultures, as well as some modern cultures. 
Cultural attitudes towards menstruation, including taboos, are widespread throughout history and around the world. These may include the seclusion of girls at puberty and of women after childbirth. Impurity after childbirth was a widespread belief, allied with the need for ritual purification. 
Lifetime adapted the novel into a two-part miniseries, which premiered December 7 and 8, 2014. Dinah is portrayed by Rebecca Ferguson. Leah is portrayed by Minnie Driver, and Rachel by Morena Baccarin. 
The success of the single can partly be attributed to the accompanying video, which was directed by John Witteron, depicting Kelly as a long-suffering cab driver dealing with a night shift full of eccentric passengers. 
At the 1986 Countdown Australian Music Awards the song was nominated for Best Male Performance in a Video and Best Single, losing out to John Farnham's "You're the Voice" in both categories. 
In January 2018, as part of Triple M's "Ozzest 100", the 'most Australian' songs of all time, "Before Too Long" was ranked number 79. 
A trimmed version of Gossip, featuring 15 tracks on a single LP, was released in the United States by A&M Records in July 1987. Allmusic's Mike DeGagne noted that "[it] bursts at the seams with blustery, distinguished tunes captivating both the somberness and the intrigue thrown forward from this fine Australian storyteller". 
The album was co-produced by Kelly with Alan Thorne (Hoodoo Gurus, The Stems) who, according to music journalist Robert Forster (former The Go-Betweens singer-songwriter), helped the band create "a sound that will not only influence future roots-rock bands but, through its directness, sparkle and dedication to the song, will also come to be seen as particularly Australian. Ultimately, it means the records these people made together are timeless". 
Sayed Nabi Siddiqui is an Afghan police officer who alleges that in August 2003 he was stripped naked by U.S.-led coalition forces, and beaten and photographed at the U.S. base in Gardez. Siddiqui also alleged he was subjected to sexual abuse, taunting and sleep deprivation. On May 12, 2004, the U.S. military announced it had opened an investigation into the allegations. 
Siddiqui was detained on July 15, 2003, after he reported police corruption and someone then accused him of being a member of the Taliban. He alleges he was held for about 40 days at three different U.S. bases: Gardez, Kandahar and Bagram. 
Siddiqui is one of 44 complaints submitted to the United Nations by Ahmed Zia Langari, a member of the Afghan Independent Human Rights Commission. 
Siddiqui told the New York Times that in Kandahar, detainees were packed into wire cages and forced to use a bucket as a toilet in front of other detainees. He also said soldiers threw stones and bottles at detainees. 
Kirk Dodge (born June 4, 1962) is a former American football middle linebacker. He played for the Detroit Lions in 1984, the Houston Oilers in 1986 and for the Denver Broncos in 1987. 
Glyphipterix phosphora is a species of sedge moth in the genus Glyphipterix. It was described by Edward Meyrick in 1907. It is found in South Australia. 
This article on a moth of the family Glyphipterigidae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
WURV (103.7 MHz "103.7 Your Variety") is a commercial FM radio station licensed to Richmond, Virginia.  The station is owned by SummitMedia, through licensee SM-WURV, LLC.  WURV broadcasts a hot adult contemporary music format to the Richmond/Petersburg/Central Virginia radio market. 
WURV's studios and offices are on Moorefield Park Drive in Richmond.  The transmitter is off Old Bon Air Road, also in Richmond.  WURV broadcasts in the HD Radio (hybrid) format.  Its HD-2 subchannel runs an all sports format, which is simulcast on translator station 106.1 W291CL as "Sports 106.1."  WURV's HD-3 subchannel simulcasts Virginia Tech's public radio station 89.1 WVTF from Roanoke, Virginia.  It feeds translator station 92.5 W223AZ, which is owned by Virginia Tech. 
On December 23, 1961, the station first signed on the air as WFMV. It was owned by Professional Broadcasting, Inc. and aired a classical music format, operating as the first stereo radio station in Richmond. 
WFMV was one of several Richmond FM stations receiving permission from the Federal Communications Commission for unusually high power.  Today, Richmond is in Zone 1, limited to a maximum of 50,000 watts effective radiated power (ERP). Before current class power limits were drafted in 1964, however,, WFMV was permitted to operate at 73,800 watts, WRNL-FM (now WRXL) broadcast at 120,000 watts, and, to this day, 94.5 WRVQ (then WRVA-FM) is grandfathered at 200,000 watts. 
In 1964, WFMV was sold to the Fidelity Bankers Life Insurance Company. Fidelity moved WFMV's studios to its suburban headquarters at Willow Lawn in Henrico County. For a time, it was co-managed with WGOE, a 1,000-watt AM daytime station owned by brothers Major and J. Sargeant Reynolds. 
Benjamin F. Thomas acquired WFMV in 1967 for $60,000; Thomas owned part of WKSL, an FM station in Greencastle, Pennsylvania. Thomas relocated the WFMV studios into two used office trailers at the rural transmitter site. The remote location was on a dirt road through the woods; during rain and snow, it was often accessible only by foot. 
Thomas had financial problems, and employees, mostly college students, were bolstered by loyal listeners and continued to man the station even when payrolls were late and inclement weather blocked access to the site. Engineering staff from nearby stations, notably the well-funded WRVA ("The 50,000 watt Voice of Virginia"), loaned parts and repair talent to help maintain the aging transmitting equipment. Although privately owned, WFMV had become something of a community effort. 
The easy format was popular through the 1970s, but by 1980, beautiful music had become less appealing to youthful and middle-aged listeners which advertisers usually seek.  WEZS responded by adding more vocals to its largely instrumental playlist. Around 1983, the station made the complete transition to soft adult contemporary music, eliminating nearly all instrumental titles, and rebranded as "EZ104". 
In the 1990s, WMXB's transmitter was relocated to a new tower, more than doubling its height above average terrain (HAAT) to 750 feet.  That was coupled with a decrease in effective radiated power to 18,500 watts.  Despite the lower wattage, the taller tower gave WMXB a similar coverage area. 
On March 22, 2004, the station dumped the Hot AC format and "B-103" moniker for a soft AC format that leaned toward 1980s, 1990s, and current titles, and rebranded as "Mix 103.7". 
On April 16, 2007, WMXB relaunched as a Hot AC station with a more current and upbeat focus, while retaining the "Mix" branding. 
On April 22, 2010, at 3 p.m., WMXB flipped to adult album alternative, branded as "103.7 The River."  Along with the flip, the station adopted the new call sign WURV, with "RV" standing for "River", an allusion to the James River that flows through Richmond. The first song on "The River" was "Learn to Fly" by the Foo Fighters. At the same time, sister station WDYL (now WJSR) began redirecting listeners to WURV in preparation of a format flip to Rhythmic Top 40 a week after WURV's debut. 
On July 20, 2012, Cox Radio announced the sale of WURV and 22 other stations to Summit Media LLC for $66.25 million. The sale was consummated on May 3, 2013. 
On September 24, 2013, WURV returned to Hot AC, branded as 103.7 Play. On March 4, 2021, WURV rebranded as 103.7 Your Variety, with no change in format. 
The 1998 Speedway Grand Prix of Denmark was the third race of the 1998 Speedway Grand Prix season. It took place on 17 July in the Speedway Center in Vojens, Denmark It was the fourth Danish SGP and was won by Danish rider Hans Nielsen. It was the fifth win of his career. 
SR 18 thus takes an unusual path in the shape of a question mark.  On most of the signs of the highway, cardinal descriptions are not posted below the route markers, since it does not clearly go either west/east or north/south.  Also notable is that State Route 18 and 138 cover each other in opposing termini, as SR 138 ends at its southmost point in Crestline with SR 18, while SR 18's northwest most endpoint is in Llano with SR 138. 
SR 18 from SR 138 at Crestline to SR 38 at the westernmost point of Big Bear Lake, and the SR 18/38 overlap in the City of Big Bear Lake, are designated as part of the Rim of the World Scenic Byway, a National Forest Scenic Byway. 
Before 1964, SR 18 continued south of San Bernardino to Lakewood, via La Cadena Drive, Magnolia Avenue, 6th Street, Pomona-Rincon Road, Santa Ana Canyon Road, Lincoln Avenue, Carson Street and Lakewood Boulevard.  When freeways were constructed, SR 18 was routed on what is now Interstate 215 and State Route 91 as well as Lakewood Boulevard. SR 18 then ran concurrently with State Route 19 to the western terminus of U.S. Route 6 in Long Beach. 
Endemic to Brazil, its natural habitats are dry savanna, moist savanna, swamps, freshwater marshes, and intermittent freshwater marshes. It also inhabits pastureland, rural gardens, ponds, and canals and ditches. 
Abdumuqit Vohidov is a citizen of Tajikistan who was held in extrajudicial detention, for five years, in the United States' Guantanamo Bay detention camps, in Cuba. His Guantanamo Internment Serial Number was 90. Vohidov was returned to his native Tajikistan on 28 February 2007. 
Vohidov was one of nine former Taliban prisoners the Associated Press pointed out had gone from Taliban custody to American custody. 
The Taliban had accused Vohidov of spying for Russia, and imprisoned him for nearly three years. At Kandahar Airfield, he complained to Cpt. Danner that he had been housed in a more humane prison by the Taliban, where he had been given a radio, fresh fruit and proper toilet facilities. 
Vohidov and Sharopov received sentences of 17 years on 18 August 2007. The two men were convicted of serving as mercenaries.[citation needed] 
Carol Rosenberg, writing in the Miami Herald on 7 July  2009, reported that Umar Abdulayev, the sole remaining Tajikistani, reported that a delegation of Tajikistani security officials threatened to retaliate against him Sharipov and Vohidov, unless they agreed to pretend to be militant jihadists, and report on real militant jihadists, following their repatriations. 
On 15 June 2008, the McClatchy News Service published articles based on interviews with 66 former Guantanamo captives. McClatchy reporters interviewed Airat Vakhitov by telephone. Vohidov told his interviewers he was suffering ongoing mental problems, and that he was worried that if interviewers visited him in person he would be punished by Russian security officials.[citation needed] 
Vohidov had been an imam in Tatarstan, who was imprisoned following a general round-up when Russian officials were cracking down on Chechens.  He was temporarily freed, and fled Russia when he learned that security officials were looking for him. He said he was kidnapped by the forces of the Islamic Movement of Uzbekistan, and eventually transported to Afghanistan, against his will.[citation needed] 
Bridget McCormack, a candidate for a seat on the Michigan Supreme Court, helped defend Vohitov, and in 2012, the Judicial Crisis Network broadcast an advertisement which criticized her for "freeing a terrorist." Andrew Rosenthal, of The New York Times criticized the Judicial Crisis Network ad, which contained footage of Teri Johnson, the mother of Joseph Johnson, a GI who was killed in Afghanistan, who says:
 Rosenthal pointed out that Vohitov was freed through the non-judicial review, through the Office for the Administrative Review of Detained Enemy Combatants in 2007. 
On 29 June 2016, Secretary of State John Kerry, citing Executive Order 13224, classed Vohidov as a Specially Designated Global Terrorist. 
In 1965 she graduated from Tartu State University with a degree in Finno-Ugric languages. Her main fields of research have been Estonian language related terminology, dictionaries, lexicology, language planning and the development of jargon in many disciplines. 
from 1965 until 2009, she worked at the Estonian Language Institute. From 1977 until 1984, she taught a course in terminology at Tartu State University and in 1984 and 1986 at the Tallinn Pedagogical Institute in language planning. 
In 1993, she lectured at the University of Helsinki. She has worked to clarify the terminology of patenting, construction, pedagogy and linguistics, as well as professional titles. She participated in the compilation of Estonian orthography dictionaries, including the editor and co-compiler of the 1999 and 2006 dictionaries and one of the compilers of the 1976 and 2013 dictionaries. She has also edited, among other things, volumes three and four of the Russian-Estonian Dictionary. 
This article about a sculpture in the United Kingdom is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The 2007 Tsuen Wan District Council election was held on 18 November 2007 to elect all 17 elected members to the 24-member District Council. 
He was born at Woodland Mount, a large country house near Huddersfield, on 29 April 1855 the son of Joseph Woodhead, a newspaper owner (and later politician), and his wife Catherine Woodhead. 
He was educated at Huddersfield College. He then studied Medicine at Edinburgh University, graduating MB ChB in 1878. 
From 1885 to 1890 he worked as a lab assistant in Edinburgh University, living then at 6 Marchhall Crescent. During his time in Edinburgh, in 1886, he was elected a Fellow of the Royal Society of Edinburgh. His proposers were Sir William Turner, Alexander Crum Brown, Robert Gray and Sir John Murray. 
In 1890, aged only 35, he became Director of the Conjoint Laboratories of the Royal Colleges of Physicians and of Surgeons in London. 
In 1899 he was made Professor of Pathology in Cambridge University. He was the first Editor of the Journal of Pathology. 
In the First World War he was the Inspector of Government Laboratories serving all military hospitals. He was attached to the RAMC at the rank of Lt Colonel. Largely as a result of this service he was knighted (KBE) by King George V in 1919. 
He died at Aisthorpe Hall in Lincolnshire on 29 December 1921 and is buried in Cambridge City Cemetery. 
This article about an English writer, poet or playwright is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The 1916 Kentucky Derby was the 42nd running of the Kentucky Derby. The race took place on May 13, 1916. Horses St. Isidore, Bulse, and Huffaker  scratched before the race. 
Arusha National Park covers Mount Meru, a prominent volcano with an elevation of 4566 m, in the Arusha Region of north eastern Tanzania. The park is small but varied with spectacular landscapes in three distinct areas. In the west, the Meru Crater funnels the Jekukumia River; the peak of Mount Meru lies on its rim. Ngurdoto Crater in the south-east is grassland. The shallow alkaline Momella Lakes in the north-east have varying algal colours and are known for their wading birds. 
Springfield Central is a suburb in the City of Ipswich, Queensland, Australia. In the 2016 census, Springfield Central had a population of 114 people. It is the designated business district of Greater Springfield. 
The Centenary Highway forms the northern boundary of the suburb. Despite its name, the Springfield Central railway station is immediately to the north of the highway and hence in the neighbouring suburb of Brookwater.  The Robelle Domain is a 487 hectares (1,200 acres) parkland in the northern half of Springfield Central incorporating artificial lakes and waterways, landscaped gardens and cycle and pedestrian paths. 
Springfield Central State School and Springfield Central State High School both opened on 1 January 2011. 
The suburb is the commercial, retail, educational, health and infrastructure hub of the Greater Springfield Development.  It contains the Orion Springfield Central shopping centre which is home to almost 200 retailers, the Springfield Central railway station, office buildings, a large city parkland called Robelle Domain and water playground called Orion Lagoon, and the Mater Private Hospital Springfield. 
Springfield Central is also home to various education and training institutions including a campus of the University of Southern Queensland and TAFE Queensland, the Union Institute of Language, Peter McMahon's Swim Factory, several private secondary institutions including St Peters Lutheran College Springfield and numerous public schools including Springfield Central State School and Springfield Central State High School, both of which were established in 2011. 
Springfield Central also hosts numerous commercial retailers including Bunnings, BCF and Event Cinemas with a Timezone arcade set to open in 2020. 
The Ipswich City Council previously operated a fortnightly mobile library service which visited Orion Springfield Central (opposite the lagoon). With the development of the Springfield Central Library, this has since been removed. 
Aveo Springfield opened its first two buildings in 2018 providing 86 living spaces for elderly residents. At completion, the community is expected to host more than 2500 living spaces. In 2019, the $56 million Springfield Central Sports Complex was opened to the public. The sporting precinct features sixteen netball courts, eight tennis courts, four multi-purpose sporting fields, canteen amenities and playground. 
In October 2019, the previous Springfield Central Tavern site was replaced by the Springfield Brewery, Bar & Kitchen, owned by Salisbury-based craft beer brewery Ballistic Beer Co.The craft micro-brewery also produces a European style pilsner, the Springfield Pilsner, named after their location. 
Campbell began practicing as an attorney in Aberdeen, South Dakota in 1912, serving as city attorney from 1921 to 1923, and in the South Dakota State Senate for Brown County, South Dakota in 1923. In March 1925, Governor Carl Gunderson appointed Campbell to a seat on the state supreme court vacated by the retirement of ailing justice Frank Anderson; Campbell assumed office on April 1, 1925. 
This biography of a state judge in the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Gavin Andrew Stuart Newlands (born 2 February 1980) is a Scottish National Party politician. He has been the Member of Parliament (MP) for Paisley and Renfrewshire North since the 2015 general election. He has served as the SNP Shadow Secretary of State for Transport since 2020. 
Newlands is the first ever MP for the constituency to be elected from the SNP. At the 2017 general election, he was re-elected, with a reduced majority of 9,076 votes to 2,613. Subsequently, at the 2019 election Newlands achieved his biggest majority in the seat, of 11,902 or 24.0% of the vote. 
Newlands was born in the old Paisley Maternity Hospital in 1980 and raised in the town of Renfrew, where he currently resides with wife, Lynn and their two children. He was educated at Renfrew's St James' Primary and Trinity High School. While enrolled at James Watt College, Newlands was offered a promotion in his part-time job at McDonalds, and dropped out of college. 
Newlands has been a member of the SNP for 25 years. He joined the youth wing of the party in 1992 at the age of twelve.[citation needed] He became a local community council councillor for Renfrew in 2011 and has supported local causes, including a West of Scotland foodbank. Newlands was a member of Paisley Rugby Club for 16 years, serving as club captain for three years. 
Newlands was selected to stand for election for the Scottish National Party (SNP) in January 2015 after securing the support of local party members following an internal selection process. He was elected to the House of Commons at the 2015 Westminster election when he overturned the incumbent Labour MP's 15,280 majority and emerged with a majority of 9,076 votes for himself - representing a 26.47% swing to Newlands and the SNP. 
He is currently the Westminster SNP Spokesperson on Sport, Wales, and Northern Ireland, as well as being Chair of the White Ribbon All-Party Parliamentary Group (APPG) on Male Violence Against Women and is Chair of the APPG on Scottish Sport. He serves on the Justice Select Committee. 
Pleasantville High School is a comprehensive community public high school that serves students in ninth through twelfth grade from the City of Pleasantville, in Atlantic County, New Jersey, United States, operating as the lone secondary school of the Pleasantville Public Schools, an Abbott District. 
Students from Absecon attend the district's high school for grades 9-12 as part of a sending/receiving relationship with the Absecon Public School District. 
In 2004, the Try-Math-A-Lon Team won the National Championship at the National Society of Black Engineers Conference (NSBE) in Dallas, Texas. In 2010 and 2011, the Try-Math-A-Lon teams won the regional championships and progressed to the Nationals in Boston and Orlando respectively where they placed second both years. 
The school has had a longstanding sports rivalry with Atlantic City High School. The best known is between the basketball teams of both schools, an event that is referred to as "Battle By The Bay" which started in 1994. Atlantic City High won 13 games and Pleasantville has won 6. The cheerleading battle between both schools is considered to be one of the highlights of the event. 
The boys' basketball team won the Group II title in 1974 (defeating runner-up Hillside High School in the tournament final), 1995 (vs. Boonton High School) and 1996 (vs. Dwight Morrow High School). 
The girls' basketball team won the Group II state championships in 1978 (against Lyndhurst High School in the finals) and 1981 (vs. Queen of Peace High School). The 1978 team finished the season with a 24-3 record after winning the Group III title with a 49-42 win against Lyndhurst in the championship game. The 1981 team won the Group II title after they defeated Queen of Peace by a score of 60-45 in the championship game played at North Brunswick Township High School with 1,500 in attendance. 
The boys' track team won the NJSIAA indoor relay championships in Group II in 1991 and in Group I in both 2012 and 2013. 
The boys track team won the indoor track Group I state championship in 1996, 2008, 2012 and 2013, and won the Group II title in 1999 (as co-champion). The girls team won the Group II title in 2011. 
In 2010, the cross country team won the Cape-Atlantic League conference championship, finishing the season undefeated with a record of 10-0. 
In 2011, Pleasantville's track and field won two state titles at the Group I indoor track and field championships at the Bennett Center in Toms River. 
Six suspects were arrested after a shooting broke out during the third quarter of a November 2019 football playoff game in Pleasantville against Camden High School, with Camden leading by a score of 6-0. A 10-year-old victim, one of four injured spectators, died days later. 31-year-old Alvin Wyatt, the suspected shooter pled not guilty to his charges which include murder, attempted murder, and weapons offenses. 
Oliver James Fisher (born 13 September 1988) is an English professional golfer who plays on the European Tour. 
Fisher was born in Chingford, London.[citation needed] He was a winner of the Faldo Series, Nick Faldo's development programme for young golfers, in 2003, 2004 and 2005, and as such was regarded as one of the best prospects of his generation. In 2004, he was part of the English team winning the European Boys' Team Championship and a member of Europe's winning 2004 Junior Ryder Cup team against United States in Ohio. In 2005 he became the youngest player to take part in the Walker Cup. 
In late 2006, while still an amateur, Fisher entered the European Tour's qualifying school. He finished fifth to become the youngest Briton to win a tour card and immediately turned professional. 
The 2009 season proved a struggle for Fisher as he finished 125th on the Race To Dubai standings and therefore lost his European Tour Card, and failed to gain it back at qualifying school. Nevertheless, Fisher received a number of starts and sponsors invites in 2010, and a run of 4 consecutive top ten finishes in the early part of the season gave Fisher the momentum to successfully re-establish himself and regain full playing rights for the 2011 season. 
At the end of 2012, Fisher entered the PGA Tour Qualifying School and reached the final stage. However, he missed qualifying by just one stroke over six rounds. This was the last time that the Qualifying School provided a chance for players to qualify for the main PGA Tour, rather than the Web.com Tour. He remained on the European Tour for 2013. 
In 2018, Fisher shot the first-ever round of 59 on the European Tour in the second round of the Portugal Masters. 
Tropidosteptes adustus is a species of plant bug in the family Miridae. It is found in North America. 
Su is also a member of Funky Grammar Unit. His former wife is singer-songwriter Ai Otsuka. He has one daughter, born on March 24, 2011. 
Manasseh Ishiaku (born 9 January 1983) is a Nigerian former professional footballer who played as a striker. 
This biographical article related to a football forward from Nigeria is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article relating to a sportsperson from Rivers State is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Party is the second studio album by New Zealand folk singer-songwriter Aldous Harding, released on 19 May 2017 by 4AD. The album was recorded in Bristol with John Parish, who produced the album, and features contributions from Parish, Fenne Lily, and Mike Hadreas. 
The album was nominated for Album of the Year at the 2017 New Zealand Music Awards. It was also nominated for IMPALA's European Album of the Year Award. 
"Horizon" was released as a single on 10 February 2017 with an accompanying music video directed by Charlotte Evans. The album was detailed the same day. 
"Imagining My Man" was released as a single on 29 March 2017 with an accompanying music video, also directed by Charlotte Evans. 
At Metacritic, which assigns a normalised rating out of 100 to reviews from mainstream publications, the album received an average score of 83, based on 11 reviews. 
Kelsey J. Waite of The A.V. Club described the album as evidence of Harding's "command of her craft" but lamented that "the fantastic background experimentation, bleating wind instruments, and appearances by Mike Hadreas (Perfume Genius) are ultimately too slight to lend the record much in the way of dynamics." 
This biographical article related to politics in the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Launceston North and North Petherwin (Cornish: Lannstevan North ha Peder Wynn) is an electoral division of Cornwall in the United Kingdom and returns one member to sit on Cornwall Council. The current Councillor is Adam Paynter, an Independent and the council's Deputy Leader. 
Starting from 800 CE, the city went into decline, possibly due to being subjugated from a neighboring dominion. The area would not grow again until after the Spanish Conquest, with the founding of the Spanish city of Huajuapan in the valley area below, next to the river. This settlement was established in 1525. 
The residential areas generally contain foundations of stone, with walls of stone or adobe. Later homes built here  have thinner walls made with flagstone filling in the gaps from the larger stones.  Residential buildings situated in dominant positions have gravesites. This seems to be related to more modern Mixtec burial traditions, especially for those in high or preferred positions in society. 
The palace is divided into rooms, a central patio and a large tomb, Number 5. This tomb contains three major burials, probably related to the ruling family. A total of nine tombs were discovered, some had been robbed but in other were found human remains, vessels and gravestones with the names of the deceased. In addition to these, more than 100 ordinary graves were found. 
Covers the width of the Hill Summit; There was a structure, probably a temple. Access was via a wide staircase. 
It is a large platform with vertical walls and flat surface. Probably had residences at the northeast side, has not been determined what buildings were constructed on the platform. 
Located between mounds 1 & 2, Tomb 5 Patio is located here, surrounded on three sides by residential structures, there are basement remains of rooms and patios. 
Yet to be explored, the space between mounds 2 and 3, without residential houses, as the Tomb 5 patio, it is believed to have been a Tianguis (market). 
Pieces found on site are exhibited in this Museum, others in the Oaxaca Cultures Museum and the Mitla Frissell Museum 
The content consists of a series of domas, "dooms" or judgments, and while providing historical information about Kentish compensation and management of public order, it focuses more on procedure than do the other two Kentish codes. There are eleven distinct groups of provisions according to the text's most recent editor Lisi Oliver, though F. L. Attenborough had previously broken it down into 15. Surprisingly, there are no provisions directly related to the church. 
Ursula Poznanski was born in Vienna and grew up in Perchtoldsdorf and, after completing high school, took courses in Japanese studies, journalism, law and theater studies at the University of Vienna, but did not complete a degree. In 1996 she began working as an editor in a medical publishing house. In 2000, after the birth of her son, she took part in a scriptwriting competition run by the Austrian Broadcasting Corporation; her script for a romantic comedy did not win. 
In 2001, her first manuscript Buchstabendschungel was accepted by the Austrian publishing house Dachs and was published in 2003. In the following years she released more children's books and worked in parallel on her first young adult novel. However, she found when searching for a publisher that her book did not fit the market requirements. She instead wrote the manuscript for her first youth thriller Erebos , which was published in 2010 by Loewe Verlag. 
Carl Perkins and his brother Jay performed the song for the B-Side of "Glad All Over", which was released by Sun Records on the "Sun 287: The Rockin' Guitar Man" record. 
In April 2019, the official music video of Sul tsin iare was released. The video, directed by Giorgi Ebralidze, was filmed at a number of locations in Georgia including Maltakva village, Enguri Bridge, and Tbilisi, and also featured singers of the ensemble Shavnabada. 
Net Energy Gain (NEG) is a concept used in energy economics that refers to the difference between the energy expended to harvest an energy source and the amount of energy gained from that harvest. The net energy gain, which can be expressed in joules, differs from the net financial gain that may result from the energy harvesting process, in that various sources of energy (e.g. natural gas, coal, etc.) can be priced differently for the same amount of energy. 
A net energy gain is achieved by expending less energy acquiring a source of energy than is contained in the source to be consumed. That is 
Factors to consider when calculating NEG is the type of energy, the way energy is used and acquired, and the methods used to store or transport the energy. It is also possible to overcomplicate the equation by an infinite number of externalities and inefficiencies that may be present during the energy harvesting process. 
The definition of an energy source is not rigorous. Anything that can provide energy to anything else can qualify. Wood in a stove is full of potential thermal energy; in a car, mechanical energy is acquired from the combustion of gasoline, and the combustion of coal is converted from thermal to mechanical, and then to electrical energy. Examples of energy sources include: 
The extraction energy can be viewed in one of two ways: profitable extractable (NEG>0) or nonprofitable extractable (NEG<0). For instance, in the Athabasca Oil Sands, the highly diffuse nature of the tar sands and low price of crude oil rendered them uneconomical to mine until the late 1950s (NEG<0). Since then, the price of oil has risen and a new steam extraction technique has been developed, allowing the sands to become the largest oil provider in Alberta (NEG>0). 
The situation is different with sustainable energy sources, such as hydroelectric, wind, solar, and geothermal energy sources, because there is no bulk reserve to account for (other than the Sun's lifetime), but the energy continuously trickles, so only the energy required for extraction is considered. 
ISO 13602-1 provides methods to analyse, characterize and compare technical energy systems (TES) with all their inputs, outputs and risk factors. It contains rules and guidelines for the methodology for such analyses. 
ISO 13602-1 describes a means of to establish relations between inputs and outputs (net energy) and thus to facilitate certification, marking, and labelling, comparable characterizations, coefficient of performance, energy resource planning, environmental impact assessments, meaningful energy statistics and forecasting of the direct natural energy resource or energyware inputs, technical energy system investments and the performed and expected future energy service outputs. 
In ISO 13602-1:2002, renewable resource is defined as "natural resource for which the ratio of the creation of the natural resource to the output of that resource from nature to the technosphere is equal to or greater than one". 
Myocarditis, also known as inflammatory cardiomyopathy, is inflammation of the heart muscle. Symptoms can include shortness of breath, chest pain, decreased ability to exercise, and an irregular heartbeat. The duration of problems can vary from hours to months. Complications may include heart failure due to dilated cardiomyopathy or cardiac arrest. 
Myocarditis is most often due to a viral infection. Other causes include bacterial infections, certain medications, toxins and autoimmune disorders. A diagnosis may be supported by an electrocardiogram (ECG), increased troponin, heart MRI, and occasionally a heart biopsy. An ultrasound of the heart is important to rule out other potential causes such as heart valve problems. 
Treatment depends on both the severity and the cause. Medications such as ACE inhibitors, beta blockers, and diuretics are often used. A period of no exercise is typically recommended during recovery. Corticosteroids or intravenous immunoglobulin (IVIG) may be useful in certain cases. In severe cases an implantable cardiac defibrillator or heart transplant may be recommended. 
In 2013, about 1.5 million cases of acute myocarditis occurred. While people of all ages are affected, the young are most often affected. It is slightly more common in males than females. Most cases are mild. In 2015 cardiomyopathy, including myocarditis, resulted in 354,000 deaths up from 294,000 in 1990. The initial descriptions of the condition are from the mid-1800s. 
The signs and symptoms associated with myocarditis are varied, and relate either to the actual inflammation of the myocardium or to the weakness of the heart muscle that is secondary to the inflammation.  Signs and symptoms of myocarditis include the following: 
Since myocarditis is often due to a viral illness, many patients give a history of symptoms consistent with a recent viral infection, including fever, rash, diarrhea, joint pains, and easily becoming tired. 
Myocarditis is often associated with pericarditis, and many people with myocarditis present with signs and symptoms that suggest myocarditis and pericarditis at the same time. 
Myocarditis refers to an underlying process that causes inflammation and injury of the heart.  It does not refer to inflammation of the heart as a consequence of some other insult.  Many secondary causes, such as a heart attack, can lead to inflammation of the myocardium and therefore the diagnosis of myocarditis cannot be made by evidence of inflammation of the myocardium alone. 
Myocardial inflammation can be suspected on the basis of electrocardiographic (ECG) results, elevated C-reactive protein (CRP) and/or erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), and increased IgM (serology) against viruses known to affect the myocardium. Markers of myocardial damage (troponin or creatine kinase cardiac isoenzymes) are elevated. 
The ECG findings most commonly seen in myocarditis are diffuse T wave inversions; saddle-shaped ST-segment elevations may be present (these are also seen in pericarditis). 
Cardiac magnetic resonance imaging (cMRI or CMR) has been shown to be very useful in diagnosing myocarditis by visualizing markers for inflammation of the myocardium. Consensus criteria for the diagnosis of myocarditis by CMR were published in 2009. 
As with most viral infections, symptomatic treatment is the only form of therapy for most forms of myocarditis. In the acute phase, supportive therapy, including bed rest, is indicated.[citation needed] 
In people with symptoms, digoxin and diuretics may help. For people with moderate to severe dysfunction, cardiac function can be supported by use of inotropes such as milrinone in the acute phase, followed by oral therapy with ACE inhibitors when tolerated. 
Systemic corticosteroids may have beneficial effects in people with proven myocarditis. However, data on the usefulness of corticosteroids should be interpreted with caution, since 58% of adults recover spontaneously, while most studies on children lack control groups. 
A 2015 Cochrane review found no evidence of benefit of using intravenous immunoglobulin (IVIG) in adults and tentative benefit in certain children. It is not recommended routinely until there is better evidence. 
People who do not respond to conventional therapy may be candidates for bridge therapy with left ventricular assist devices. Heart transplantation is reserved for people who fail to improve with conventional therapy. 
Studies have shown no benefit for the use of herbal medicine on all-cause mortality in viral myocarditis. 
Among patients with HIV, myocarditis is the most common cardiac pathological finding at autopsy, with a prevalence of 50% or more. 
Although myocarditis is clinically and pathologically clearly defined as "inflammation of the myocardium", its definition, classification, diagnosis, and treatment are subject to continued controversy, but endomyocardial biopsy has helped define the natural history of myocarditis and clarify clinicopathological correlations. 
Nyssodrysternum lineolatum is a species of beetle in the family Cerambycidae. It was described by Bates in 1864. 
Robert John Brinker  is an American financial advisor and radio host. From 1986 to 2018, Brinker hosted the syndicated financial radio show Moneytalk. He previously had a show on local New York radio on WMCA. Prior to that Brinker hosted talk radio programs on WCAU (now WPHT) and WWDB in Philadelphia. 
Born in Philadelphia, Brinker graduated from La Salle College High School. In 1964, Brinker graduated from La Salle University with a B.A. in economics. He then did master's degree studies in communications and finance at Temple University and became a news anchor with Philadelphia news radio station KYW in 1966. 
During the late 1970s, Brinker hosted weekend talk shows on WCAU and WWDB in Philadelphia. Brinker also became the play-by-play radio voice for La Salle and Villanova college basketball. 
In 2014, talkers.com named Brinker to its list of the 100 most important radio talk show hosts of all time. He is a member of the Screen Actors Guild American Federation of Television & Radio Artists. 
After more than 32 years of hosting nationally syndicated "MoneyTalk," Bob Brinker decided to step away from radio. He continues to write and publish his Marketimer investment letter, and says he is glad to "take his weekends back." The last live broadcast of the program was on September 30, 2018. 
Brinker lives in Henderson, Nevada.  He is married and has three grown children. Brinker has also lived in Cocoa Beach, Florida. 
Bill Watterson wrote a total of nineteen[a] official Calvin and Hobbes books that have been published in the United States by Andrews McMeel Publishing; the first, entitled simply Calvin and Hobbes, was released in April 1987, and the most recent, Exploring Calvin and Hobbes: An Exhibition Catalogue, was released in February 2015. 
A twentieth official Calvin and Hobbes book, a children's textbook by the title of Teaching with Calvin and Hobbes, was published under license in 1993 by Playground Publishing in Fargo, North Dakota. 
Before the release of The Complete Calvin and Hobbes in 2005, the complete set of newspaper strips were collected in the following eight books: 
Pattison attended his inauguration, but returned home ill that day. He never again returned to the executive office. Pattison directed the government from his bed until he died at his home Promont, near Milford, Ohio. His cause of death was Bright's disease. 
Pattison was married twice. He married Aletheia Williams, who died leaving three children. Another daughter had died. His second wife was Anna Williams, sister of his first wife. 
In 2004, Pattison Elementary School was built in Milford as John Pattison's namesake. The school educates students in kindergarten through sixth grade. Pattison Park, located on US Highway 50 west of Owensville, is also named in his honor. 
California's 73rd State Assembly district is one of 80 California State Assembly districts. It is currently represented by Republican Laurie Davies of Laguna Niguel. 
The district encompasses much of southern Orange County, stretching from the coast to the Santa Ana Mountains. The affluent district consists of a mix of longstanding towns on the shore and planned communities in the hills. 
Due to redistricting, the 73rd district has been moved around different parts of the state. The current iteration resulted from the 2011 redistricting by the California Citizens Redistricting Commission. 
He made his Russian Premier League debut for PFC Spartak Nalchik on 12 March 2011 in a game against PFC Krylia Sovetov Samara. 
This biographical article related to a Russian association football midfielder born in 1985 is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The 4th Imola Grand Prix was a motor race, run to Formula One rules, held on 21 April 1963 at the Autodromo di Castellaccis. The previous three Imola Grands Prix were sports car races held in the mid-1950s, and this was the first Formula One event held at the circuit. From 1981, the circuit was the venue for the San Marino Grand Prix.  
The race was run over 50 laps of the circuit, and was won by British driver Jim Clark in a Lotus 25, lapping the entire field except for second-placed Jo Siffert. Trevor Taylor set the fastest lap after losing more than ten laps with a gear selector problem. 
The album is the realization of a unique project of Nazario where she turned the Arts Center into a recording studio, inviting 300 friends to share with her that night. 
The Namibian landscape consists generally of five geographical areas, each with characteristic abiotic conditions and vegetation with some variation within and overlap between them: the Central Plateau, the Namib Desert, the Great Escarpment, the Bushveld, and the Kalahari Desert. 
Namibia's Coastal Desert is one of the oldest deserts in the world. Its sand dunes, created by the strong onshore winds, are the highest in the world. 
Sandy beach comprises 54% and mixed sand and rock add another 28%. Only 16% of the total length is rocky shoreline. The coastal plains are dune fields, gravel plains covered with lichen and some scattered salt pans. Near the coast there are areas where the dunes are vegetated with hammocks. Namibia has rich coastal and marine resources that remain largely unexplored. 
Efundja, the annual flooding of the northern parts of the country, often causes not only damage to infrastructure but loss of life. The rains that cause these floods originate in Angola, flow into Namibia's Cuvelai basin, and fill the Oshanas (Oshiwambo: flood plains) there. The worst floods so far[update] occurred in March 2011 and displaced 21,000 people. 
The capital and largest city, Windhoek, is in the centre of the country. It is home to the country's Central Administrative Region, Windhoek Hosea Kutako International Airport and the country's railhead. Other important towns are: 
Terrain: Mostly high plateau; Namib Desert along coast; Kalahari Desert in east. In the north near the border with Angola there is a flat area that has been designated by the World Wildlife Fund as part of the Angolan mopane woodlands ecoregion. 
Natural resources: diamonds, copper, uranium, gold, silver, lead, tin, lithium, cadmium, tungsten, zinc, salt, hydropower, fish note: suspected deposits of oil, coal, and iron ore 
Land use: agricultural land: 47.2% (2018) arable land: 1% (2018) permanent crops: 0% (2018) permanent pasture: 46.2% (2018) forest: 8.8% (2018) other: 44% (2018) 
Environment - current issues: depletion and degradation of water and aquatic resources; desertification; land degradation; loss of biodiversity and biotic resources; wildlife poaching 
Environment - international agreements: party to: Antarctic-Marine Living Resources, Biodiversity, Climate Change, Climate Change-Kyoto Protocol, Desertification, Endangered Species, Hazardous Wastes, Law of the Sea, Ozone Layer Protection, Wetlands 
This is a list of the extreme points of Namibia, the points that are farther north, south, east or west than any other location. 
Equipo Continental Supergiros is a Colombian UCI Continental cycling team founded in 2010. In 2020, the team upgraded from amateur status to Continental. 
Juan Russo was an Argentine weightlifter. He competed in the men's middleweight event at the 1948 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article relating to weightlifting in Argentina is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The organization was incorporated as a joint venture with MDA Training (MDA), a London-based financial training company founded in 1988 by Professor Walter Reid, who was one of the founding professors of the London Business School (LBS). 
In 2021, Corporate Finance Institute acquired Macabacus, a leading Microsoft Office Add-In for finance professionals, with tens of thousands of monthly and annual subscribers. 
CFI also offers the Commercial Banking and Credit Analyst (CBCA) certification which is designed for the credit analysts who are working in different banks, credit rating agency or insurance. The program includes 17 optional prerequisites to review the fundamentals and 15 core courses to build a foundation in credit analysis. Students must earn a minimum passing grade of 80% in each course assessment to complete the requirements for the program and to receive a certificate of completion. 
The 13.5-hectare (34-acre) complex contains twenty courts, including three large-capacity stadiums; Les Jardins de Roland Garros, a large restaurant and bar complex; Le Village, the press and VIP area; France's National Training Centre (CNE); and the Tenniseum, a bilingual, multimedia museum of the history of tennis. 
The facility is named after Roland Garros, a French pioneer aviator who completed the first solo flight across the Mediterranean Sea, engineer (inventor of the first forward-firing aircraft machine gun), and World War I hero (as a pilot, he shot down four enemy aircraft, though popularly believed to be five).  Garros was killed in aerial combat in October 1918. 
After the completion of the 2018 tournament, the stadium was demolished down to its foundations and rebuilt with steeper grandstands in time for the 2019 tournament. A retractable roof and floodlights were added in time for the 2020 tournament, which was delayed to September of that year due to the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic. 
Stade Roland Garros's new 5,000-seat tertiary venue was completed in March 2019 on the grounds of the Jardin des Serres d'Auteuil.  Its namesake was the 1938 and 1939 women's singles champion who is also remembered as a leader of the French Resistance during the Second World War.  The court was constructed four meters below ground level with greenhouses on all four sides. It was built to replace Court 1, which was demolished. 
Demolition of Court 1 began shortly after conclusion of the 2019 tournament and inauguration of the new tertiary venue, Court Simonne Mathieu. In its place, a greatly enlarged Place des Mousquetaires was constructed, where spectators can watch matches on a large video screen. 
In December 2015, the Paris Administrative Court ordered suspension of reclamation work involving the Auteuil botanical garden greenhouses. In a statement, the FFT responded that the greenhouses would not be destroyed, and would, in fact, be embellished.  FFT also noted that opponents of the eastward expansion "[did] not have good alternatives from the operational, legal and environmental point of view", and added that expansion into the Bois de Boulogne was impossible. 
Stade Roland Garros is located at the western side of Paris, at the southern boundary of the Bois de Boulogne in Paris's 16th arrondissement. The triangular property is bounded by Avenue Porte d'Auteuil and A13 autoroute on the north and Boulevard d'Auteuil on the south. The eastern boundary is Avenue Gordon Bennett and the adjacent Jardin des Serres d'Auteuil. 
A special Stade Roland Garros taxi stand operates in May and June during the French Open on the southeast corner of the venue grounds, at the corner of Robert Schuman Avenue and Auteuil Boulevard. 
(459883) 2014 JX55 is an asteroid from the central regions of the asteroid belt. After its first observations as 2007 EB26 in 2007, it was considered an inner heliospheric asteroid and near-Earth object with one of the closest perihelion ever observed of any body orbiting the Sun, until further observations invalidated the conclusions from early observations. The object measures approximately 2.8 kilometers (1.7 miles) in diameter.  
Yahya Al Ghassani is an Tanzanian player born in the United Arab Emirates. He played with Al Ahli and Al Wahda in juniors .He renewed his 4-year contract with Al Wahda in 2018 after allowing the born in United Arab Emirates to participate in the UAE Pro League . He was granted Emirati citizenship in 2019 and was chosen to participate with the Olympic team to participate in 2020 AFC U-23 Championship . On 4 January 2021 left Al Wahda and signed with Shabab Al-Ahli for three years. 
This biographical article related to Emirati association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Blackbriar is a 1972 supernatural young adult coming-of-age novel by William Sleator and was Sleator's first young adult novel. The book has been translated into German as Das Geisterhaus and into Danish as Det forheksede hus. 
Blackbriar follows the character of Danny as he attempts to uncover the mysteries of his new home. Formerly abandoned, the local residents refuse to speak about the old cottage of Blackbriar. As Danny dreams of witches, fire, and maniacal laughter, he begins to discover that strange dreams might be the least of his worries. 
Critical reception for Blackbriar has been mixed to positive, with Kirkus Reviews calling it "perfectly eerie" and Teacher Magazine praising the writing as "skillful". In a 1972 review, Publishers Weekly wrote that "neither the characterization nor the plot is entirely convincing." The Horn Book Review also reviewed the book, stating "the story is mysterious and suspenseful, and its effectiveness lies in Sleator's characterizations and narrative skill". 
See guidelines for writing about novels. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
The civil parish includes the larger village of Galphay, and also the village of Mickley.  The population of the parish in the 2001 census was 355, reducing to 340 at the 2011 Census. 
Braithwaite Hall, about a mile south west of the village, is a Grade II listed building thought to date from the 16th century.  It should not be confused with Braithwaite Hall in Coverdale, a National Trust property. 
The Patriots had the near-total support of the Ethiopian Orthodox Church. The majority of participants were Christian highlanders. Ethiopian Muslims were less involved in the Italo-Ethiopian conflict and sometimes considered the Christians as much their enemies as the Italians. Relations between the two religious groups were tenuous throughout Italian occupation and in one instance Muslim Oromo attacked and killed retreating Patriots in Wollo Province. 
A rebellion was initiated in September 1937 in the Lasta region and in a few days was threatening the surprised Italian administration in Begemder and Gojjam. Well-armed Patriots seized numerous outlying residences and destroyed several entire Askari detachments. A number of Italian officers were also killed. Following the insurgency the Italian press ceased to report on combat operations in Ethiopia. 
Muhammad Waqas Sharif (born 3 September 1988) is a Pakistani field hockey player. He plays as Right Out. 
Waqas was a member of the gold medal-winning team at the Asian Games in Guanzhou, China.[citation needed] 
Waqas was a member of the gold medal-winning team at the 2012 Asian Men's Hockey Champions Trophy in Doha, Qatar. Muhammad Waqas was top scorer in the tournament with 11 goals.  He was part of Pakistan's 2012 Summer Olympic team. 
This biographical article relating to a Pakistani field hockey figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
37452 Spirit, provisional designation 4282 P-L, is a dark Hildian asteroid from the outermost region of the asteroid belt, approximately 9 kilometers in diameter. 
The asteroid was discovered on 24 September 1960, by Dutch astronomers Ingrid and Cornelis van Houten at Leiden, on photographic plates taken by Tom Gehrels at Palomar Observatory, California. It was named after NASA's Spirit Mars rover. 
Spirit is a member of the Hilda family of asteroids, which stay in a 3:2 orbital resonance with the gas-giant Jupiter, meaning that for every two orbits Jupiter completes, a Hildian asteroid will complete three orbits. As their orbit does not cross the path of any of the planets, it will therefore not be pulled out of orbit by Jupiter's gravitational field and likely remain in a stable orbit for thousands of years. 
The body's observation arc begins with its official discovery observation, as no precoveries were taken and no prior identifications were made. 
According to the survey carried out by the NEOWISE mission of NASA's Wide-field Infrared Survey Explorer, Spirit measures 8.9 kilometers in diameter and its surface has an albedo of 0.056, which is typical value for carbonaceous C-type asteroids. It has an absolute magnitude of 14.2. 
This minor planet was named by the discoverers for NASA's successful Mars rover Spirit which had been exploring the rocks and minerals in the Martian Gusev crater. The official naming citation was published by the Minor Planet Center on 28 September 2004 (M.P.C. 52770). 39382 Opportunity, also an asteroid of the Hilda family and discovered on the same day, was named after Spirit's twin rover, Opportunity. 
Each member of the collective group tries to create his own personality and influences that allows the development of the unique sound of the band with the use of incorporating vocals, songwriting, dance steps and moves, stage arrangements, song production. 
For the efficiency of the band, they play their own different roles that brings about the unity of the song group with standard musical effects and cohesion.   
They are an innovative team at a professional level, and they have a great experience among the public. 
The cooperation with Jessy Matador, at that time was adominant force in African rhythms in "Afrikan Free Style" . After they featured the vocals of Anges d'Afrik, in 2009, they released "Dorloter". Particularly in the night of the venues, followed by a large number of appearances in Paris and throughout France.  
The band won the award for "best house tribal song" for "Zekete zekete" during the Afrotainment Museke Awards, and Jeff Attiogbe (Togo) directing the music video for the same song was nominated for "best video director". 
The band members have been involved in their own music projects. In 2014, Stone Warley was featured in the single "Hum Connection" credited to Lee Mashup featuring Stone Warley and Co. The single became popular in French night venues and charted on SNEP, the official French Singles Chart reaching number 59. 
Taking from April until its premiere the following January, Bellini had time to ensure that the opera was as close to perfection as possible. After the premiere, Bellini reported to his friend Francesco Florimo in Naples that: 
The French had all gone mad; there were such noise and such shouts that they themselves were astonished at being so carried away ... In a word, my dear Florimo, it was an unheard of thing, and since Saturday, Paris has spoken of it in amazement
Continuing to work on the yet-unnamed I puritani, Bellini moved from central Paris, and at some time in the late Spring (specific date unknown) Bellini wrote to Pepoli to remind him that he should bring his work with him the following day "so that we can finish discussing the first act, which...will be interesting, magnificent, and proper poetry for music in spite of you and all your absurd rules..." At the same time, he laid out one basic rule for the librettist to follow: 
Carve into your head in adamantine letters: The opera must draw tears, terrify people, make them die through singing
When nothing came of negotiations with Naples for a new opera, Bellini composed an alternative version intended for the famous Maria Malibran, who was to sing Amina at the Teatro di San Carlo in Naples in 1835. However, she died exactly a year to the day after the composer, and so this version was not performed on stage until 10 April 1986 at the Teatro Petruzzelli in Bari, with Katia Ricciarelli in the title role. 
Given Bellini's own expressions of frustration at working with a new librettist for the first time, one musicologist, Mary Ann Smart, provides a different point of view in regard to Pepoli's approach to writing a libretto. Firstly, she addresses the issue of Pepoli's inexperience: 
Quoting Pepoli, Smart continues: "for this song [the "Marseillaise"] the people fight, win, triumph: Europe and the world shouted Liberty!". Smart then examines the relationship between Pepoli's 1830 views and how they appear to be manifested in what he wrote for I puritani: 
Nevertheless, the Suoni la tromba which Bellini described as his "Hymn to Liberty" and which had initially been placed in the opera's first act was enthusiastically received by the composer: "My dear Pepoli, I hasten to express my great satisfaction with the duet I received by post this morning ... the whole is magnificent..." 
By September Bellini was writing to Florimo of being able to "polish and re-polish" in the three remaining months before rehearsals and he expresses happiness with Pepoli's verses ("a very beautiful trio for the two basses and La Grisi") and by around mid-December he had submitted the score for Rossini's approval. 
Throughout his stay in Paris, Bellini had cultivated the older composer and had maintained a friendship with him: "I have always adored Rossini, and I succeeded, and happily ... [having] tamed Rossini's [perceived] hatred, I no longer was frightened and finished that work of mine which won me so much honour". Later, the successful dress rehearsal, he wrote: "... my very dear Rossini ... now loves me as a son". 
With rehearsals planned for late December/early January, the dress rehearsal took place on 20 January 1835. It was attended by "all of high society, all the great artists, and everyone most distinguished in Paris were in the theatre, enthusiastic." Bellini's ecstatic letter to Florimo which followed the dress rehearsal recounts the enthusiastic reception of many of the numbers throughout the performance, most especially the second act bass duet, so that, by its end: 
The French had all gone mad; there were such noise and such shouts that they themselves were astonished at being so carried away ... In a word, my dear Florimo, it was an unheard of thing, and since Saturday, Paris has spoken of it in amazement ... I showed myself to the audience, which shouted as if insane ... How satisfied I am! [He concludes by noting the success of the singers]: "Lablache sang like a god, Grisi like a little angel, Rubini and Tamburini the same."
It was upon Rossini's advice and after the dress rehearsal that the opera was changed from two acts to three, the second act ending after the Suoni la tromba duet for the two basses. 
Arturo and his squires come into the hall and are joined by Elvira, Valton, Giorgio and the ladies and gentlemen of the castle. After a general welcome from all assembled, Arturo expresses his new-found happiness. (Aria, Arturo; then Giorgio and Walton; then all assembled: A te, o cara / amore talora / "In you beloved, love led me in secrecy and tears, now it guides me to your side".) 
When the wedding party enters, they ask for Arturo, then learn, largely from Riccardo, that he has fled with Enrichetta. Pursuit is organised. Becoming increasingly distraught, Elvira believes that she sees Arturo: (Aria; then ensemble: Oh, vieni al tempio, fedele Arturo / "Ah! come, ah! come! Oh! come to the church, faithful Arturo".) It is increasingly clear that she has gone mad. 
At the sound of drums being heard, Elvira appears to be returning to a state of madness, fearing that they will again be parted. Then soldiers' voices are heard close by and Riccardo, Giorgio, and the ladies and gentlemen of the fortress enter announcing Arturo's death sentence. With that, she finally comes to her senses. 
The soldiers continue to demand Arturo's execution, but the sounds of a herald arriving are heard. He brings letters which are opened by Riccardo and Giorgio. They announce that although the Royalists have been defeated, Oliver Cromwell has pardoned all prisoners. The ensemble expresses its general and its personal joy. 
In act 3, an ensemble (Credeasi, misera) develops, during which Bellini writes an in alt F-natural above C5 for Arturo. Most tenors would typically sing a D-flat instead of an F. In the seldom performed Malibran version, it is Elvira (i.e., the soprano) who sings, in a higher octave, the principal part of Credeasi, misera. 
I puritani, to which she referred as "dear Puritani", was Queen Victoria's favourite opera and the first which she attended in the company of Prince Albert before their marriage. The 2009 film The Young Victoria includes an episode in which Albert and Victoria discuss the opera, as well as a scene showing Victoria attending a performance. 
In the film Fitzcarraldo, the cast of I puritani are being transported on Fitzcarraldo's boat. They perform parts of the opera in full costume and sing "A te, o cara" (from act 1, scene 3) as Fitzcarraldo makes his triumphal return to Iquitos. 
 The Rockhampton colonial by-election, 1870 was a by-election held on 20 June 1870 in the electoral district of Rockhampton for the Queensland Legislative Assembly. 
On 7 June 1870, Henry Milford, member for Rockhampton since the by-election in December 1870, resigned, having never taken his seat in Parliament. Milford contested the resulting by-election on 20 June 1870, but was defeated by Alexander Fyfe.  
Best Bits is a compilation album released by Roger Daltrey released in March 1982 in United States and under the title The Best of Roger Daltrey in Europe in 1981.  It was released on MCA 5301, Canada, and the album reached #185 in the U.S. charts.  The tracks "Martyrs and Madmen" and "Treachery" were previously unreleased.  The compilation and additional remixing were done by Jon Astley and Phil Chapman. 
Microcotylinae is a subfamily within  family Microcotylidae and class Monogenea. This subfamily was created by Taschenberg in 1879. 
The St. Mary Help of Christians Church or simply Sanaa Catholic church is a religious building that is located in the city of Sanaa, the capital of the Asian country of Yemen. 
This is one of the 4 subsiten Catholic churches in that nation, the others being dedicated to St. Francis of Assisi (Aden), Sacred Heart of Jesus (Hodeidah) and St. Therese of the Child Jesus (Taiz). 
In 2011, as part of construction for the METRO Green Line light rail, reconfiguration of the bridge began. The original two eastbound and westbound traffic lanes were permanently reduced to one lane eastbound and one lane westbound, using the outside lanes. The two inside (center) lanes are now dedicated to light rail. The light rail line opened on June 14, 2014. 
A darker facet of the bridge's history is its association with suicide. Poet and university professor John Berryman is the most famous person to have killed himself at the site, when he jumped from the bridge in 1972. About a half-dozen others have also died by landing in the river or on the flats area. 
In August 2008, concerns about the strength of the upper level led Hennepin County to restrict the pedestrian and bicycle traffic to a 14-foot-wide section in the center. Engineers had decided that in preparation for repairs, the weight needed to be moved to the center, where there was support from the columns below. Usage of the upper deck continued to be restricted for about a year until repairs were complete. 
On 16 May 2011, Washington Avenue just east of the bridge was permanently closed to personal motor vehicle traffic. The roadway was converted into an exclusive use transit mall between Pleasant and Walnut Streets, so all eastbound lower-level traffic other than buses and emergency vehicles must exit to East River Parkway/Delaware Street and the only westbound access to the bridge for most cars will be from Pleasant Street Southeast. 
The Ours river flows through the commune from the south passing west of the village and continuing north to join the Burge which forms part of the northern border. There are small lakes in the north of the commune that link to the Burge. The Burge continues north to join the Allier south of Le Port Barreau. 
The Church of Notre-Dame (12th century) is registered as an historical monument. It contains a Bronze Bell (1578) that is registered as an historical object. 
Corus Entertainment Inc. (stylized as corus., and also COrUs in their previous logo) is a Canadian multinational mass media and entertainment conglomerate company headquartered at the Corus Quay in Toronto, Ontario. Formed in 1999 as a spin-off from Shaw Communications, it has prominent holdings in the radio, publishing, and television industries. 
In May 2002, Corus announced that it had acquired a 50% stake in Locomotion, a Latin American and Spanish channel focusing primarily of animated series targeting teens and young adults. Hearst Corporation owned the other half. 
In July 2007, Corus acquired CKBT-FM and CJZZ-FM from Canwest. In June 2008, CHRC was sold to the ownership group of the Quebec Remparts hockey team. 
Also in August 2007, Corus announced a partnership with Hearst Corporation to launch Cosmopolitan TV. In March 2008, CTVglobemedia sold Canadian Learning Television to Corus for $73 million 
Corus launched a Canadian version of Nickelodeon on November 2, 2009, replacing Discovery Kids. In 2010, Corus's sister company Shaw Communications re-entered the broadcasting industry through its acquisition of the media assets of the bankrupt Canwest, which re-formed the Shaw Media division. 
On November 9, 2010, Hasbro Studios signed an agreement with Corus to broadcast their productions on its networks. 
In March 2012, Corus and Shaw launched ABC Spark, a localized version of U.S. cable network ABC Family, with Shaw owning 49%. In July 2012, the Teletoon Canada venture (50% with Astral Media) similarly launched a Canadian version of Cartoon Network and Adult Swim. 
On March 4, 2019, it was announced that a full-time Canadian version of Adult Swim would be launched. The block was shut down on that same day, and relaunched as 24-hour channel on April 1, 2019, replacing Action under its license. 
In May 2019, Shaw announced it would sell its shares in Corus in a secondary offering, at a valuation of $548 million. The sale was expected to be completed by the end of the month. 
In June 2019, Corus was announced as a launch partner for Amazon Prime Video Channels in Canada, offering a subscription-based bundle known as StackTV with access to live and on-demand programs from Global and eleven Corus specialty services. Corus would also launch a separate Nickelodeon SVOD channel. 
In July 2019, service providers began notifying their customers that IFC Canada and CosmoTV would be shut down on September 30, 2019. In October 2019, FYI announced that it would shutter on December 31, 2019. 
In March 2020, Corus replaced the individual mobile apps for most of its specialty channels with a new unified app under the Global brand, featuring content from Global, Global News, Food Network, HGTV, History, Showcase, Slice, and W Network on-launch. The app encompasses the TV Everywhere streaming of programming from the networks for their subscribers, as well as free ad-supported streaming of selected programs from the networks without a television subscription. 
In June and July, Corus reached two content agreements with subsidiaries of Comcast, including Canadian rights to original series produced for its U.S. streaming service Peacock (NBCUniversal) on June 23, 2020, and Canadian rights to original productions from British subsidiary Sky Studios (via NBCUniversal Global Distribution). 
Corus is an industry sponsor of the University of Waterloo Stratford Campus; Gary Maavara, Corus' Corporate Secretary, sits on the Waterloo campus' advisory board. The company also funds a couple of endowed chair positions, including chair in Women in Management at the Ivey Business School (London, Ontario, Canada) beginning in 2003, and a chair in Communications Strategy at the Rotman School of Management (Toronto) beginning in 2002. 
As Corus Entertainment and Shaw Communications are both effectively controlled by JR Shaw, the CRTC considers them to be one entity regarding the "Diversity of Voices" policy and a vertical integration rule which requires television providers to carry three channels owned by unaffiliated parties for each co-owned channel they offer: due to the effective control, Corus networks that are carried by Shaw television services are subject to this rule. 
Many of the assets listed above are only partially owned by Shaw. Refer to full asset list for detailed information. 
Effective January 1, 1984, the Bell System's many member companies were variously merged into seven independent "Regional Holding Companies", also known as Regional Bell Operating Companies (RBOCs), or "Baby Bells". This divestiture reduced the book value of AT&T by approximately 70%. 
The breakup of the Bell System resulted in the creation of seven independent companies that were formed from the original twenty-two AT&T-controlled members of the System. 
On January 1, 1984, these companies were NYNEX, Pacific Telesis, Ameritech, Bell Atlantic, Southwestern Bell Corporation, BellSouth, and US West. 
US West was acquired by Qwest in June 2000 for $43.5 billion. On April 6, 2011, Qwest was acquired by CenturyLink, an independent telephone provider, bringing Qwest Corporation, originally Mountain Bell, Northwestern Bell and Pacific Northwest Bell under its control. 
The coat of arms was granted on 22 August 1986.  The arms show a black buoy on a gold background.  The buoy is an appropriate symbol for a municipality since it is dependent on fishing and sailing. 
Eulamprotes helotella is a moth of the family Gelechiidae. It is found in Spain, Portugal, France, Italy, Greece, Corsica, Sardinia, and Crete. It is also found in North Africa. 
This article on a moth of the subfamily Anomologinae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Louis Holmes (born February 24, 1985) is an American football defensive end who is currently a free agent. He was signed by the San Francisco 49ers as an undrafted free agent in 2008. He played college football at Arizona. 
He Spent final prep season at Dillard High School (Fort Lauderdale, FL)  after attending his first three years of high school in his hometown of Memphis. 
Delaney found "little corners in the world of the Great Depression that would or could be receptive to his work." He earned a studio space and place to live through his work at the Whitney as a guard, telephone operator and gallery attendant. 
Commendably, Delaney established himself as a well known part of the bohemianism of the art scene of the period. His friends included the "poet laureate" of the period, Countee Cullen, artist Georgia O'Keeffe, and writer Henry Miller, among many others. He became the "spiritual father" of the young writer James Baldwin. 
Despite the friendships and successes of this period, he remained a rather isolated individual. David Leeming, in his 1998 biography Amazing Grace: a life of Beauford Delaney, presents Delaney as having led a very "compartmentalized" life in New York. 
In Greenwich Village, where his studio was, Delaney became part of a gay bohemian circle of mainly white friends; but he was furtive and rarely comfortable with his sexuality. 
When he traveled to Harlem to visit his African-American friends and colleagues, Delaney made efforts to ensure that they knew little of his other social life in Greenwich Village. He feared that many of his Harlem friends would be uncomfortable or repelled by his homosexuality. 
The Smithsonian American Art Museum notes that "neither early success nor gracious spirit spared Delaney from the obscurity and poverty" that plagued most of his adult life. Brooks Atkinson wrote in his 1951 book Once Around the Sun: "No one knows exactly how Beauford lives. Pegging away at a style of painting that few people understand or appreciate, he has disciplined himself, not only physically but spiritually, to live with a kind of personal magnetism in a barren world." 
Delaney's paintings seem to say, "I may be suffering, but what an experience this is." Delaney's work "is never depressing, though Beauford was often depressed; he could say yes to life in spite of the fact that life was kicking him in the butt." 
His years in Paris led to a dramatic stylistic shift from the "figurative compositions of New York life to abstract expressionist studies of color and light." 
"Delaney's relationship with abstraction predated the notorious Abstract Expressionist movement, positioning him as a forerunner of one of the most important ideological and stylistic developments in twentieth-century American art. Although he chose not to identify himself with the movement, as the Abstract Expressionists began to gain notoriety in the late 1940s, Delaney's abstract work increasingly gained attention." 
Though abstract expressionist work predominated during this period, Delaney still produced figurative compositions. His portrait of James Baldwin (1963, pastel on paper) is described by the US National Portrait Gallery as "heated and confrontational, its harsh colors roughly applied" and glowing with "the vibrant, Van Gogh-inspired yellow the artist often used after he moved to Paris." The portrait "is both a likeness based on memory and a study in light." 
Delaney's drive to continuously paint resulted in him using his raincoat when he was out of canvas, "Untitled, 1954" is an oil on raincoat fragment. 
By 1961, heavy drinking had begun to impair Delaney's often fragile mental and physical health. Periods of lucidity were interrupted by days and sometimes weeks of madness. This pattern continued for the remainder of his life. 
In his Introduction to the Exhibition of Beauford Delaney opening December 4, 1964 at the Gallery Lambert, James Baldwin wrote, "the darkness of Beauford's beginnings, in Tennessee, many years ago, was a black-blue midnight indeed, opaque and full of sorrow. And I do not know, nor will any of us ever really know, what kind of strength it was that enabled him to make so dogged and splendid a journey." 
Following his death, he was praised as a great and neglected painter but, with a few notable exceptions, the neglect continued. 
Delaney's work has now been exhibited by, among others, the Philadelphia Museum of Art, Harvard University Art Museums, Art Institute of Chicago, Knoxville Museum of Art, The Minneapolis Institute of Arts, The Newark Museum, The Studio Museum in Harlem, and the Smithsonian American Art Museum. His work has also been exhibited by a number of galleries, including the Anita Shapolsky Gallery and the Michael Rosenfeld Gallery in New York City. 
The Showtime series, Flatbush Misdemeanors, pays tribute to Delaney with one of the protagonists teaching at Beauford Delaney High School, a fictional public school set in Flatbush, Brooklyn. 
In 2009, freelance writer Monique Y. Wells was researching an article on African-American gravesites in Paris when she learned that Delaney was buried in an unmarked grave at the Parisian Cemetery of Thiais. She discovered that Delaney's remains would be exhumed before the end of the year if the "concession" (the equivalent of a lease) on his grave was not renewed. Friends of Delaney gathered the sum required, and Wells paid the fee to the cemetery to preserve Delaney's resting place. 
The same friends expressed a desire to place a marker at Delaney's gravesite, and Wells was inspired to found a French non-profit association to facilitate fundraising for a tombstone. Called Les Amis de Beauford Delaney, the association was created in November 2009.  Fundraising began in February 2010, and the association collected sufficient funds to proceed with ordering and installing the stone by June 2010.  The installation was completed by August 2010. 
Howell Cheney Technical High School (previously Manchester Trade School), or Cheney Tech, is a technical high school in Manchester, Connecticut. It was established in 1915 by Howell Cheney as a textile school, in order to provide training for those wishing to work at the local silk mills. It receives students from many nearby towns. Cheney Tech is part of the Connecticut Technical High School System. 
Howell Cheney established a textile school on Hartford Road in 1912 in order to train prospective employees of the local Cheney Silk Mills. 
In 1915, the school moved into the nearby Franklin Building. With the extra room gained, several subjects were added to the curriculum, including carpentry and mechanical drafting. The State Department of Education also encompassed the school in this year, causing it to be renamed the Manchester Trade School. 
The school changed its name again in 1943 to Howell Cheney Regional Vocational-Technical School, in honor of the founder. In 1946 it introduced a new education system, as well as merging with Manchester High School. The merger was designed to incorporate the entire curriculum between the two schools, allowing their students a wider education. The program lasted only eight years, as Cheney Tech later offered the entire curriculum of both schools. 
After World War II, student enrollment increased, bringing the construction of a new school. The West Middle Turnpike campus was opened in 1962, offering a new program of trades such as automotive technology, tool and die making, and industrial electronics. In 1982 the second floor, now known as the academic wing, was added for more classroom space, and an extra wing was added to the shops. 
New trades added to curriculum after that were H-VAC, welding, and diesel mechanics. At the beginning of the 1990s, microcomputer software technology and culinary arts were added to the trade program, while 2006 brought the end to the electronics program. 
In February 2005, a $45 million expansion/renovation project was begun, to include a new three-story shop wing including a larger expanded art room and three learning labs; the new culinary arts kitchen, bakery, and public restaurant; and new academic classrooms, gym, locker rooms, fitness center administration/guidance/support services, and athletic fields. The new facilities opened in time for the start of the 2007-2008 school year. 
The computer-aided drafting and design program will soon be making a cooperative program with Hamilton Sundstrand, a division of the United Technologies Corporation. The program includes potential CWE options for students in drafting technology. 
In addition to a complete academic program leading to a high school diploma, students attending Cheney Tech receive training in one of the following trades and technologies: 
Born in Boston, he was a direct descendant of Paul Revere. Little studied with Marcel Breuer and Walter Gropius. He graduated from Harvard in 1937 and received continued there completing his masters 1939. 
Yergyunyag is located 10 km northwest of Khuchni (the district's administrative centre) by road. Yurgulig is the nearest rural locality. 
In 1972, Hall ran for Congress, but lost. In 1974, Hall ran again for Congress, this time to succeed longtime congressman Leslie C. Arends, the House Republican Whip since 1943, in Illinois's 15th congressional district which included DeKalb, LaSalle, Kendall, Grundy, Livingston, Ford, Woodford, Marshall, Putnam counties and the southern portion of Kane County. Hall defeated Republican National Committeeman and former Congressman Cliffard D. Carlson of Aurora, Illinois. 
Hall served in the 94th Congress. While in Congress, he served on the Committee on Education and Labor and the Science and Technology Committee. He was an unsuccessful candidate for reelection to the 95th Congress in 1976 when he was defeated by Republican Tom Corcoran. 
He was also an unsuccessful candidate for election in 1978 to the 96th Congress and in 1982 to the 98th Congress. In 1980, he ran for one of three seats in the Illinois House of Representatives from the 38th district. He finished fourth of four candidates losing to Republicans Thomas W. Ewing and Betty J. Hoxsey and Democrat Peg McDonnell Breslin. 
He served as Administrative assistant to Illinois Secretary of State from 1977 to 1983. He ran for the Democratic nomination for the 1991 special election for Illinois's 15th congressional district, but lost to former State Representative Gerald A. Bradley. 
He taught school in Illinois public school system and also served as a principal and superintendent at Goodfarm School until his retirement in the early 1990s. In 2008, Hall slipped outside of his son's house in Bolingbrook, Illinois and died later at La Grange Memorial Hospital in La Grange, Illinois. 
He was born at Bathgate Castle, West Lothian, Scotland, the eldest son and heir of James Stewart, 5th High Steward of Scotland (c.1260-1309) by his third wife Giles (Latinised to Egidia) de Burgh, a daughter of the Irish nobleman Walter de Burgh, 1st Earl of Ulster. 
Following the liberation of King Robert the Bruce's wife, Elizabeth de Burgh, and daughter Marjorie, from their long captivity in England, Walter the High Steward was sent to receive them at the Anglo-Scottish Border and conduct them back to the Scottish royal court. He later married Marjorie, receiving the Barony of Bathgate in Linlithgowshire as part of his wife's dowry. 
In about 1320/26 Walter, Steward of Scotland, granted by charter to John St. Clair, his valet, the lands of Maxton, Roxburghshire,  one of the witnesses being Roberto de Lauwedir tunc justiciario Laudonie ("Robert de Lauder, then Justiciar of Lothian"). 
He died on 9 April 1327 at Bathgate Castle and was buried in the Abbey Church of Paisley, alongside his first wife, Marjorie Bruce, and his five High Steward ancestors. A memorial on the wall of the Abbey is inscribed as follows: 
In everlasting memory of the High Stewards of Scotland. Here rest their bodies where stood the high altar of this Abbey Church of Paisley.
The Warren J. Harang Jr. Municipal Auditorium is a 3,500-seat multi-purpose arena in Thibodaux, Louisiana. It was built in 1970 and is named in honor of Warren J. Harang Jr., the long-time mayor of Thibodaux. The facility includes a main arena and a meeting room. 
The arena is used to host basketball and volleyball games, professional wrestling and roller derby. The Cajun Rollergirls of the WFTDA use the arena for their home competitions. 
Chukotkan (Chukotian, Chukotic) is a dialect cluster that forms one branch of the Chukotko-Kamchatkan language family. It is spoken in two autonomous regions at the extreme northeast of Russia, bounded on the east by the Pacific and on the north by the Arctic. 
The term Luorawetlan (Luoravetlan), used for Chukchi in the 1930s, is actually the ethnonym of both the Chukchi and Koryak. 
Traditionally, Chukotkan was considered two languages, Chukchi and Koryak, due to a sharp ethnic division between the Chukchi and Koryak people. However, the Kerek and Alyutor dialects, spoken by ethnic Chukchi and Koryak, are as different from those varieties as they are from each other. Thus Chukotkan is currently generally classified as four languages, but it could as easily be considered one language with significant dialectical variation. 
The Ford School offers wide-ranged research in public policy and is known for its strong quantitative orientation. The school runs dual degree programs with the University of Michigan Law School, Ross School of Business, Taubman College of Architecture and Urban Planning, School of Information, School of Social Work, School of Environment and Sustainability, and University of Michigan School of Public Health, as well as the Departments of Economics, Sociology, and Political Science.  
In 1936, the program became the Institute of Public and Social Administration. In 1946, it became the Institute of Public Administration. 
The University of Michigan established the institute as the School of Public Policy in 1995, with Lorch Hall as the host building. In 1999, the school was named in honor of Gerald R. Ford, the 38th President of the United States and a 1935 graduate of the University of Michigan. 
A key component of the MPP course of study is hands-on experience, which takes the form of a required ten-week internship, typically completed in the summer between the program's two years. 
Students also have opportunities for specialized study and travel during the academic year. Currently, there are four courses which allow students to gain practical experience with policymaking and/or international exposure: 
In September 2007, the school began its first undergraduate program with 50 third-year students beginning the two-year program of study. 
The doctoral program  is conducted jointly with the economics, sociology, or political science department. 
Of the doctoral program, the MPP program, and the undergraduate program in public policy, the MPP program is the largest. The Ford School has developed dual degrees with many professional programs, which enables students to complete work on two degrees simultaneously. The most common dual degree programs include coursework in business, education, information, law, environment and sustainability, public health, Russian and Eastern European studies, social work, or urban and regional planning. 
The school is a full member of the Association of Professional Schools of International Affairs (APSIA), a group of public administration, public policy, and international studies schools. 
The Ford School is home to or co-sponsor of a number of multi-disciplinary research centers that focus on policy concerns including: 
Several members of the school's faculty have joint appointments in other departments, and there are visiting professors from around the U.S. and other countries. The Ford School also hosts a Diplomat in Residence to provide students with firsthand access to information about the U.S. State Department. 
The larger part of the plant specimens collected during the Ross expedition are now part of the Kew Herbarium. 
Although Hooker professed not to have changed his views on Darwin's theory of evolution by natural selection, the book contains an introductory essay on biogeography written from a Darwinian point of view, making the book the first case study for the theory. 
The British government fitted out an expedition led by James Clark Ross to investigate magnetism and marine geography in high southern latitudes, which sailed with two ships, HMS Terror and HMS Erebus on 29 September 1839 from Chatham. 
The 930-page Flora Tasmaniae was published between 1855 and 1860. Hooker dedicated it to the local naturalists Ronald Campbell Gunn and William Archer, noting that "This Flora of Tasmania .. owes so much to their indefatigable exertions". Although the book is sometimes stated to have been published in 1859, the dedication is dated January 1860. It made use of plants collected by the local naturalist Robert Lawrence as well as Gunn and Archer. 
The book begins with an "Introductory Essay" on biogeography. It is followed by a "Key to the Natural Orders of Tasmanian Flowering Plants" and a more detailed key to the genera. The Flora proper begins with the first order, the Ranunculaceae. 
The Kreutzer Sonata (German: Die Kreutzersonate) is a 1937 German drama film directed by Veit Harlan and starring Lil Dagover, Peter Petersen and Albrecht Schoenhals. It was based on the 1889 novella of the same name by Leo Tolstoy. 
This article related to a German film of the 1930s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article relating to a South Korean cycling figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Hodson Trust Scholarship is a four-year merit-based scholarship offered to roughly 20 incoming freshmen at Johns Hopkins University each year from a pool of over 30,000 applicants.  
The scholarship is funded by the Hodson Trust, which also heavily donates to Johns Hopkins University and funds scholarships for other Maryland schools. The Hodson Trust has given the university nearly $90 million since 1958. 
Describing the value of the Trust, Bill Conley, the Dean of Enrollment and Services for Johns Hopkins University, has said: 
This article relating to education in the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Eternity is the third full-length album by the German power metal band Freedom Call. It was released on June 3, 2002, by Steamhammer. 
Karen E. Taylor was born and raised in the Pittsburgh suburbs. A graduate of Churchill area High School and later of Grove City College, her first love was the theater, but now she admits that writing is better; "You get to write all the lines and play all the parts." She currently resides outside of Los Angeles with her husband and pets.  
James Patrick McNamara (born June 10, 1965) is a former professional baseball player. He played parts of two seasons in Major League Baseball as a catcher for the San Francisco Giants in 1992-93. 
For the 1990 season, McNamara played for San Jose, Phoenix and the Shreveport Captains. Combined, he played in 87 games, collecting 60 hits in 257 at-bats for a .233 batting average. In 1991, McNamara played for Shreveport and Phoenix, hitting a combined .241 in 58 games. 
Although he never managed to hit above .250 in a minor league season, he still managed to make it to the major leagues. He made his big league debut on April 9, 1992. He had only one at-bat in that game, grounding out against Ben Rivera. He hit .216 with one home run and nine RBI in his first big league season. In 74 at-bats, he struck out 25 times while walking only six times. He also spent some time with Phoenix in 1992, hitting .209 in 67 at-bats. 
He was granted free agency in October 1992 and signed by the Florida Marlins. However, the Giants drafted him in the Rule 5 draft in December of that year. 
McNamara spent most of his 1993 season with Phoenix, where he hit .196 in 158 at-bats. He appeared in four major league games that year, collecting one hit in seven at-bats for a .143 batting average. He played his final big league game against the Los Angeles Dodgers on July 28, 1993. He was granted free agency by the Giants in October 1993. He was signed as a free agent by the Texas Rangers in November of that year. 
For the Oklahoma City 89ers in 1994, McNamara hit .239 in 138 at-bats. He wound up in the New York Yankees organization, playing in 27 games for the Columbus Clippers, hitting .130. 1994 was his final professional season. 
Overall, McNamara hit .210 with one home run and 10 RBI in 81 major league at-bats. In 1998 minor league at bats, he hit .223. 
Jim has a son James and a daughter Elisabeth.[citation needed] He is married to Christina Wofford McNamara. Jim is the youngest out of 9 
Alfred Booth and Company was a British trading and shipping company that was founded in 1866 and traded for more than a century. It was founded in Liverpool, England, by two brothers, Alfred and Charles Booth. It grew into a significant merchant shipping company with its head office in Liverpool and interests in the United States and South America. The group was broken up in 1964 and the last Booth company from the group was sold in 1986. 
In 1863 the Booth brothers founded a partnership, Alfred Booth and Company, to export English light leather to the USA, which was in the midst of its civil war. The company had headquarters in Liverpool and a US office in New York City. 
After John Boyd Dunlop patented the pneumatic tyre in 1888, the trade in natural rubber from Brazil increased, and by 1900 Booth's had 14 ships. Booths had competitors on the Brazilian route including the Red Cross Iquitos Steamship Co, which operated up the Amazon to Iquitos in Peru, and the Maranham Steamship Co. In 1901 Red Cross's founder, Robert Singlehurst, retired and his company merged with Booths to form the Booth Steamship Co (1901) Ltd. 
Booths' fleet developed to include substantial passenger liners. In 1903 the company started carrying tourists to and from Lisbon and Madeira. 
Alfred Booth & Co diversified into civil engineering, and in 1919 it bought the Unit Construction Company from Crittall.[citation needed] Booths lost one ship in peacetime between the two World Wars, when the Gregory ran aground and was wrecked. The company introduced passenger cruises, advertising "1,000 miles up the Amazon" 
Despite losing nine ships in the First World War, Booth did not buy any ships for the first nine years after the 1918 Armistice. In 1927 Booth bought a second-hand German ship that it renamed Dominic. Between 1928 and 1935 it renewed part of its fleet with seven new ships and one second-hand one, Dunstan. 
After the war the company again modernised with new ships, and from 1955 it diversified its naming policy with Spanish names as well as early church ones. In 1957 Booths again suffered a peacetime loss, when the liner Hildebrand ran aground. 
In 1964 after a Booth family split the leather business was separated as Booth and Company (International) Ltd.[citation needed] It was made a public company in 1974 and bought by Garnar-Scotblair in 1981.[citation needed] In that period the Managing Director was John Sebastian Macaulay Booth, a grandson of co-founder Charles Booth.[citation needed] 
Alfred Booth & Co was sold in 1986 to the construction company Mowlem.[citation needed]; the chairman at the time of its sale[which?] was Richard Amis CBE, a grandson of Alfred Allen Booth.[citation needed] 
Alfred Allen Booth was a director of Cunard Steamship Co, was made a baronet in 1916 and died in 1948. The baronetcy passed to his eldest son, the television director and producer Sir Philip Booth, 2nd Baronet. He died in 1960 and was succeeded by his son Sir Douglas Allen Booth, 3rd Baronet, a television producer and writer living in New York City. His heir presumptive is Derek Booth, a hydrogeologist. 
Maguire was born in Newport News, Virginia and as a teenager, worked as a madrigal singer and costumed character in Williamsburg, Virginia before going on to study opera at the Oberlin Conservatory and the University of Toronto. After finishing her studies, she went on to a 23-year international career singing over thirty soprano and mezzo-soprano leading roles. In 1996, she toured extensively throughout the Netherlands, singing the lead contralto role in Gluck's Orfeo ed Euridice. 
She has recorded on the Collins Classics and Deutsche Grammophon Archiv labels and recorded over eighty live vocal broadcasts of major works on radio stations CBC, BBC, NPR and others. 
In 2004, she relocated from Toronto to Washington DC where she has sung in numerous performances at the John F. Kennedy Center for the Performing Arts, including Rossini's Stabat Mater, Beethoven's Symphony No. 9, Mahler's Symphony of a Thousand, Bach's cantata Gott der Herr ist Sonn und Schild, BWV 79, Amy Beach's Canticle of the Sun, and most recently, Mendlessohn's Elijah and Handel's Messiah during the 2008-2009 season. 
Arian Award, Metropolitan Opera Finalist, Juno Award (1993), Cardiff Singer of the World contestant representing Canada (1987) 
Personality style has been defined as "an individual's relatively consistent inclinations and preferences across contexts." 
Personality can be defined as a dynamic and organized set of personal traits and patterns of behavior. "Personality includes attitudes, modes of thought, feelings, impulses, strivings, actions, responses to opportunity and stress and everyday modes of interacting with others." Personality style is apparent "when these elements of personality are expressed in a characteristically repeated and dynamic combination." 
The origin of personality style is in some combination of genetic inheritance and environmental influence. 
The concept of personality style is broader than and includes the concepts of "personality traits", "personality type", and "temperament", or as a classification of type as with the Holland Codes. 
"Personality styles should be recognized as constructed approximations of human experience" and should be arrayed on a continuum rather than be reified or totalized. One should be vigilant to deconstruct the uses of personality style in favor of an ongoing reflexivity about the use and misuse of such labels. 
McAuliffe, Eriksen and Kress contrast personality style theory with stage theory. Style "represents long-term constructive preferences whereas stage represents current constructive capacity." Also, "style is relatively long-term and consistent over time, whereas stage tendencies are mutable..." 
Personality style assessment can help individuals and practitioners appreciate human diversity, or, in the words of Isabel Briggs Myers, respect "gifts differing". 
"The range of normal variation in styles can explain much human behavior without reference to notions of pathology." Personality disorders can be reconceptualized as being on a continuum, with one end being a more adaptive inclination. And style assessment can also complement the search for personality disorder. 
Specific personality style theories that might be useful include Costa and McCrae's NEO PI-R personality inventory, Holland's person-environment matching theory, Isabel Briggs Myers' personality type indicator theory,  Oldham and Morris' derivation of personality styles from DSM personality disorders, and Ivey's reconceptualization of the DSM personality disorders as a continuum of personality styles. 
This biographical article relating to Jamaican cricket is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Indo-Guyanese relations refer to the current and historical relationship between Guyana and India. Both countries were once part of the British Empire. There are approximately 327,000 Guyanese citizens who are of Indian descent. Indo-Guyanese make up the largest ethnic group in Guyana. 
Relations between India and Guyana ever since the independence of Guyana in May 1966 have been cordial. The cordiality in the relation remains unaffected with changes in governments either in India or in Guyana. Late Shrimati Indira Gandhi, the then Prime Minister of India, visited Guyana in 1968, late Dr. Shankar Dayal Sharma, the then Vice President of India visited Guyana in 1988 and Shri Bhairon Singh Shekhawat, the then Vice President of India came on a state visit to Guyana in 2006. 
The cooperation between the two countries in sharing developmental experience is mainly routed through Indian Technical & Economic Cooperation (ITEC) under which forty scholarships are granted every year in various courses. Besides, some experts are also deputed to Guyana from time to time on request in specified areas of activity. Several other scholarships are also available to Guyanese to pursue long-term courses, to get acquainted with India and to learn Hindi language in India. 
India has offered credit facilities to Guyana for use in mutually agreed fields, agriculture and information technology, being two of these. Indian companies have also expressed interest in bio fuel, energy, minerals and pharmaceuticals. Total trade turn over remains low, though the trend is positive. 
 An important cultural connection between India and Guyana is cricket. With the advent of the Indian Premier League, many Guyanese players were contracted to play in India.
Jane Duke is an Australian diplomat who was their Ambassador to ASEAN, beginning in August 2016, and was appointed Australian Consul-General Los Angeles in August 2020. 
Duke earned a Bachelor of Arts in Asian Studies and a Bachelor of Laws from the Australian National University and a Graduate Diploma in Legal Practice from the University of Technology Sydney. 
Duke was an immigration counsellor with Australia's Permanent Mission to the United Nations from 2005 to 2008. She was Australia's Deputy High Commissioner to Malaysia from 2011 to 2014. Between postings she worked at the Department of Foreign Affairs and Trade in Canberra. 
The Federal Institute for Sustainable Development (FISD) assists the Belgian Federal Government in the preparation and enforcement of policy decisions related to sustainable development. 
The history of the ESDN goes back to 1654, when public administrators from several EU Member States, in charge of national sustainable development (SD) strategies, met for the first time to exchange their experiences in the Netherlands. Since then, annual conferences have taken place across Europe. 
With the Vienna meeting in 2003, the target group of the conferences was broadened considerably. Besides the co-coordinators of national SD strategies and the national coordinators of EU environmental integration and SD policies, experts from the European Commission, representatives from various National Councils for Sustainable Development, and national members of the SD Working Group of the European Environment and Sustainable Development Advisory Councils (EESDAC) have joined the meetings. 
The FISD is divided into three units, who implement the service's key activities under the guidance of an editor: 
The FISD was created by a Royal Decree on 21 February 2014 (recorded in the Belgian Official Journal on 10 March 2014). It is the successor organization to Public Service for Programming Sustainable Development, set up to meet Belgian commitments given during the World Summit on Sustainable Development in Johannesburg, South Africa in 2002. 
Operationally, while having the status of a separate service, the FISD is attached to the Federal Public Service for the Chancellery of the Prime Minister; consequently, having its own budget and enjoying the operational support (primarily for staff administration, ICT and the budget) of the Chancellery. 
In early systems, the primary product was cellulose fibres. This comprises the putrescible (rottable), cellulose and lignin elements of the waste stream. The fibres can be fed into anaerobic digesters to reduce the biodegradability of the waste and to produce biogas. Alternatively the fibre could be used as biofuel. 
Some systems claim to wash out hydrolysed hemicellulose sugars and most of the protein as water-solubles.  The remaining materials, after simple physical separation (trommel screen) has several valuable uses.  One system claims to be able to dry the cellulose during processing using heat, and another system is able to dry the cellulose (much more economically) using pressure and steam kinetics. 
After fibre separation, the secondary streams consist of mixed plastics, which have normally been softened and deformed which eases separation, a glass and aggregate stream, separate ferrous and non-ferrous metals. The heat, steam and rotating action of the autoclave vessel strip off labels and glues from food cans leaving a very high quality ferrous/non-ferrous stream for recycling. 
With the removal of water, fibre, metals, and much of the plastics, the residual waste stream for disposal may be less than 10% by weight of the original stream, and is essentially devoid of materials that decompose to produce methane.  Systems in Europe meet and exceed all of the European waste treatment and recycling requirements. 
The full process of loading, treatment and sorting is typically completed within 90 minutes.  In a typical batch-type configuration, 2 10-ton units operating side by side would treat 440 tons per day with time for preventative maintenance.  Continuous flow systems are modular and are specifically designed to match the necessary capacity. 
The size of the vessel varies between vendors.  Experience shows that "small" vessels are not productive enough; while if the vessel is too large, the heavy weight of the vessel may cause equipment failures. 
The Wakefield Project is being completed by the Shanks Group PLC, UK, a successor to the Babcock group. 
Because of Estech's lead in the field, images of its autoclaves have been used by other companies in their advertisements.  While Estech actively exercises its proprietary rights, those who contemplate systems promised on the basis of Estech's images should be aware that valid offerers would be showing their own images. 
Manuel Meli (born 25 March 1995) is an Italian voice actor. Meli contributes to voicing characters in cartoons, anime, movies, and sitcoms. 
Meli was born in Rome. He is known for providing the voice of Phineas Flynn in the Italian-language version of the Disney Channel original animated series Phineas and Ferb. He is also well known for voicing Cody Martin in the Italian-language versions of The Suite Life of Zack & Cody and The Suite Life on Deck 
A polyquinane polycyclic compound consisting of fused five-membered hydrocarbon rings. If the compound is unsaturated instead of saturated, it is called a polyquinene. The simplest polyquinane is the bicyclic compound bicyclo[3.3.0]octane. Other members are triquinacene and dodecahedrane. 
 Richard Rampton QC (born 8 January 1941) is a British libel lawyer. He has been involved in several high-profile cases including Irving v. Penguin Books and Lipstadt, where he defended Deborah Lipstadt and Penguin Books against David Irving. 
Rampton was born on 8 January 1941, the eldest son of businessman and philanthropist Tony Rampton and his wife Joan. He was educated at Bryanston School and The Queen's College, Oxford. 
Richard Rampton was called to the Bar in November 1965 (Inner Temple) and was appointed a QC (Queen's Counsel) in 1987. 
In Irving v. Penguin Books and Lipstadt, he represented Deborah Lipstadt and her publisher against false accusations of libel after she said that Irving was a Holocaust denier in her book Denying the Holocaust (1993). He also represented McDonald's in the McLibel case, where the company sued two members of the London Greenpeace environmental campaigning group. 
This United Kingdom law-related biographical article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Players are eligible for the Hall of Fame if they have played at least 10 major league seasons, have been either retired for five seasons or deceased for six months, and have not been banned from MLB. These requirements leave 6 living players ineligible who have played in the past 5 seasons; 5 players (Bill Joyce, Ferris Fain, Jake Stenzel, Bill Lange, and George Selkirk) who did not play 10 seasons in MLB; and Shoeless Joe Jackson, who was banned for his role in the Black Sox Scandal. 
Brett Greenwood (born September 14, 1987)  is a former defensive back for the Iowa Hawkeyes college football team. 
Greenwood was a walk-on freshman for the team, starting for the Hawkeyes for three seasons. He was a member of the NFL's Pittsburgh Steelers pre-season squad in 2011 and was cut prior to the season's start. 
For the Iowa Hawkeye football game on September 24, 2011, against Louisiana-Monroe, attending fans were encouraged to wear green for a "green-out", in honor of the former standout. 
The Brett Greenwood Foundation has been established to provide a donation fund that will be used to support the University of Iowa Hospitals and Clinics, as well as Iowa's athletics department in the form of an endowed scholarship in Brett's name. 
The Iowa Hawkeyes named Brett Greenwood the honorary captain during the September 19th, 2015 football game against the Pittsburgh Panthers, as he continues to recover from this traumatic injury. 
Buwalda grew up in the village of Blerick and was one of the founders of the Dutch literary magazine Wah-Wah. He wrote essays and stories for multiple magazines, and gained recognition after writing an essay titled "A diversion because of potholes. Bruno Schulz, Franz Kafka, and Leopold von Sacher-Masoch" (original Dutch title: "Een omleiding wegens kuilen. Bruno Schulz, Franz Kafka, en Leopold von Sacher-Masoch"), which appeared in De Gids. Buwalda was editor of Kafka-Katern at the time. 
According to Sufi writings, devils struggle against the noble angels in the realm of the imaginal (alam al mithal) over the human mind, consisting of both angelic and devilish qualities. Some writers describe the devils as expressions of God's fierce attributes and actions. 
The devils make up one of three classes of supernatural creatures in Islamic theology. But since they are invisible, like the jinn, some scholars put them merely under one category of the supernatural. However, the prevailing opinion among the mufassirs distinguish between the jinn and devils as following: 
The devils are beings of hell-fire, and although their origin is not mentioned in the Quran (similar to the angels), Islamic scholars repeatedly asserted the idea that the devils have been created from either smoke or the hell-fire itself. Their exact origin is also up to interpretation. Different ideas have been proposed: 
Comparable to demons or devils in Christian theology, devils are incapable of good and limited to "evil". Abu Mufti writes in his commentary of Abu Hanifa's "al-Fiqh al-absat" that all angels, except with Harut and Marut, are obedient. But all devils, except Ham ibn Him Ibn Laqis Ibn Iblis, are created evil. Only humans and jinn are created with Fitra, meaning both angels and devils lack free-will and are settled in opposition. 
Following the cosmology of Wahdat al-Wujud, Haydar Amuli specifies that angels reflect God's names of light and beauty, while the devils God's attributes of "Majesty", "The Haughty" and "Domineering". 
Torbeno or Turbino was the eldest son and successor of Orzocorre I as Judge of Arborea from about 1100 until his death.  
His mother was Nivata or Nibatta or Nivatora. Torbeno himself married Anna de Lacon and was the father of Orzocorre II, who succeeded him.  
Torbeno's charters are subscribed by the curators of Oristano, Valenza, Milis, Fortoriani (Fordongianos), and Usellus. The curator of Valenza was Comita of the powerful Lacon family to which Torbeno was related by marriage. The family was the most powerful in Sardinia at the time. 
Modi won the Femina Look of the Year in 1999 and was awarded 'Miss Talented' at the Elite Model Look '99 in France. 
Modi is the founder of the Punyakarma Foundation, an NGO which works for the development of under-privileged children. She has been a panelist at the Mrs. India International since 2016.[citation needed] 
Rayan Philippe (born 23 October 2000) is a French professional footballer who plays as a forward for Luxembourger club Swift Hesperange. 
This biographical article related to association football in France, about a forward born in the 2000s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Nicholas Everitt (born 21 October 1943) is an English philosopher and atheist writer who specializes in epistemology and philosophy of religion. 
Everitt is an atheist and his best known work is The Non-Existence of God, published by Routledge in 2003. Everitt argues that the divine attributes of God (omniscience, omnipotence, omnipresence, omnibenevolence) in traditional theism are individually self-contradictory or cannot be co-instantiated. The book contains criticisms of all the standard theistic arguments (cosmological, ontological, moral, teleological). It was positively reviewed in academic journals. 
Medusa is a hamlet in the Town of Rensselaerville, in Albany County, New York, United States. The population was 376 at the 2000 census, which listed the community as a census-designated place (CDP), but it was not included as a CDP in the 2010 census. 
First settled in 1786 by Uriah Hall and his son Joshua,  Medusa's first name was Hall's Mills after those first settlers.  In 1850, the name of the village was changed to Medusa, at that time the village contained a Methodist Episcopal and a "Christian" Church, a hotel, two stores, two mills for grain, turning works, an evaporator, paper mill, carpenter's shop, and two Blacksmith's shops. 
There were 147 households, out of which 33.3% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 59.9% were married couples living together, 4.8% had a female householder with no husband present, and 28.6% were non-families. 21.8% of all households were made up of individuals, and 7.5% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.56 and the average family size was 3.04. 
In the CDP, the population was spread out, with 25.5% under the age of 18, 5.6% from 18 to 24, 25.8% from 25 to 44, 26.9% from 45 to 64, and 16.2% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 41 years. For every 100 females, there were 105.5 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 105.9 males. 
The median income for a household in the CDP was $44,688, and the median income for a family was $50,000. Males had a median income of $35,833 versus $28,750 for females. The per capita income for the CDP was $19,716. About 4.6% of families and 6.7% of the population were below the poverty line, including 10.4% of those under age 18 and none of those age 65 or over. 
Farsara is the area of Dalkhola Municipality in Ward no.9 and 16. in Uttar Dinajpur District West Bengal 
Farasara lies on the border of Bihar and Bengal. Before 2000, it looked like a village, but by 2010, it had developed into a commercial center. 
A tempo stand was established in 2005. It provides transport to the nearby gram panchayats in Bihar. And here roads name is NH.34-2 some time later it will meet to Barsoi  in Katihar district. 
The Americas are not included, as Columbus returned to Spain no sooner than March 1493. The globe shows an enlarged Eurasian continent and an empty ocean between Europe and Asia. The mythical Saint Brendan's Island is included. Cipangu (Japan) is oversized and well south of its true position; Martellus's map is followed in developing an enormous phantom peninsula east of the Golden Chersonese (Malaysia). 
From its creation until early in the 16th century, it stood in a reception room in the Nuremberg town hall. After that time, it was held by the Behaim family. In 1907, it was transferred to the Germanic Museum in Nuremberg. In 1992, it was moved for some time to the Vienna University of Technology, to be studied at high resolution by the Behaim Digital Globe Project. In 2011, a second digitalization by the German National Museum began. 
Terrestrial globes are known to have been made from antiquity, such as The Globe of Crates. None are known to have survived, even as fragments. A celestial globe, the Farnese Atlas, has survived from the second century AD. 
 Will Cozens is a British radio presenter and DJ currently employed by Global Radio as a presenter on Capital & Capital London 
Cozens was spotted by the Bauer Radio owned Kiss 100, after featuring on Channel 4's Soundclash, originally he presented weekends and early breakfast and later also evenings on Kiss 101 and Kiss 105-108. He has interviewed Chipmunk, Chris Brown, Estelle, Tinie Tempah and more at Kiss 100. 
He obtained a Law Degree at University making sure he specialised in entertainment law, specifically including defamation, slander, libel and even Ofcom. 
This British biographical article related to radio is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article relating to Dutch rowing is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Over his career Fedotenkov has been awarded the Order of Courage and the Order "For Service to the Homeland in the Armed Forces of the USSR" Third Class. He is married, with a son. 
The 1986 Knowsley North by-election was a parliamentary by-election held on 13 November 1986 for the British House of Commons constituency of Knowsley North. 
The Labour Party retained the seat with just over half of the votes, while the SDP-Liberal Alliance surged to achieve more than a third of the vote. The constituency had some of the highest levels of unemployment in the United Kingdom. 
There was a 14% swing from Labour to the Alliance, continuing a trend in by-elections, with the local Militant Tendency harming the Labour vote in by-elections on Merseyside (see especially Liverpool Walton). 
The seat had become vacant on 1 October 1986. The constituency's Labour Member of Parliament (MP), Robert Kilroy-Silk, resigned his seat to pursue a media career. He did this by being appointed Steward of the Manor of Northstead, a notional office of profit under the Crown, which is used to permit MPs to vacate their seats. 
Kilroy-Silk had been an MP since the February 1974 general election, originally sitting for Ormskirk. That seat disappeared in a redistribution, and he moved to the new constituency of Knowsley North in 1983. 
He returned to politics in 2004, becoming a Member of the European Parliament (MEP) for the East Midlands, initially representing the United Kingdom Independence Party. 
Six candidates were nominated. The list below is set out in descending order of the number of votes received at the by-election. 
1. Representing the Labour Party was George Howarth. He was Chief Executive of the Wales Trades Union Congress Centre in Cardiff, and had been deputy leader of Knowsley Metropolitan Borough Council from 1982 to 1983. 
He has been a Labour Member of Parliament since the 1986 by-election, originally for Knowsley North until 1997, then for its replacement Knowsley North and Sefton East, and since 2010 for Knowsley. 
2. The Liberal Party candidate, representing the SDP-Liberal Alliance, was Rosie Cooper. She had been a member of Liverpool City Council since 1973, and worked as a junior executive at Littlewoods. Cooper had contested the seat of Liverpool Garston at the 1983 general election. She has represented West Lancashire since 2005, having joined the Labour Party in 1999. 
3. The Conservative candidate was Roger Brown, a barrister born in 1951. He was a member of Bury Metropolitan Borough Council from 1982 until 1986. 
4. David Hallsworth stood for election as a candidate of the Revolutionary Communist Party led by Frank Furedi. 
5. George Weiss, a frequent election candidate, was an Independent using the ballot paper label "Rainbow Alliance Captain Rainbows Universal Party". 
Note a Change is calculated from the SDP candidate who represented the SDP-Liberal Alliance at the 1983 general election. 
Ubiquitin fusion degradation protein 1 homolog is a protein that in humans is encoded by the UFD1L gene. 
The protein encoded by this gene forms a complex with two other proteins, NPL4 and VCP, that is necessary for the degradation of ubiquitinated proteins. In addition, this complex controls the disassembly of the mitotic spindle and the formation of a closed nuclear envelope after mitosis. Mutations in this gene have been associated with Catch 22 syndrome as well as cardiac and craniofacial defects. Alternative splicing results in multiple transcript variants encoding different isoforms. 
Gastroplakaeis rubroanalis is a moth species in the family of Lasiocampidae found in Cameroon and Gabon. 
This article on a moth of the family Lasiocampidae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Goichi Suda was born in the city of Ueda in Japan's Nagano Prefecture on January 2, 1968, and lived in the region until moving to Tokyo when he was eighteen. Suda has spoken litt